,url,authors,publish_date,text
0,https://www.nbcnews.com/pop-culture/music/louis-vuitton-pulls-michael-jackson-inspired-clothing-new-collection-n983721,"['Minyvonne Burke', 'Minyvonne Burke Is A Breaking News Reporter For Nbc News.']",None,"Breaking News Emails Get breaking news alerts and special reports. The news and stories that matter, delivered weekday mornings.

March 15, 2019, 6:51 PM GMT By Minyvonne Burke

French luxury fashion house Louis Vuitton is pulling items from its fall menswear collection that drew inspiration from Michael Jackson following the release of a documentary which detailed allegations by two men who said the pop star molested them as children.

LVMH, the owner of Louis Vuitton, said in a statement Thursday to WWD that they will not produce pieces “that directly features Michael Jackson elements.""

Louis Vuitton did not return multiple requests for comment by NBC News.

The 65-piece collection — which included a T-shirt with an image of Jackson's dance shoes on it and shirts etched with his character from his 1978 movie ""The Wiz"" — debuted during a fashion show in January a week before the documentary ""Leaving Neverland"" screened at the Sundance Film Festival.

It aired on HBO earlier this month and led an immediate fallout, which included some radio stations in Canada and the Netherlands deciding not to play his music and an episode of ""The Simpsons"" which featured Jackson's voice being pulled from all future broadcasts.

The brand's men's artistic director, Virgil Abloh, told WWD that he condemns ""any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights.""

“I am aware that in light of this documentary the show has caused emotional reactions,"" he said in a statement to the outlet.

Abloh said that he intended to pay homage to Jackson's musical career.

“My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist. It referred only to his public life that we all know and to his legacy that has influenced a whole generation of artists and designers,” Abloh said.

The collection, which had multiple inspirations besides Jackson, will still be released in stores, the company said.

Michael Burke, the brand's chairman and chief executive officer, told WWD in a separate statement that the allegations raised in the film were ""deeply troubling and disturbing."" Louis Vuitton also said it was ""unaware"" of the documentary at the time of the fashion show.

“Child safety and welfare is of utmost importance to Louis Vuitton. We are fully committed to advocating this cause,"" Burke said.

Wade Robson, who claims Jackson abused him when he was 7, and James Safechuck, who claims the abuse started when he was 10, had previously told authorities there had been no sexual misconduct involving Jackson.

Robson testified in Jackson's defense at the 2005 molestation trial. But they have since filed lawsuits against the singer's estate. They are appealing after their suits were dismissed due to the statute of limitations.

NBC News has reached out to the Jackson estate for comment and has not yet received a response.

Jackson, who died in 2009, was acquitted in 2005 of charges of molesting a 13-year-old boy, unrelated to the documentary, at his Neverland ranch in California. He long denied allegations of sex abuse.

In February, his estate filed a lawsuit against HBO saying the documentary breached an agreement that it would not disparage the pop star.

The family also said the film and news coverage of the allegation were a ""public lynching"" and Jackson was ""100 percent innocent."""
1,https://variety.com/2019/music/news/michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-london-bus-posters-removed-1203164220/,"['Henry Chu', 'International Editor', ""Henry'S Most Recent Stories"", 'View All']",2019-03-15 11:10:30+00:00,"Posters proclaiming Michael Jackson‘s innocence in the wake of the “Leaving Neverland“ documentary will be removed from the sides of London buses, following a decision by the city’s transport agency.

Supporters of the late pop up superstar had paid for the posters, which bear the singer‘s face and the words “Facts Don’t Lie. People Do,“ in response to the allegations of sexual abuse raised by the documentary, which was broadcast on British free-TV network Channel 4 last week. But Transport for London, the agency that runs the British capital’s bus and subway system, told the BBC that the posters would be taken down because of “public sensitivity and concern around their content.“

The decision comes after a charity for sexual abuse survivors had criticized Transport for London for allowing posters that could discourage abuse victims from coming forward for fear of being disbelieved. “The decision to prioritize advertising revenue over the option of remaining neutral on such an emotive topic is disappointing,“ the charity said in a statement, the Guardian reported.

“Leaving Neverland” focuses on the allegations of two men who allege that the singer abused them for years, starting when they were young boys. Jackson’s family and many of his fans have denounced the documentary and the accusers.

The London bus posters were crowdfunded through money raised via the website mjinnocent.com. Supporters of the late singer also gathered outside Channel 4 headquarters last week to protest against the documentary, which was broadcast over two nights and earned high ratings."
2,https://www.thewrap.com/michael-jacksons-molestation-trial-gavin-arvizo-leaving-neverland/,"['Tim Molloy', 'Omar Sanchez', 'Tony Maglio', 'Beatrice Verhoeven', 'Tim Baysinger', 'Reid Nakamura']",2019-03-15 00:25:34+00:00,"The documentary “Leaving Neverland” has revived interest in Michael Jackson’s 2005 sexual molestation trial, and raised questions about how the jury could have possibly found the singer not guilty. The answer is simple: You had to be there.

I was there, for six months, covering the trial for The Associated Press. You can listen to a deep-dive into my trial memories on the latest “Shoot This Now” podcast, available on Apple or right here:

What did we see at the trial? We watched the prosecution’s case fall apart thanks to Jackson’s skilled legal team, and their efforts to discredit the family of Jackson’s accuser, Gavin Arvizo, who was 13 when he first accused Jackson.

It didn’t help that Wade Robson, one of the men who accuses Jackson of molesting him in “Leaving Neverland,” testified in 2005 that Jackson didn’t do it. (Robson explains in the documentary that he lied, in part, out of fear for Jackson’s life.)

But Robson’s testimony was one of many dramatic moments at the trial. Here are some key takeaways — ten bizarre details about the trial you didn’t know or have totally forgotten.

1. Michael Jackson once halted court proceedings so he could go to the bathroom. That isn’t, generally speaking, something that criminal defendants can do. We talk about my awkward men’s room exchange with Jackson at the 36-minute mark of the podcast.

2. After one court date, Jackson welcomed his fans to Neverland — which prosecutors said was the scene of the crime. To thank fans who came to the courtroom to support him, Jackson opened the gates of Neverland Ranch — the same ranch where he was accused of molesting Arvizo and holding his family against their will. Guests could wander the grounds, poke through Jackson’s collection of videos and mannequins, and play video games in his arcade — all under the watchful eye of the Nation of Islam. We talk about it at the 32-minute mark of the podcast.

3. The accuser’s mother was named Janet Jackson. Janet Arvizo’s marriage to U.S. Army Maj. Jay Jackson gave her the same name as Jackson’s sister.

4. She may have cost prosecutors their case. The defense made the case that she was a grifter with a history of using her children to try to extract cash from celebrities. She denied it, but wasn’t the best witness for herself or her children. She interrupted lawyers, gave rambling, confusing answers, and scolded jurors. One juror later said: “I disliked it intensely when she snapped her fingers at us.” She recalled thinking, “Don’t snap your fingers at me, lady.”

5. Prosecutors showed off Jackson’s porn collection to everyone in the courtroom — including his mom. They projected the covers of many magazines up onscreen for all to see, in order to argue that Jackson had shown porn to Gavin Arvizo and his younger brother, Star Arvizo, to “groom” them. It was a humiliating moment for Jackson, whose mother Katherine Jackson was among the people barraged with the magazine. But it may have backfired in two ways: First, Jackson’s collection of adult, heterosexual porn undercut the prosecution’s assertion that he preyed on underage boys. And second…

6. Jackson’s attorney, Tom Mesereau, got the accuser’s younger brother to contradict himself about an issue of “Barely Legal” — and whether Jackson had showed it to him at Neverland. Perhaps the biggest “Perry Mason” moment of the trial came when Mesereau walked Star Arvizo into a trap, getting him to testify that Jackson showed him a porn magazine Jackson couldn’t possibly have shown him. We read from the trial transcript of the testimony at the 30-minute mark of the podcast.

7. Gavin Arvizo wasn’t the only witness to accuse Jackson of molesting him. So did Jason Francia, the son of Jackson’s former maid, who broke down in tears as he testified that Jackson used to molest him during tickling sessions, and would give him $100 after each incident. Francia was asked on cross-examination if he had ever received money from Jackson.

“Other than the money he put down my pants?” he replied.

The defense tried to show he was unreliable because his mother had sought money from Jackson before. She reached an out-of-court settlement with Jackson for a reported $2 million in 1993.

8. Michael Jackson so despised the Santa Barbara County District Attorney, Tom Sneddon, that he wrote a song about him. Called “D.S.,” the song appeared on Jackson’s 1995 “HIStory” album, two years after Jackson paid roughly $20 million to the family of Jordy Chandler, a boy who accused him of molestation. Jackson renamed Sneddon “Dom Sneddon” in the song, one of the angrier numbers in Jackson’s repertoire. The chorus was “Dom Sneddon is a cold man,” repeated over and over. The verses include speculation that Sneddon was affiliated with the CIA and KKK.

9. Gary Coleman covered the trial. He was a reporter for All Comedy Radio’s news division. Michael Jackson’s sister, Janet Jackson, had a recurring role on Coleman’s long-running sitcom, “Diff’rent Strokes,” playing Charlene DuPrey. She dated Willis (Todd Bridges.) Coleman died in 2010, about a year after Jackson.

10. One of the prosecutors, Ron Zonen, later married a witness. Louise Palanker, a director, writer and producer, met Gavin Arvizo around 1999, when he was about nine years old, as part of a mentoring program for underprivileged children run by the Laugh Factory comedy club in Los Angeles. She told TheWrap she met Zonen after she was called to testify. They attended Gavin Arvizo’s wedding together in 2013."
3,https://metro.co.uk/2019/03/15/michael-jacksons-neverland-ranch-difficult-sell-child-sex-abuse-claims-8909373/,['Tobi Akingbade'],2019-03-15 00:00:00,"Michael Jackson’s Neverland Ranch is still on the market (Picture: Getty Image)

Michael Jackson’s controversial Neverland Ranch is struggling to do well on the property market because of the allegations of child abuse against the late singer.

The property has been renamed to Sycamore Valley Ranch and faced a drastic reduction of 69% in order to entice potential buyers.

The two-part documentary Leaving Neverland: Michael Jackson and Me details sexual abuse allegations made against the singer by two men; James Safechuck and Emmy Award-winning choreographer Wade Robson.

The men go into ‘upsetting’ detail during the course of the documentary when describing the alleged abuse on Jackson’s Neverland Ranch.

The property has been tarnished by the allegations (Picture: Rex Features)

As of today, the Ranch – which can be found in Santa Barbara County, California – is allegedly causing agents some stress because of how difficult it is to sell.

Speaking on Friday’s episode of This Morning, property mogul Leonard Steinberg told co-host Eamonn Holmes and Ruth Langsford that the Thriller’s singer’s history and the recent documentary is not helping matters in the slightest.

Advertisement

Advertisement

He explained: ‘A little bit of Michael Jackson’s cuckoo-ness is still there but the only thing they removed was the amusement park, which maybe isn’t so amusing anymore.’

Speaking of the recent headlines, he added: ‘It does have a little bit of tarnish now, unfortunately. It’s a beautiful, beautiful property but it is difficult to erase history.’

The amusement park is no longer in the Ranch (Picture: Rex Features)

But Steinberg has some tips on how to sell this part of Jackson’s estate, which has been given to a family trust.

The estate agent said: ‘I think the first thing you would have to do is a major price reduction and here you see the reduction is astronomical

‘Not only have they changed the price, they have changed the name of the property from Neverland to Sycamore Valley Ranch.

‘It is 69% below the original £75 million. Now the asking price is £23 million.’

In 2015, Neverland Ranch was put on sale for $100 million (£76.6 million).

However, as of September last year, the ranch was still on the market, only for 33% less of its original asking price – $67 million (£51.3 million).

In the meantime, UK viewers can now see for themselves what shocking things Robson and Safechuck have to say about their time spent with Jackson, with Robson saying that the abuse first began when he was alone with Jackson at the ranch.

Advertisement

Advertisement

This Morning airs Monday to Friday and Sunday at 10:30 am on ITV.

Got a showbiz story? If you've got a story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk Entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.

MORE: Whoopi Goldberg shocks The View co-stars with surprise return after revealing she almost died from pneumonia"
4,https://www.foxnews.com/lifestyle/louis-vuitton-nixes-michael-jackson-inspired-clothing-leaving-neverland-backlash,"['Janine Puhak', 'Janine Puhak Is An Editor For Fox News Lifestyle. Follow Her On Twitter At']",None,"The King of Pop will no longer posthumously rock the racks at Louis Vuitton, at least for now.

The storied French fashion house has announced that items from several Michael Jackson-inspired runway looks from the label’s Fall/Winter 2019 menswear show will not be produced for sale, as HBO’s controversial documentary “Leaving Neverland” has sparked outcry among many.

HAILEY BIEBER ATTENDS HOTEL EVENT IN $25,000 MINI DRESS FROM TOM FORD

Though reps for Vuitton had initially claimed they were “unaware” of the flick, which premiered at Sundance on Jan. 25, just days after the Jan. 17 Paris show, the company has responded to the backlash in recent days and announced it will not be producing any item “that directly features Michael Jackson elements” from the show, WWD reports.

When looks from the collection do hit stores, the pieces will “purely reflect the true values of the brand and of our artistic director,” reps said.

“I am aware that in light of this documentary the show has caused emotional reactions. I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights,” LV men’s artistic director Virgil Abloh told WWD.

“We find the allegations in the documentary deeply troubling and disturbing,” Vuitton CEO and chairman Michael Burke agreed. “Child safety and welfare is of utmost importance to Louis Vuitton. We are fully committed to advocating this cause.”

Abloh had previously said that although the Fall/Winter 2019 designs certainly paid homage to the late pop star, he had hoped to highlight “the Michael that I thought was universally accepted, the good side, his humanitarian self,” as per the outlet.

FOLLOW US ON FACEBOOK FOR MORE FOX LIFESTYLE NEWS

Notable Jackson-esque pieces from the recent men’s show included a graphic tee featuring the singer’s famed socks and loafers, tops emblazoned with his character from the 1978 flick “The Wiz” and glittering white gloves, People reports. The backdrop and ambiance of the show were reportedly designed to evoke the iconic “Billie Jean” music video set as well.

In similar headlines, since ""Leaving Neverland"" debuted, Starbucks, the Los Angeles Lakers and several radio stations have distanced themselves from the late singer, E! Online reported, announcing that they will no longer be playing his music in official capacities.

CLICK HERE TO GET THE FOX NEWS APP

The 236-minute documentary ""Leaving Neverland"" first aired in two parts on HBO on March 3 and 4.

The film details how Wade Robson, James Safechuck and their families came to know and trust Jackson at the height of his fame in the 1980s and early 1990s. The documentary delves into the alleged abuse, which Robson says started at age 7 and Safechuck says began at age 10, and the trauma that emerged as adults when they both started to understand what happened to them.

Jackson's estate continues to attack their credibility, and they've encountered disbelief and even threats from fans.

In late February, the estate filed a lawsuit against HBO alleging that the film violates a contract to show a 1992 Jackson concert that requires that the network not disparage the singer in the future.

The Associated Press contributed to this report."
5,https://www.yahoo.com/gma/michael-jacksons-former-nanny-defends-him-against-sex-211004536--abc-news-topstories.html,"['Chris Francescani', 'Santina Leuci']",2019-03-08 04:41:00+00:00,"Michael Jackson's former nanny defends him against new sex abuse allegations in HBO's 'Leaving Neverland' originally appeared on abcnews.go.com

The simmering debate over last weekend's new HBO documentary “Leaving Neverland” could be heating up again.

One of Michael Jackson’s longest-serving employees has come forward to defend the late pop star, saying that in all the years she worked for Jackson she never witnessed, suspected or learned of any sexual abuse of children by the pop star.

In a lengthy statement released to ABC News, Grace Rwaramba – the former nanny to Jackson’s children, Prince Michael I, Paris and Prince Michael II (known as ‘Blanket’), who worked for Jackson for 17 years – described her former boss as hopelessly naïve to manipulation and incapable of hurting children.

“If Michael harmed Wade Robson and James Safechuck, they have my deepest sympathy and compassion,” Rwaramba said in the statement, referring to the two men featured in the documentary. “I don’t claim to know what happened between Michael and his accusers. I wasn’t there.”

“However, because Michael is no longer here to defend himself, and because I have a unique view of him and the life he lived, I feel compelled to speak out against what I firmly believe to be false claims. The person that Wade and James describe is not the person that I knew.”

“He was trusting to the point of extreme naivete; always assuming the best intentions in everyone,” Rwaramba said of Jackson in the statement. “While he was far from perfect, in my over twelve years of living with Michael, knowing him and his lifestyle intimately, I never saw or experienced anything that led me to suspect that he was capable of child sexual abuse.”

In the controversial film, the two men graphically detailed alleged child sexual abuse at the hands of Jackson, who died in 2009 at the age of 50. They claimed that Jackson introduced them, separately, to pornography and masturbation and digitally violated them on multiple occasions.

In one of the most talked-about scenes in the documentary, Safechuck pushes a child-sized, diamond-inlaid gold band on to the tip of his adult finger. He contends in the film that Jackson gave him the ring as part of a secret, mock wedding ceremony the two held when Jackson was 30 and Safechuck was 10.

""I was really into jewelry and he would reward me with jewelry for doing sexual acts for him,"" Safechuck said in the HBO film.

The documentary has sparked a re-examination of Jackson's legacy, more than a decade after the pop singer was acquitted of child sex abuse charges involving a 13-year-old in California -- home to his 'Neverland' ranch.

Since it aired earlier this month, several radio stations in Canada and New Zealand have reportedly stopped playing Jackson's music, and in Manchester, England, a statue of the singer has been removed from the National Football Museum, according to the BBC.

Jackson's estate has sued HBO for $100 million for allegedly breaching a previous, 1992 non-disparagement agreement as part of a contract to air Jackson's ""Dangerous"" tour. Jackson estate lawyers did not seek to prevent broadcast of the documentary, which aired this month on March 3 and 4, but rather claimed that the previous agreement was breached by airing the ""Leaving Neverland"" documentary.

Story continues

“HBO breached its agreement not to disparage Michael Jackson by producing and selling to the public a one-sided marathon of unvetted propaganda ... [in] a film where they knew the two subjects had for many years testified under oath and told family, friends and law enforcement that Mr. Jackson did nothing inappropriate to either of them.""

HBO network executives said in a statement issued earlier this week that the lawsuit was an effort to ""undermine"" the film.

“Despite the desperate lengths taken to undermine the film, our plans remain unchanged,"" the statement reads. ""HBO will move forward with the airing of Leaving Neverland, the two-part documentary, on March 3rd and 4th. This will allow everyone the opportunity to assess the film and the claims in it for themselves.”

Attempts by ABC News to reach Robson and Safechuck for comment on Rwaramba's statements were unsuccessful. A spokesman for the film directed requests for comment to the two men's attorney. The attorney provided ABC News with a statement in response to Rwaramba's comments.

""Ms. Rwaramba admits in her statement that she does not know what happened between Michael and his accusers,"" attorney Vince Finaldi said in the written statement. ""As a longtime employee of MJJ productions she has a vested interest in defending Jackson and his estate.""

""It is sad that she had chosen to disparage a victim of child sexual assault and his family in order to do so,"" Finaldi continued in the statement. ""This is a continuation of the campaign of false information, character assassination, victim blaming and shaming that the Jackson corporate lawyers heap on any child or adult who speaks the truth about Mr. Jackson’s sexual behavior with children. These attacks have kept many of Mr. Jackson’s victims silent. It will not stop Wade or James from speaking the truth.”

'60 to 100 employees'

Rwaramba played a pivotal role in Jackson's life for more than a decade before his death. She traveled with Jackson and the children to Bahrain and Ireland following Jackson's 2005 child molestation acquittal. In 2008 she testified in Jackson's defense during a breach-of-contract trial brought against the singer by a Bahranian sheik.

""Grace was like the mother, and Michael was the father,"" Jackson friend and filmmaker Bryan Michael Stoller told Time Magazine in 2009. ""The only person I saw get close to the kids besides Michael was Grace.""

Rwaramba contended in her statement that there was an ""army"" of people working at Jackson’s California ranch whenever the iconic artist was there, and that it would have been extremely difficult for the star to molest visiting children.

“I was at Neverland when many of the family friends would come and go,"" Rwaramba said in the statement. ""At any given time, anywhere between 60 to 100 employees worked in security, maintenance, housekeeping, grounds, the kitchen, and many other roles. Maintaining the ranch in such immaculate shape took an entire army of workers that were always around.”

PHOTO: Michael Jackson with 10 year old Jimmy Safechuck on a tour plane on July 11, 1988. (Dave Hogan/Getty Images, FILE) More

Jackson was first accused of child abuse in 1993 by Jordan Chandler. That accusation led to an extensive law enforcement investigation but no indictment. Jackson reportedly settled a civil lawsuit in 1994 with an undisclosed payment to Chandler's family.

A decade later, Jackson was charged with seven counts of child sexual abuse and two counts of administering an intoxicating agent to commit felony child sex abuse against Gavin Arvizo. In June, 2005, Jackson was acquitted of all charges.

'Every night that I was with him, there was abuse'

In the documentary, the two men -- Robson, now 36, and Safechuck, now 41 – claimed they were each individually abused by the pop star, Robson beginning when he was 7-years-old and Safechuck beginning when he was 10.

""Once the abuse started within that first week, every night that I was with him, there was abuse. While my mother was you know, next door,"" Robson said in an interview with Oprah Winfrey titled ""After Neverland,"" which directly followed the release of the documentary on HBO.

Safechuck said he first met the pop star while shooting a soda commercial at age 10. He claims that after developing a friendship with Jackson, he was also abused by the singer in secret hideaways throughout Neverland Ranch and in hotel rooms while on tour.

Safechuck also said Jackson would make him participate in ""drills"" where ""he would pretend like somebody was coming in and you had to get dressed as fast as possible without making noise.""

When sexual misconduct allegations against Jackson surfaced in 1993, both Robson and Safechuck testified on the singer's behalf, saying he never molested or touched them in appropriately. Robson did again in 2005, prior to Jackson's acquittal on child abuse charges.

But now the two men have come forward to claim that they were, in fact, sexually abused by the singer – and that it took becoming fathers themselves for them to recognize themselves as victims of childhood abuse by the singer.

(MORE: 'The Last Days of Michael Jackson')

Robson told Winfrey that when he testified he had “no understanding that what Michael did to me sexually was abuse. I had no concept of it being that.”

“From night one of the abuse, of the sexual stuff that Michael did to me, he told me it was love,” Robson said. “He told me that he loved me and God brought us together. … Anything Michael would say to me was gospel.”

'Ambition and self-interest'

Rwaramba, who acknowledges she doesn’t know whether or not Jackson molested the two men, described Robeson and his mother as determined to use Jackson’s fame and celebrity to make him a star.

“I know Wade Robson and his family well,” Rwaramba said in the statement. “I first met Joy Robson back in the early 90s, when I was at MJJ Productions. In late 1994, I attended the release party of Wade’s first album in California. I distinctly recall Joy running that event as though her life depended on it. After that release party, I didn’t see the Robsons again until early 1997, when Wade joined several other families at Neverland after Prince was born.”

PHOTO: Michael Jackson receives the Diamond Award during the 2006 World Music Awards, Nov. 15, 2006, in London. (Pat Sullivan/Getty Images, FILE) More

“Over the years, I got to know the Robsons well as they visited the ranch on many different occasions,” Rwaramba continued in the statement. “Neverland was an enchanting place where the butlers, cooks, maids, zookeepers, gardeners and other staff made every guest feel like royalty, and everyone person who was fortunate to visit loved it!”

“The one thing that was consistent about the Robsons over the years was Joy's steely resolve to turn Wade into a star,” Rwaramba said in the statement. “When all the other kids, often including Michael, were off having water balloon fights or watching a movie in the theater, Joy would be drilling Wade on a dance move and every so often wave Michael over for some tips.”

“On one such occasion, Michael sat next to me as I was watching Prince and we watched Wade practice under Joy’s focused inspection. He said to me, “she reminds me of Joseph,” referring to his father’s obsession with perfection. Unbeknownst to Joy, that was her nickname. Michael had a nickname for everyone. This was the only time I ever heard him compare anyone to his father. Also, despite his complicated past with Joseph, he meant this observation as a compliment.”

PHOTO: In this May 5, 2005 file photo, defense witness for the Michael Jackson child molestation trial, Wade Robson, center, arrives for court at the Santa Barbara County Courthouse in Santa Maria, Calif. (Mark J Terrill/AP, FILE) More

Several years after his 2009 death, both men sued the Jackson estate civilly for child sexual abuse, but the lawsuits were dismissed due to statutes of limitations. Both men are appealing the separate decisions, according to the documentary.

In the interview with Winfrey, Robson said he was forced to lie on the witness stand at Jackson's 2005 trial and elsewhere, and that the lawsuit was an effort to do ""something good with this bad.""

“Michael trained me and forced me to tell the lie for so many years, and particularly on the stand,” he continued. “And those were really traumatizing experiences for me that had a huge impact on the rest of my life. So the feeling was, I want an opportunity to reprocess that experience. I want to get on the stand again, because now I’m able to tell the truth.”

'Neverland' wedding bid

Rwaramba also claimed that Robson sought permission to hold his wedding at Neverland -– in the middle of Jackson’s 2005 criminal trial, for which he was acquitted of all charges.

“The Robsons’ ambition and self-interest knew no bounds,” Rwaramba wrote in her statement. “Several months before Michael was acquitted on all charges on June 13, 2005, he came home from court and informed me that I should expect a call from Wade. When Wade called the ranch, security patched the call through to Paris’s room where Michael and I spent most of our time preparing for the next day.

""I put him on speaker phone,"" Rwaramaba continued. ""He informed me that Michael had advised him to contact me about whether he and his finance, Amanda, could have their wedding at Neverland in the fall. I was utterly shocked by how insensitive the request was; Michael was sitting next to me.

""’You know Grace, Neverland is so special to my family and me,’ Wade continued,” according to Rwaramba’s statement. “’Michael has been like a father to me, and it would mean the world to us if Amanda and I could get married at Neverland.’ I told Wade, this is not a good time, reminding him that Michael was in the middle of the fight for his life.”

(MORE: VIDEO: A look at the final days of Michael Jackson's life)

“A few days later, I was in Santa Barbara running errands when Joy called with the same request. I had previously helped Wade gain permission to film a music video at Neverland, which was a big favor considering the strict no cameras policy. I remember responding with a stern ‘do you seriously expect me to ask Michael, right now -- during the trial -- if you can use the ranch for Wade’s wedding?’

""After a moment of awkward tension, she conceded and dropped off the phone,"" Rwaramaba wrote in the statement. ""Why would someone who alleges to have been assaulted for over seven years want to have one of the most sacred events in his life on the same property where the attacks allegedly took place?’”

(MORE: Joe Jackson, patriarch of musical Jackson family, has died)

A woman who answered the phone at the home of Lynnette Joy Robson declined comment, referring interview requests to a public relations spokesperson in New York, who referred ABC News to Finaldi, Robson and Safechuck's attorney.

“What I can't understand is why Wade would continue to voluntarily and consistently return, and bring friends and loved ones, to a place that is the site of the alleged attacks well into his adult life?” Rwaramba said in the statement.

Rwaramba, a Rwandan national, began working as a personnel director and assistant to Jackson in 1992, and became a nanny to his children beginning in 1997, when Jackson’s first child, Prince, was born.

“For twelve years, from 1997 to 2009, I was part of Michael’s family … I spent more time with Michael in the last twelve years of his life than anyone except his children.”"
6,https://uproxx.com/music/michael-jackson-timeline-sexual-molestation-charges-leaving-neverland/,"['Andre Gee', 'Derrick Rossignol', 'Philip Cosores', 'Chloe Gilke']",2019-03-15 15:00:00+00:00,"Getty Image

Michael Jackson’s legacy is being viewed in a new light by many after HBO’s Leaving Neverland docuseries. The Dan Reed-directed, four-hour docuseries features Wade Robson and James Safechuck recounting graphic allegations of molestation during their childhood and adolescent years at the hands of Jackson. The series has resulted in Jackson’s music being banned from certain radio stations, taking a plunge on the charts, and even his classic Simpsons episode being pulled from the air.

Robson and Safechuck have been accusing Jackson of abuse for several years, after previously defending the singer against other boys’ accusations. The men contend throughout the docuseries that they weren’t ready to face the reality of what had allegedly been done to them.

Though the FBI investigated Michael Jackson for over a decade and closed their file without seeking charges, and he was acquitted of sexual molestation in 2005, there are many people who feel like the singer’s friendships with kids weren’t about his “Peter Pan syndrome,” but predation. Here is a full timeline of allegations and legal proceedings against Michael Jackson:

September 1993: First allegations against Jackson surface

Getty Image

Evan Chandler filed a civil suit against Michael Jackson in late 1993, alleging that the singer molested his son Jordan Chandler, who met the singer through his parents while Jackson was renting a car. In August of 1993, Jordan told a psychiatrist that Jackson had molested him. The psychiatrist was legally bound to tell police in California, who launched an investigation. He was never charged for the accusations, though they marred his reputation and brought his relationship with children into question.

Several of Jackson’s underage friends, including Wade Robson and James Safechuck, denied that he had ever abused them and said they had never seen or heard anything inappropriate. Evan Chandler’s suit, which claimed “sexual battery” against Jordan, was settled for over $20 million dollars in January of 1994.

December 1993: Jackson denies allegations

Share This Video Facebook Twitter EMAIL

Chandler’s allegations got Jackson thoroughly investigated by the LAPD and the Santa Barbara County Sheriff’s Department. In December of 1993, a visibly shaken-yet-defiant Jackson took to the airwaves via live satellite to deny the “disgusting” accusations and recounted the “dehumanizing” circumstance of the police photographing him nude while fulfilling a search warrant. Jackson stated that his love for children was purely wholesome, and implored listeners and the media to not “treat me like a criminal, because I am innocent.”

February 2003: Living With Michael Jackson premieres

Getty Image

Jackson had faced no more legal or civil action after the Chandler case by 2003, but he was an extremely polarizing figure. While his fans and some onlookers chalked up his adult friendships with children as a result of never having his own childhood as the star of the Jackson Five, skeptics thought that he had a more nefarious reason for the relationships.

Martin Bashir’s 2003 Living With Michael Jackson documentary put more fuel on the fire for many. Bashir spent over eight months with Jackson, who continued to have boys at his Neverland Ranch for sleepovers. Bashir documented the then-44-year-old Jackson’s “disturbing” relationship with then 12-year-old Gavin Arvizo, who he held hands with and admitted sharing a bedroom with calling it “a beautiful thing.” Jackson also admitted that he has “slept in the bed with many children,” including child actor Macauley Culkin and his siblings.

There was widespread outrage to Jackson’s comments.

Winter 2003: Jackson is charged with molestation

Getty Image

It was Arviso, from the Bashir documentary, who anonymously accused Jackson of molestation in 2005. His claims led to Jackson being charged with seven counts of child molestation and two counts of administering an intoxicating agent for the purpose of a committing a felony. Jackson’s Neverland Ranch was raided.

Arviso testified that Jackson showed he and his brother “several pornographic websites depicting naked women and girls, some of them about 15 years old.” Arvizo and his brother also accused Jackson of committing sexual acts on and in front of Arvizo. They also said that Jackson tried to give the underage boys wine, which he allegedly called “Jesus juice” and “Jesus blood.”

Jackson, who was visibly gaunt throughout the proceedings, turned the court dates into a spectacle, dancing on top of a car and even coming to the courthouse in his pajamas. He had several friends who he met at a young age testify in defense of his character, including Wade Robson, who testified that he had never been touched or been in an inappropriate situation with Jackson.

Jackson’s legal team aimed to depict the Arvisos as liars out to get a piece of Jackson’s fortune. In June of 2005, Jackson was acquitted of all charges, with one juror surmising that the Arviso’s mother “had taught her children to lie to gain money or favors from celebrities.”"
7,https://www.nme.com/news/film/jordan-peele-responds-to-character-wearing-michael-jackson-t-shirt-in-us-2462321,[],2019-03-15 15:08:02+00:00,"""I think it addresses this idea of the shadow self.""

Us director Jordan Peele has explained the significance of a Michael Jackson T-shirt worn by a character in the forthcoming horror movie, which hits cinemas next week. Watch our full video interview with Peele above.

In the film, the follow-up to Get Out, Lupita Nyong’o’s character, Adelaide Wilson, is seen as a child in 1986 wearing a ‘Thriller’ t-shirt. The film’s release coming only weeks after the documentary Leaving Neverland saw Jackson being accused of extensive sexual abuse. While Peele wasn’t aware of the coming documentary at the time of filming, he says that Jackson’s story reflects the darkened sense of self that is present within the film.

“I didn’t know that this documentary was coming out, but in many ways the duality of Michael Jackson has been well documented,” he told NME.

“There’s this murky area when it comes to the specifics of his all story and all that. I think it addresses this idea of the shadow self and when we talk about the collective shadow self, which is what this film is about, it involves an ability for us to ignore the truth and the darker side of ourselves.

“That’s a perfect symbol for what this movie is.”

Sharethrough (Mobile)

Peele was speaking to NME ahead of Us hitting cinemas next week – two years after the huge success of his debut movie Get Out.

When asked if he felt pressure to follow up the success of the Oscar winning horror, Peele said: “Get Out was so out of the box because I was making it for me. For several years with that script, I thought I was writing a script for me to read and to get better as a writer and entertain myself with ‘oh, this would be the best movie if someone would make it.

“When that movie worked and the fantastic response came, I knew I had to return to this idea of ‘write a movie for you to read’ and trust that people will dig it.”

Us is released next Friday. “"
8,https://www.independent.co.uk/arts-entertainment/films/news/jordan-peele-us-michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-a8825506.html,['Clémence Michallon'],2019-03-15 18:36:11+00:00,"Director Jordan Peele has commented on the fact that one of the characters in his latest movie, Us, wears a Michael Jackson T-shirt – saying the situation is a “perfect symbol” of his horror film’s message.

Us, which is out this month, was filmed before the release of the documentary Leaving Neverland, in which Wade Robson and James Safechuck share detailed accusations of child sexual abuse against Jackson.

Peele told NME he did not know that the documentary was coming out when he was leaving on US, but acknowledged Jackson’s “duality”.

We’ll tell you what’s true. You can form your own view. From 15p €0.18 $0.18 USD 0.27 a day, more exclusives, analysis and extras.

He then explained how having a character wearing a Jackson T-shirt echoes the psychological horror thriller’s reflection on people’s “darker side”.

“I think it addresses this idea of the shadow self and when we talk about the collective shadow self, which is what this film is about, it involves an ability for us to ignore the truth and the darker side of ourselves,” Peele said.

“That’s a perfect symbol for what this movie is.”

Shape Created with Sketch. Leaving Neverland – photos show Michael Jackson with his accusers Show all 9 left Created with Sketch. right Created with Sketch. Shape Created with Sketch. Leaving Neverland – photos show Michael Jackson with his accusers 1/9 Michael Jackson with accuser Wade Robson Sundance Insitute 2/9 Accuser Wade Robson meeting Michael Jackson for the first time Channel 4 3/9 Michael Jackson with the Robson family Channel 4 4/9 Michael Jackson at the home of accuser James Safechuck Channel 4 5/9 Dan Reed approached the Michael Jackson documentary with 'all the scepticism and rigorousness that I would approach a story about a terrorist attack' Channel 4 6/9 Michael Jackson leaves the courtroom on a break at the Santa Barbara County Courthouse for the second day of closing arguments in his child molestation trial in Santa Maria, California, 2005 AFP/Getty 7/9 Michael Jackson accuser Wade Robson Channel 4 8/9 James Safechuck, another of Jackson's accusers Channel 4 9/9 Leaving Neverland director Dan Reed Channel 4 1/9 Michael Jackson with accuser Wade Robson Sundance Insitute 2/9 Accuser Wade Robson meeting Michael Jackson for the first time Channel 4 3/9 Michael Jackson with the Robson family Channel 4 4/9 Michael Jackson at the home of accuser James Safechuck Channel 4 5/9 Dan Reed approached the Michael Jackson documentary with 'all the scepticism and rigorousness that I would approach a story about a terrorist attack' Channel 4 6/9 Michael Jackson leaves the courtroom on a break at the Santa Barbara County Courthouse for the second day of closing arguments in his child molestation trial in Santa Maria, California, 2005 AFP/Getty 7/9 Michael Jackson accuser Wade Robson Channel 4 8/9 James Safechuck, another of Jackson's accusers Channel 4 9/9 Leaving Neverland director Dan Reed Channel 4

Us is being released in the UK this Friday, 15 March, and will hit theatres in the US on 22 March.

The film, which stars Lupita Nyong’o, Winston Duke and Elisabeth Moss, follows up on Peele’s acclaimed directorial debut Get Out, released in 2017."
9,https://www.foxnews.com/entertainment/paris-jackson-says-its-not-my-role-to-defend-father-michael-after-leaving-neverland-backlash,"['Kathleen Joyce', 'Kathleen Joyce Is A Breaking Trending News Producer For Foxnews.Com.']",None,"Paris Jackson tweeted that it was not her “role” to defend father Michael Jackson following the backlash from the HBO documentary “Leaving Neverland.”

Jackson, 20, appeared to be responding to a social media user, who pointed out that she hasn’t spoken out about the documentary and remarked “tabloids are mad they need to provoke you.”

“There’s nothing I can say that hasn’t already been said in regards to defense. Taj [Jackson, Paris’ second cousin] is doing a perfect job on his own. And I support him. But that’s not my role. I’m just tryna get everyone to chill out and go with the flow, be mellow and think about the bigger picture. That’s me,” Jackson wrote.

PARIS JACKSON SPEAKS OUT FOLLOWING REPORTS SHE'S SEEKING TREATMENT: 'I AM HAPPY AND HEALTHY'

Paris Jackson is Michael Jackson’s second-born child and only daughter. His other children are Michael J. Jackson, Jr. and Prince Michael ""Blanket"" Jackson II.

The explosive documentary “Leaving Neverland” detailed how Wade Robson, James Safechuck and their families came to know and trust the “Thriller” singer at the height of his fame in the 1980s and early 1990s. The two men alleged Jackson sexually abused them as children. Before his 2009 death, the singer denied similar and repeated allegations against him.

OPRAH WINFREY ON EXPLOSIVE DOCUMENTARY 'LEAVING NEVERLAND' : 'THIS MOMENT TRANSCENDS MICHAEL JACKSON'

Jackson's family and estate have denounced the documentary and HBO’s decision to air it, claiming it spreads falsehoods about a man not alive to defend himself. The co-executors of the Jackson estate announced weeks before the HBO debut of ""Leaving Neverland"" that they would sue the network, claiming that the airing of the documentary would ""constitute a breach of a non-disparagement clause from a previous contract,"" Entertainment Weekly reported.

The Associated Press contributed to this report."
10,https://www.billboard.com/articles/news/8501473/sia-support-alleged-michael-jackson-victims-leaving-neverland,['Glenn Rowley'],None,"Sia came out in public support of Michael Jackson’s alleged victims, Wade Robson and James Safechuck, on Tuesday (March 5) after the release of the four-hour Leaving Neverland documentary.

“Dear Wade and James, I believe you and I love you. Keep going #AfterNeverland,” the pop star tweeted, also tagging British child exploitation activist Stinson Hunter in the post.

The bombshell two-part HBO documentary, which details the two men’s claims that Jackson sexually abused them for years as children at his Neverland Ranch in California, has been met with a deeply divided reaction from the public. Many celebrities and fans have rallied behind the alleged victims in the aftermath of the film’s release, while Jackson’s family and other supporters have ardently defended the late King of Pop’s innocence.

Meanwhile, multiple radio stations in New Zealand and Quebec have dropped Jackson’s iconic discography from their rotations following the public backlash.

See the full tweet by Sia below."
11,https://www.thewrap.com/michael-jackson-used-simpsons-cameo-groom-boys/,"['Tony Maglio', 'Tim Molloy', 'Ross A. Lincoln', 'Beatrice Verhoeven', 'Tim Baysinger', 'Reid Nakamura']",2019-03-13 14:35:21+00:00,"Al Jean says he “strongly” believes Michael Jackson used his now-pulled cameo in Season 3 of “The Simpsons” to “groom boys.”

The “Simpsons” showrunner spoke in detail to The Daily Beast about Jackson’s “Stark Raving Dad” guest role, which he wrote. He said several “Simpsons” staffers watched the Jackson documentary “Leaving Neverland” and were alarmed by it.

“What saddens me is, if you watch that documentary–which I did, and several of us here did–and you watch that episode, honestly, it looks like the episode was used by Michael Jackson for something other than what we’d intended it. It wasn’t just a comedy to him, it was something that was used as a tool. And I strongly believe that,” Jean told the site.

Also Read: Corey Feldman 'Can No Longer' Defend Michael Jackson After 'Leaving Neverland' (Video)

He added that while he doesn’t usually second-guess the past guests on the show, he felt that the episode “has a false purpose.” Asked what it was, he replied, “I think it was part of what he used to groom boys.”

“I really don’t know, and I should be very careful because this is not something I know personally, but as far as what I think, that’s what I think,” Jean said. “And that makes me very, very sad.”

Also Read: 'The Simpsons' Producers Pull 1991 Michael Jackson Episode in Response to 'Leaving Neverland'

Last week, fellow “Simpsons” executive producer James L. Brooks said the episode featuring Jackson will be permanently shelved.

“It feels clearly the only choice to make,” Brooks told the The Wall Street Journal.

Brooks told the Journal that though he went into “Leaving Neverland” wanting to believe that Jackson was innocent, he came away convinced that “the documentary gave evidence of monstrous behavior.”

The four-hour documentary details the accounts of Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who say Michael Jackson sexually assaulted them over several years beginning when they were young boys.

Also Read: Anti-Abuse Group Sees Spike in 'Grooming' Searches After Michael Jackson Doc 'Leaving Neverland'

The Jackson estate called the documentary “the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death.” The estate is suing HBO for $100 million, accusing the network of violating a non-disparagement clause included in an agreement to air Jackson’s Dangerous World Tour live back in 1992.

Brooks told The Wall Street Journal that the reason the episode wasn’t shelved sooner is because Jackson was acquitted in his 2005 sexual abuse trial, but that the documentary convinced him. He said also that the “The Simpsons” production team was “of one mind on this.”

“Stark Raving Dad” featured Jackson as the voice of a man in a mental institution who believes he is Michael Jackson. For contractual reasons, Jackson wasn’t credited when the episode originally aired, but his participation was confirmed several years later."
12,https://www.telegraph.co.uk/tv/0/leaving-neverland-big-unanswered-questions-michael-jackson-james/,"['Adam White', 'Glenda Cooper', 'Charlotte Lytton']",None,"How did Michael Jackson become friends with Macaulay Culkin? Did Lisa Marie Presley ever address the abuse allegations? And did Wade Robson really burn the Thriller jacket? Your Leaving Neverland questions answered

So vast is the Michael Jackson mythos that even a four-hour expose on the alleged criminality in his private life struggles to do it proper justice. It’s not helped by the fact that so much of what made Jackson a fascinating and deeply polarising figure was directly interlinked.

The preternatural talent and the familial abuse that ensured it existed in the first place; the heterosexual marriages and the alleged molestation of young boys that they shadowed; the surreal theatrics that..."
13,https://uproxx.com/music/michael-jackson-support-posters-london-buses/,"['Chloe Gilke', 'Derrick Rossignol', 'Philip Cosores']",2019-03-15 15:03:56+00:00,"Getty Image

Posters proclaiming Michael Jackson‘s innocence in the wake of the Leaving Neverland documentary will be removed from London city buses, according to the city’s transport agency.

Hey @TfL @MayorofLondon very disappointed to see that you've allowed this ad on your bus network — esp given recent work on wider advertising standards across the network #BelieveVictims #MichaelJackson @Channel4 pic.twitter.com/YxbVMIOnf4 — Michelle Warbis (@michellewrbs) March 13, 2019

Jackson supporters paid for the bus advertisements, which read “Facts Don’t Lie. People Do,” in response to the allegations of sexual abuse and decades of trauma exposed by the recent HBO documentary. Transport For London, the agency that runs the city’s bus system, told the BBC that the posters would be taken down due to “public sensitivity and concern around their content.”

Wow, there really is some money behind the ""Michael Jackson is innocent"" campaign, just seen an advert on the side of a London bus… Is it funded by the Jackson estate or his fans? #LeavingNeverland pic.twitter.com/qgGChq0N6k — Joe (@itsjoerack) March 8, 2019

The decision comes after the Survivors Trust, a charity for survivors of sexual abuse and assault, criticized TFL for letting the posters be displayed in the first place. The group said that billboards proclaiming Jackson’s innocence “perpetuate fear” that victims will not be believed when they come forward. “The decision to prioritize advertising revenue over the option of remaining neutral on such an emotive topic is disappointing,” said a representative for the charity in a press statement, as reported by The Guardian.

Leaving Neverland focuses on the allegations of two men who allege to have been abused by the pop singer for years, beginning when they were young boys. In the wake of the documentary, US radio and television stations have been banning Jackson’s music, and the singer’s streaming and album sales numbers have declined dramatically."
14,https://abcnews.go.com/Entertainment/wireStory/quebec-radio-stations-stop-playing-michael-jackson-songs-61481424,[],None,
15,https://www.yahoo.com/entertainment/michael-jackson-episode-removed-simpsons-023429329.html,['Michael Schneider'],2019-03-08 02:34:29+00:00,"The Simpsons episode “Stark Raving Dad” is considered one of the most iconic episodes from the show’s early run — but it will now be harder for fans to view.

Michael Jackson infamously provided a voice for the episode, which aired as the show’s Season 3 premiere on Sept. 19, 1991. His involvement was uncredited, and only rumored to be Jackson’s voice until it was finally confirmed to actually be him, years later. But now, following the extensive allegations of sexual assault by Jackson as chronicled in the HBO documentary “Leaving Neverland,” “The Simpsons” producers have decided to pull the episode from rotation.

Related stories

'Leaving Neverland' Draws 2 Million Viewers in U.K. as Jackson Fans Fight Back

Does 'Leaving Neverland' Spell Trouble for Michael Jackson Estate's $250 Million Sony Deal?

Michael Jackson Fans Protest 'Leaving Neverland' Broadcast in U.K.

“It feels clearly the only choice to make,” executive producer James L. Brooks told the Wall Street Journal, which broke the news on Thursday. He told the paper that fellow executive producers Matt Groening and Al Jean agreed with the decision. “The guys I work with — where we spend our lives arguing over jokes — were of one mind on this,” Brooks said.

Reached by email, Jean told Variety that “I agree with Jim, nothing else to add.”

In the episode, Jackson voiced the character Leon Kompowsky, who meets Homer Simpson in a mental institution. Simpson brings home the character, a large white man who claims to be Michael Jackson. Ultimately, Leon helps Bart Simpson celebrate his sister’s birthday by singing one of the show’s most memorable tunes, “Happy Birthday Lisa.” Jackson didn’t actually sing on the episode; Kipp Lennon mimicked Jackson’s voice on all of the episode’s songs.

“This was a treasured episode. There are a lot of great memories we have wrapped up in that one, and this certainly doesn’t allow them to remain,” Brooks told the newspaper. He said it would take time, however, for the show to be removed from syndication, as well as FXX’s “Simpsons World” on-demand service, and future reissues of its DVD sets.

“I’m against book burning of any kind. But this is our book, and we’re allowed to take out a chapter,” he told the Journal.

“Stark Raving Dad” is also remembered for another famous “Simpsons” moment: After then-President George H.W. Bush made a speech in which he said, “we are going to keep on trying to strengthen the American family, to make American families a lot more like ‘the Waltons’ and a lot less like the ‘Simpsons,’ the producers quickly added an open where the family was watching that speech — with Bart turning to his family to say, “Hey, we’re just like ‘The Waltons.’ We’re praying for an end to the Depression, too.”

Sign up for Variety’s Newsletter. For the latest news, follow us on Facebook, Twitter, and Instagram."
16,https://www.eonline.com/shows/daily_pop/videos/285102/michael-jackson-s-kids-suing-leaving-neverland-accusers,[],2019-03-15 10:58:00,"U.S. CA U.K. AU Asia DE FR

E! Is Everywhere This content is available customized for our international audience. Would you like to view this in our US edition?

E! Is Everywhere This content is available customized for our international audience. Would you like to view this in our Canadian edition?

E! Is Everywhere This content is available customized for our international audience. Would you like to view this in our UK edition?

E! Is Everywhere This content is available customized for our international audience. Would you like to view this in our Australian edition?

E! Is Everywhere This content is available customized for our international audience. Would you like to view this in our Asia edition?

E! ist überall Dieser Inhalt ist für internationale Besucher verfügbar. Möchtest du ihn in der deutschen Version anschauen?

E! Is Everywhere This content is available customized for our international audience. Would you like to view this in our German edition?

E! est partout Une version adaptée de ce contenu est disponible pour notre public international. Souhaitez-vous voir ça dans notre édition française ?

E! Is Everywhere This content is available customized for our international audience. Would you like to view this in our French edition?

E! está en todos lados Nuestro contenido está disponible y personalizado para nuestra audiencia internacional. ¿Te gustaría verlo en la edición en español?

E! está en todos lados Nuestro contenido está disponible y personalizado para nuestra audiencia internacional. ¿Te gustaría verlo en la edición en español?

E! está en todos lados Nuestro contenido está disponible y personalizado para nuestra audiencia internacional. ¿Te gustaría verlo en la edición en español?"
17,https://variety.com/2019/tv/news/michael-jackson-fans-protest-leaving-neverland-channel-4-hbo-1203156203/,"['Stewart Clarke', 'International Correspondent', ""Stewart'S Most Recent Stories"", 'View All']",2019-03-06 16:57:14+00:00,"Michael Jackson fans gathered outside Channel 4’s London headquarters Wednesday to protest the broadcaster’s planned airing of “Leaving Neverland,” the controversial documentary about alleged sexual abuse by the late pop superstar.

Jackson’s supporters have called the documentary, by HBO and Channel 4, an unjustified smear on the singer’s reputation. Channel 4 issued a strongly worded defense of its decision to air the documentary in two parts, starting Wednesday evening. It said that showing “Leaving Neverland” was in the public interest and that viewers could reach their own conclusions.

The protest was organized via the Michael Jackson’s Children United Worldwide – Hospital Fund group on Facebook. It called for people to attend a peaceful protest “to Boycott releasing of disgusting documentary ‘Leaving Neverland’ in UK TV.”

It added that this was the first of several planned protests. “The documentary will be released on Channel 4 early spring we would like to ask you to come and JOIN us on journey of series of protest prior UK release of the documentary to get it banned and shelved,” the group said.

Related 'Leaving Neverland' Director on Making Michael Jackson Abuse Documentary 'Game of Thrones' Final Episode Lengths, Dates Revealed

A banner reading “Facts Don’t Lie. People Do” was unfurled at the protest at Channel 4 headquarters. Reports said there were “dozens” of protesters. The Facebook group has 313 registered as having attended.

James Safechuck and Wade Robson were befriended by Jackson when they were 10- and 7-year-old boys, respectively. “Leaving Neverland” paints a picture of alleged sexual abuse by Jackson and explores the feelings that led both men to confront their experiences. Variety’s review described the two men’s stories as “overwhelmingly powerful and convincing.” Jackson’s family has strongly condemned the film and rejected the allegations.

Jackson’s nephew, Taj Jackson, also spoke on BBC TV and radio ahead of the broadcast and defended his uncle. “Knowing Wade for many years, it didn’t seem heartfelt to me,” he said of Robson’s contribution to the film. “I don’t trust someone’s word when they don’t have any evidence.” He added: “I’m definitely saying that they are lying. They are suing for hundreds of millions of dollars right now.”

Channel 4 noted that its mission as a public broadcaster included delivering high-quality news and current affairs programs. “It is in the public interest to allow these individuals to tell of their interactions with Michael Jackson,” the broadcaster said in a statement to Variety.

“He was of course a high-profile figure whose work still entertains millions of people but who was previously accused of child sex abuse. Viewers will make their own judgment about the testimony of the two victims interviewed in the film when it airs.”

There were protests when the film premiered at Sundance, although Variety reported that police outnumbered the protesters. Dan Reed’s documentary has already aired on HBO in the U.S. It is set to be seen around the world after a slew of channels bought the two-parter."
18,https://www.eonline.com/news/1023557/r-kelly-michael-jackson-and-the-fans-who-ll-never-give-up-the-faith,[],2019-03-14 14:21:29,"We are truly living in the age of celebrity worship.

It's not hard to see why. These beautiful people are responsible for creating the content we crave, the films we'll watch over and over, the soundtracks to our lives. And their personal lives always just seem to be that much more interesting than our own. It's easy to be enamored and enthralled by the dramatic goings on in the lives of rich and famous. In fact, it's practically expected.

But what happens when that adoration gives way to fanaticism? And when that fanaticism keeps us from being able to see our faves as anything less than the heroes we've built them up to be, regardless of any and all evidence that argues otherwise? In the cases of Michael Jackson and R. Kelly, we're finding out in real time."
19,https://www.hollywoodreporter.com/news/louis-vuitton-menswear-artistic-director-virgil-abloh-speaks-michael-jackson-inspired-collection-1194873,"['Ericka Franklin', 'Thrnews Thr.Com']",2019-03-14 15:30:09,"Virgil Abloh condemns child abuse and addresses 'Leaving Neverland' allegations against the late pop star, who inspired his fall 2019 menswear line.

French fashion house Louis Vuitton made headlines last year for ushering in a new era of inclusivity when they appointed Virgil Abloh as artistic director of its menswear line — the luxury label's first African-American creative head. But Abloh's fall-winter 2019 collection (shown in January in Paris) was an homage to Michael Jackson, whose sexual abuse allegations have resurfaced due to the January release of the HBO documentary Leaving Neverland — inspiring negative reactions that the company addressed Thursday in a statement.

The fashion show featured a runway mimicking the New York sidewalk seen in Jackson’s ""Billie Jean"" video as well as pieces that were designed to evoke his likeness and signature style (from military buttons to shirts dusted with crystals), flag prints that nodded to his 1985 charitable ""We Are the World"" single and prints featuring Jackson's scarecrow plus other characters from the 1978 film The Wiz.

“The documentary Leaving Neverland featuring two men who allege they were sexually abused as children by Michael Jackson has caused us the greatest pain,"" said the statement. “It is important to mention that we were unaware of this documentary at the time of the last LV FW19 Men’s Show.""

“My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist. It referred only to his public life that we all know and to his legacy that has influenced a whole generation of artists and designers,"" said Abloh. ""I am aware that, in light of this documentary, the show has caused emotional reactions. I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights.”

Abloh’s stance was further supported by Michael Burke, chairman and CEO of Louis Vuitton: “We find the allegations in the documentary deeply troubling and disturbing. Child safety and welfare is of utmost importance to Louis Vuitton. We are fully committed to advocating this cause.”

Since the release of Leaving Neverland, there has been an array of reactions, from protests such as Drake’s removal of the song ""Don’t Matter to Me"" from his tour (which features Jackson) to support by fans speaking out in defense of their idol on social media."
20,https://www.upi.com/Entertainment_News/2019/03/15/Louis-Vuitton-to-stop-making-Michael-Jackson-inspired-items/2831552679164/,['Nicholas Sakelaris'],2019-03-15 00:00:00,"Louis Vuitton will stop selling all Michael Jackson-inspired items in response resurfaced child sex abuse allegations against the late pop star. File Photo by John Angelillo/UPI | License Photo

March 15 (UPI) -- Fashion designer Louis Vuitton will stop producing Michael Jackson-inspired merchandise over allegations of child sex abuse against the deceased pop star in the documentary Finding Neverland.

In the HBO documentary, two men accuse Jackson of molesting them when they were children decades ago. Fashion news website WWD and Harper's Bazaar both confirmed Louis Vuitton's decision to pull the Jackson-inspired items from a recent collection.

Louis Vuitton's Michael Jackson collection included a T-shirt with an image of his loafer-clad feet and white socks posed in an iconic dance move. Other merchandise featured costumes inspired by Jackson's outfits in music videos and concerts.

Vuitton officials said they didn't know about the documentary when creating the fashion line or when it hosted a fashion show on Jan. 17, eight days before the documentary was screened at Sundance Film Festival. The result has caused the company ""the greatest pain,"" it said.

All items that directly feature Michael Jackson elements will cease production.

""I am aware that in light of this documentary the show has caused emotional reactions. I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights,"" artistic director Virgil Abloh, men's artistic director at Vuitton said in a statement to WWD Thursday. Abloh added, ""My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist. It referred only to his public life that we all know and to his legacy that has influenced a whole generation of artists and designers.""

Wade Robson and James Safechuck said they were abused by Jackson when they were ages 7 and 10, respectively. Both previously told authorities no sexual misconduct occurred.

In 2005, Jackson was acquitted of charges of molesting a 13-year-old boy in an unrelated matter. Jackson denied any sexual abuse until his death in 2009."
21,https://people.com/music/the-simpsons-showrunner-michael-jackson-episode-groom-boys/,['Joelle Goldstein'],None,"The Simpsons showrunner Al Jean is revealing why he and other The Simpsons executives decided to pull the 1991 episode voiced by Michael Jackson from the show’s archives.

Following the explosive allegations of child sexual abuse surfaced in the bombshell HBO documentary Leaving Neverland, Jean, creator Matt Groening, and executive producer James L. Brooks collectively agreed to remove the episode from re-runs, streaming platforms, and upcoming DVD/Blu-ray box sets last week.

Get push notifications with news, features and more.

The episode was the first that Jean served as showrunner for so it had held a special place in his heart but he explained that the decision was “the right move,” despite it being a personal milestone for him and losing out financially.

“It wasn’t something that makes me happy. It’s something I agree with completely,” Jean, 58, told The Daily Beast on Wednesday. “What saddens me is, if you watch that documentary — which I did, and several of us here did — and you watch that episode, honestly, it looks like the episode was used by Michael Jackson for something other than what we’d intended it.”

“It wasn’t just a comedy to him, it was something that was used as a tool,” he explained, adding that, “I think it was part of what he used to groom boys.”

“I really don’t know, and I should be very careful because this is not something I know personally, but as far as what I think, that’s what I think. And that makes me very, very sad.”

Al Jean (left) and Michael Jackson Rodin Eckenroth/WireImage; Aaron Lambert-Pool/Getty Images

Jackson’s episode of The Simpsons, called “Stark Raving Dad,” features him voicing character Leon Kompowsky who believes he is the singer. In it, Jackson’s character and Bart Simpson sing a birthday song to Lisa Simpson — which was penned by the singer — and features the lyrics, “I wish you better than your heart desires, and your first kiss from a boy.”

RELATED: The Simpsons Pulling Michael Jackson Episode in Wake of Abuse Allegations

Though the episode aired two years before Jackson was publicly accused of child sexual abuse in 1993, Jean said watching it now brings on an entirely different meaning.

“I lose a little bit of money financially, it’s not something that’s great personally to lose one of the most successful things I ever did, but I totally think it’s the right move,” he said. “The episode itself has a false purpose, and that’s what I object to about it now.”

Michael Jackson's character with Bart and Lisa Simpson FOX

Leaving Neverland chronicles allegations from two men, Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who both claim Jackson befriended them when they were children and that their relationships quickly turned sexual.

RELATED: Inside Neverland: All the Ways Michael Jackson’s Kid-Friendly Ranch Allegedly Hid His Abuse of Boys"
22,https://www.news.com.au/entertainment/celebrity-life/who-is-michael-jacksons-accuser-wade-robson/news-story/11a1a5a02882d528215057a3518d2523,['Jessica Leahy'],2019-03-14 04:22:00+00:00,"HBO's latest documentary, Leaving Neverland exposes allegations of sexual abuse from the king of pop Micahel Jackson.

Wade Robson was just five years old when he met his idol, Michael Jackson.

Growing up in his native Brisbane, Wade showed promise as a dancer, and in 1987 he won an MJ impersonation competition. His reward? He’d finally get an introduction to the King of Pop during the Australian leg of his Bad tour.

— For more stories like this, go to whimn.com.au—

Wade was eight when his family relocated to the US. Having stayed in touch with Jackson, the young boy subsequently appeared as a child performer in three of Jackson’s music videos — Black and White, Jam and Heal The World.

Related: Michael Jackson’s son Blanket has become mute since doco aired

Related: Latoya Jackson said Michael Jackson was a paedophile in a 1993 interview

Related: Insiders reveal horrifying new Michael Jackson allegations

But years later the choreographer, who has gone on to creatively collaborate with Britney Spears and NSYNC, says his longstanding relationship with Jackson was one of abuse.

His claims are now the subject of a controversial new HBO documentary, Leaving Neverland. In the four-hour exposé, 36-year-old Wade claims he was molested by Jackson at Neverland ranch.

WHEN WADE CLAIMS THE ABUSE BEGAN

It was 1989 when Jackson reportedly invited Wade and his family to Neverland for a weekend visit. Wade says he and his sister Chantal spent the night in Jackson’s bedroom.

When the Robson family went on to the Grand Canyon for the week, seven-year-old Wade was left behind with the star, and this is when he alleges Jackson first assaulted him.

“Within either the first or second night of Michael and I being alone at Neverland, the night started changing,” he says. “One of the ways I remember it starting is, you know, Michael just sort of started to touch my legs and touch my crotch over my pants … It progressed to him performing oral sex on me, him showing me how to perform oral sex on him.”

Wade says from that point on he continued to have physical sexual relations with Jackson until he was 14 years old.

TAKING THE STAND TO DENY ABUSE

In 1993 when a boy named Jordy Chandler accused Jackson of molesting him Robson was a key witness for Jackson’s defence.

At 10 years old, Wade took to the stand to deny anything inappropriate had ever happened between him and the singer.

Related: This is where you’ve seen Wade Robson before

Related: Grim new Jackson theory

Related: Oprah’s crucial point about Jackson film

“We sleep in the same bed,” Wade told CNN at the time. “We’re both fully dressed (in) pyjamas. It’s a huge bed. He sleeps on one side. I sleep on the other.”

In the end, prosecutors did not file criminal charges against Jackson, and the Chandler family reached a settlement agreement reportedly to the tune of $20 million.

WADE’S LAST NIGHT AT NEVERLAND

Wade claims in 1994 he spent his last night with Jackson in bed. He alleges that night the singer tried to anally penetrate him as a then-14-year-old and only stopped because the act was too painful.

“The abuse, for me, went from age seven to 14 years old,” Wade says in Leaving Neverland. “I remember feeling around 12, starting to be a little more uncomfortable about that. And sometimes maybe trying to change the subject or, you know, distract. But then having a fear that, ‘If I don’t do this, I’m already feeling like I’m not a favourite of Michael’s anymore. And if I don’t do this, what’s gonna happen? What’s gonna happen to our friendship?’”

WADE TAKES THE STAND TO DENY ABUSE, AGAIN

In 2003 California police formally charged Jackson with seven counts of child molestation.

Eventually, the victim in the case is identified as Gavin Arvizo — a boy who met Jackson when he was a 10-year-old with cancer.

During the 2005 trial, Wade took the stand, alongside actor Macaulay Culkin, to say Jackson was not a sex offender and had not touched him or acted inappropriately.

When Tom Mesereau, Jackson’s lawyer, asked Wade if he’d ever been molested by the singer, he answered firmly.

“Absolutely not,” a then-22-year-old Wade said. “And I can tell you right now that if he had, I wouldn’t be here right now.”

Pressed on whether Jackson had touched him in “a sexual way”, Wade said: “Never. I wouldn’t stand for it.”

In June of that year a jury who deliberated for 32 hours over the course of a week found Jackson not guilty on all charges.

WHY WADE IS SPEAKING OUT

Wade’s allegations against Jackson are revealed in the film alongside fellow Jackson accuser, James Safechuck.

The film features graphic abuse claims, including how James alleges Jackson “married” him in a mock ceremony in exchange for a sexually abusive relationship.

Director Dan Reed says he’s “shocked by those who still won’t accept Michael Jackson as abuser”.

“Wade was in love with Jackson and cherished that relationship even more than the bond with his mother,” Reed wrote in a piece for The Guardian. “That situation persisted for years. It wasn’t until after he became the father of a little boy that Wade ‘woke’ and began to look for a way out of the accursed mental Neverland he’d entered 22 years earlier.”

— Jessica Leahy is the News Editor for whimn.com.au, continue the conversation

— This story originally appeared on whimn.com.au and was reproduced with permission"
23,https://www.vibe.com/2019/03/virgil-abloh-addresses-michael-jackson-inspired-collection-backlash/,['Jessica Mckinney'],2019-03-15 10:32:55-04:00,"Virgil Abloh And Louis Vuitton Condemn Sex Abuse Amid 'Leaving Neverland'

The luxury brand will pull it's Michael Jackson-inspired collection from production.

Virgil Abloh and Louis Vuitton are speaking up against child sex abuse. Abloh debuted a Michael Jackson-inspired collection in Paris Fashion Week in Jan. 2019, but in the wake of the allegations revisited by HBO's Leaving Neverland, the artistic director announced the luxury brand is pulling pieces of the FW19 line from production.

Abloh released a statement to WWD on Thursday (Mar. 14), condemning child abuse and explaining the motive behind the fall menswear collection. ""I am aware that, in light of this documentary, the show has caused emotional reactions. I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights,"" he said. “My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist. It referred only to his public life that we all know and to his legacy that has influenced a whole generation of artists and designers.""

Michael Burke, Louis Vuitton’s chairman and chief executive officer, also elaborated on the controversy surrounding the collection, noting that they were ""unaware"" of the documentary prior to presenting the collection in Paris. ""We find the allegations in the documentary deeply troubling and disturbing,"" Burke told The New Yorker. ""Child safety and welfare is of utmost importance to Louis Vuitton. We are fully committed to advocating this cause.""

A spokesperson for the French label also confirmed that ""no item that directly features Michael Jackson elements"" will be available to the public. ""The Fall-Winter 2019 Men’s collection has multiple inspirations and will be launched in stores in July,"" the statement reads.

As previously reported, Leaving Neverland spoke with two men who alleged they were sexually abused by Jackson when they were young. The shocking footage has triggered a worldwide response, both positive and negative. While some networks and organizations have started to remove Jackson-related content from circulation, some supporters have launched protests in their local areas to defend Jackson's innocence.

The singer's family has also denied the allegations and is seeking legal action against HBO and the alleged victims."
24,https://www.bbc.co.uk/news/entertainment-arts-47582054,"['Mark Savage', 'Bbc Music Reporter']",None,"Image copyright Getty Images Image caption The 20-year-old encouraged fans to ""be mellow and think about the bigger picture""

Paris Jackson has said it is ""not my role"" to publicly defend father Michael against allegations of abuse.

The 20-year-old was speaking a week after the broadcast of Leaving Neverland, a documentary in which two men accused Jackson of sexually abusing them as children.

""There's nothing I can say that hasn't already been said in regards to defence,"" the model wrote on Twitter.

She added that she supports her family's efforts to clear his name.

Paris spoke out after being followed by paparazzi in New Orleans on Thursday.

A fan suggested she was being hounded because people wanted to hear her views on Leaving Neverland.

In response, she praised her second cousin Taj Jackson, who has led a media campaign against the documentary and is crowdfunding a rival film.

""Taj is doing a perfect job,"" said Paris. ""I support him but that's not my role.

""I'm just tryna get everyone to chill out and go with the flow, be mellow and think about the bigger picture. That's me.""

Image copyright AFP/Getty Images

Paris, who is the second of Michael Jackson's three children, had previously told fans to ""chillax"", ""calm down"" and ""smoke some weed"" instead of getting upset over the allegations.

She told one person on Twitter: ""Do you really think that it's possible to tear his name down? Do you truly believe they stand a chance?""

Leaving Neverland tells the stories of Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who were befriended by Jackson as children and say he subjected them to years of abuse.

The Michael Jackson estate has hit back at the allegations, branding both accusers ""perjurers"" and ""admitted liars"".

However, many have been swayed by their testimony. Radio stations in Australia and Canada have blacklisted Jackson's songs and The Simpsons' creators have pulled an episode in which the star made a cameo.

Fashion label Louis Vuitton also said on Thursday that it was removing Michael Jackson-themed clothes from a new collection in the wake of the documentary.

Follow us on Facebook, on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, or on Instagram at bbcnewsents. If you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk."
25,https://www.vibe.com/2019/03/michael-jackson-children-reportedly-considering-lawsuit-against-accusers,['Latifah Muhammad'],2019-03-15 00:45:07-04:00,"Michael Jackson’s Children Reportedly Considering Lawsuit Against 'Leaving Neverland' Accusers

Wade Robinson and James Safechuck could be sued over their accusations in the HBO documentary.

Michael Jackson’s children are reportedly considering suing the accusers who appeared in HBO’s Leaving Neverland documentary. Paris, Prince and Prince Michael Jackson II (a.k.a. “Blanket”) might sue Wade Robinson and James Safechuck for emotional distress, slander and fraud, Page Six reports.

The Jackson kids allegedly want Safechuck and Robinson to issue an apology, and while they aren't seeking money, any monetary award would be donated to charity. “It’s very important to them they carry forward their father’s legacy of philanthropy and humility,” a source said according to Page Six.

Earlier in the month, Jackson’s estate filed a $100 million lawsuit HBO accusing the cable network of breaching a previous contract with the late King of Pop. Jackson died from cardiac arrest in 2009.

In the two-part documentary that has triggered strong reactions on both sides of the spectrum, Robinson and Safechuck accuse Jackson of molesting them when they were children, and share graphic details of the alleged sexual abuse. Though Jackson’s fans and family members remain adamant that he's innocent, his music has already been muted at some radio stations, an episode of The Simpsons featuring the music icon was pulled by producers, #MJInnocent adverts were removed from buses in London, and Louis Vuitton announced that they will be nixing a collection inspired by Jackson’s legacy after receiving backlash.

“I am aware that in light of this documentary the show has caused emotional reactions,” Virgil Abloh, artistic director of Louis Vuitton’s men’s wear collection, said in a statement to Women’s Wear Daily Thursday (March 14). “I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights.”

Abloh clarified that the company was unaware of the documentary when the fashion collection hit the runway in January for LV's 2019 fall-winter men's wear show. In addition to the fashion pieces paying homage to Jackson, the backdrop of the fashion show mimicked his ""Billie Jean"" music video.

“My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist,” the statement continued. “It referred only to his public life that we all know and to his legacy that has influenced a whole generation of artists and designers.”

Louis Vuitton’s chairman added that the fashion brand finds the allegations against Jackson “deeply troubling and disturbing.”"
26,https://www.reuters.com/article/us-people-michael-jackson-louis-vuitton-idUSKCN1QW2EL,"['Reuters Editorial', 'Min Read']",2019-03-15 23:59:48+00:00,"PARIS (Reuters) - French fashion house Louis Vuitton has pulled Michael Jackson-themed items from its 2019 summer menswear collection following a documentary about alleged child abuse by the late pop star.

Logos of the Louis Vuitton brand are seen outside a Louis Vuitton store in Bordeaux, southwestern France, October 4, 2016. Picture taken October 4, 2016. REUTERS/Regis Duvignau

The collection was shown in January at the Paris Fashion week and is due to hit stores in June, but a Louis Vuitton spokeswoman said the Jackson-themed items would not be put up for sale.

Louis Vuitton said that at the time of the event, it was not aware of the “Leaving Neverland” documentary, in which two adult men say they were befriended by Jackson and abused by him in the early 1990s.

“I am aware that in light of this documentary, the show has caused emotional reactions. I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights,” Louis Vuitton menswear designer Virgil Abloh said in a statement.

Abloh, an American designer who was hired by Vuitton in March 2018, said his intention for this show had been to refer to Jackson as a pop culture artist.

The documentary has caused a backlash against Jackson’s legacy, as some radio stations stopped playing his music and an episode of “The Simpsons” cartoon show featuring his voice is being pulled from future broadcasts.

Jackson’s family has called the documentary and news coverage of the accusations a “public lynching” and said he was “100 percent innocent”.

“We find the allegations in the documentary deeply troubling,” Louis Vuitton CEO Michael Burke said, adding that the firm is fully committed to advocating the cause of child welfare.

Louis Vuitton is the world’s biggest luxury brand, with annual sales of more than 10 billion euros, and is the biggest revenue driver for its parent company, French luxury goods group LVMH.

The menswear unit is a relatively small part of its business and pulling the Jackson-themed items should not have a major impact on the label."
27,https://www.independent.co.uk/arts-entertainment/music/news/michael-jackson-paris-daughter-leaving-neverland-child-abuse-twitter-a8824156.html,['Jack Shepherd'],2019-03-15 09:32:50+00:00,"Paris Jackson has spoken about the renewed allegations faced by her father, Michael, saying it’s “not her role” to defend him

The “Thriller” singer was recently the subject of Leaving Neverland, a documentary which centres on two men, James Safechuckand Wade Robson, who claim Jackson molested them as children.

The Jackson estate has called the documentary a “public lynching” and are suing HBO – who co-produced the film with Channel 4 – for $100 million. Jackon’s nephew, Taj, has made several public appearances defending the singer.

We’ll tell you what’s true. You can form your own view. From 15p €0.18 $0.18 USD 0.27 a day, more exclusives, analysis and extras.

Shape Created with Sketch. Leaving Neverland – photos show Michael Jackson with his accusers Show all 9 left Created with Sketch. right Created with Sketch. Shape Created with Sketch. Leaving Neverland – photos show Michael Jackson with his accusers 1/9 Michael Jackson with accuser Wade Robson Sundance Insitute 2/9 Accuser Wade Robson meeting Michael Jackson for the first time Channel 4 3/9 Michael Jackson with the Robson family Channel 4 4/9 Michael Jackson at the home of accuser James Safechuck Channel 4 5/9 Dan Reed approached the Michael Jackson documentary with 'all the scepticism and rigorousness that I would approach a story about a terrorist attack' Channel 4 6/9 Michael Jackson leaves the courtroom on a break at the Santa Barbara County Courthouse for the second day of closing arguments in his child molestation trial in Santa Maria, California, 2005 AFP/Getty 7/9 Michael Jackson accuser Wade Robson Channel 4 8/9 James Safechuck, another of Jackson's accusers Channel 4 9/9 Leaving Neverland director Dan Reed Channel 4 1/9 Michael Jackson with accuser Wade Robson Sundance Insitute 2/9 Accuser Wade Robson meeting Michael Jackson for the first time Channel 4 3/9 Michael Jackson with the Robson family Channel 4 4/9 Michael Jackson at the home of accuser James Safechuck Channel 4 5/9 Dan Reed approached the Michael Jackson documentary with 'all the scepticism and rigorousness that I would approach a story about a terrorist attack' Channel 4 6/9 Michael Jackson leaves the courtroom on a break at the Santa Barbara County Courthouse for the second day of closing arguments in his child molestation trial in Santa Maria, California, 2005 AFP/Getty 7/9 Michael Jackson accuser Wade Robson Channel 4 8/9 James Safechuck, another of Jackson's accusers Channel 4 9/9 Leaving Neverland director Dan Reed Channel 4

Paris has since praised Taj and said that it’s “not her role” to defend her father. Responding to a fan on Twitter, she wrote: “There’s nothing I can say that hasn’t already been said in regards to defence. Taj is doing a perfect job on his own and I support him. But that’s not my role.

“I’m just trying to get everyone to chill out and go with the flow, be mellow and think about the bigger picture. That’s me.”

Paris has previously addressed the documentary on social media, writing: “Do you really think that it’s possible to tear his name down? Do you truly believe they stand a chance?”

Since the documentary was broadcast, radio stations around the world have begun dropping Jackson’s music, while The Simpsons producers have removed an episode featuring Jackson from circulation. Read all about the fallout from the film here."
28,https://metro.co.uk/2019/03/15/michael-jacksons-brother-tito-calls-leaving-neverland-documentary-ludicrous-unfair-family-sues-creators-8910045/,['Tobi Akingbade'],2019-03-15 00:00:00,"Leaving Neverland documentary left people calling for Michael’s music to be banned (Picture: x17agency, Getty)

Former Jackson 5 singer Tito Jackson has called the documentary Leaving Neverland ‘crazy’, ‘ludicrous’ and ‘unfair’ as the Michael Jackson estate sues the creators of the show.

The documentary – broadcasted on HBO and Channel 4 – explores claims made against Michael by Wade Robson and James Safechuck, accusing him of sexually abusing them when they were children.

Some viewers were left ‘disturbed’ by the graphic detail included in the divisive documentary and turned against Michael after it aired.

Tito was spotted at LAX and had some stuff to say (Picture: X17online.com)

The Michael Jackson estate and his family have denied the allegations and claim the documentary is ‘not true’. Jackson’s estate is suing HBO for $100million over the controversial doc.

Tito, who was spotted in LAX on Thursday, told a TMZ reporter that it wasn’t right to mute his late brother’s music based on the words of his accusers.

Advertisement

Advertisement

‘I think that’s so unfair being that there hasn’t been a trial or nothing of the sort,’ the 65-year-old said before later adding: ‘It’s kind of crazy and ludicrous to me.’

On how he was coping with the aftermath of the documentary, he honoured his late father and music manager Joe Jackson and answered: ‘Well, I’m doing what I do. Like my father always says, “I have a life to live and I’m continuing to do what I do”’.

Tito performed with Michael in The Jackson 5 as children (Picture: X17online.com)

Meanwhile, Michael’s only daughter Paris has said it ‘isn’t her role’ to defend her father against the backlash since the documentary aired in the UK and the US.

She also praised Michael’s nephew Taj Jackson for speaking so openly of his support for the late star.

Paris was seen venting on Twitter after pictures circulated in the press of her out with her boyfriend in New Orleans.

When one fan suggested the interest in her has been raised because she hasn’t yet publicly responded to the documentary, Paris tweeted in response: ‘There’s nothing i can say that hasn’t already been said in regards to defense. taj is doing a perfect job on his own.

‘i support him. but that’s not my role. i’m just tryna get everyone to chill out and go with the flow, be mellow and think about the bigger picture. that’s me. (sic)’

Paris and Taj Jackson have made reference to Michael’s legacy (Picture: Rex)

While Paris hasn’t commented on Leaving Neverland, she has hit back at claims she was worried about the documentary ‘ruining her acting career’ and defended her dad’s ‘good heart’.

Advertisement

Advertisement

One user tweeted Paris telling her that her father’s ‘legacy’ has now been ‘ruined and his name smeared forever’ because of Leaving Neverland.

She replied: ‘Yeah they do that to everyone with a good heart and tries to make a difference, but do you really think that it’s possible to tear his name down?

‘Like do you truly believe they stand a chance? Relax and have peace.’

Taj, meanwhile, has been protesting that his uncle Michael – who died in 2009 – is innocent. He has claimed Robson is ‘100%’ lying about his allegations and accused Robson of ‘trying to make money’ from Jackson.

Leaving Neverland’s director Dan Reed has show his support for Robson and Safechuck and debunked suggestions they are lying.

He also revealed the two men were never paid for their involvement and had no ‘financial interest’ in the documentary.

Got a showbiz story? If you've got a story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk Entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.

MORE: Kim Kardashian’s home might be a soulless pit but her wardrobe is giving us life

MORE: Kelsey Grammer wants new Frasier reboot to see him have a bust-up with brother Niles"
29,https://www.nme.com/news/music/louis-vuitton-to-remove-items-inspired-by-michael-jackson-from-new-collection-2462276,['Nick Reilly'],2019-03-15 12:41:11+00:00,"“My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist.""

Renowned fashion house Louis Vuitton has said it will remove items from a new collection that “directly feature” Michael Jackson, after the pop icon was accused of child sex abuse in new documentary Leaving Neverland.

The collection debuted at a menswear show in January and featured several items that paid tribute to the star, ahead of going on sale later this year. They included a number of flag-print items inspired by ‘We Are The World’, a jacket inspired by the one Jackson wore in the video for ‘Beat It’ and a t-shirt printed with an image of the singer’s famous black loafers and white socks.

Other items included a hoodie, shirt, jumper and trousers featuring cartoon characters from Jackson’s 1978 movie The Wiz, and a shendyt inspired by the one Jackson wore in the video for ‘Remember the Time’.

The collection premiered at a fashion show in Paris where guests received invitations on a gem-encrusted glove similar to Jackson’s. It also took place in a tent inspired by the ‘Billie Jean’ video and featured his music played at several moments through the show.

Sharethrough (Mobile)

In a statement released on Thursday, Louis Vuitton’s men’s artistic director Virgil Abloh said: “I am aware that in light of this documentary the show has caused emotional reactions. I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights.

“My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist. It referred only to his public life that we all know and to his legacy that has influenced a whole generation of artists and designers.”

While Louis Vuitton say they were unaware of the allegations at the time, they told the Guardian that the claims in the documentary had caused the “greatest pain”.

Leaving Neverland debuted in the UK last week and featured the allegations of James Safechuck and Wade Robson, who both allege that they were abused by Jackson as children.

The film prompted a huge backlash from Jackson’s fans – who held a demonstration outside Channel 4’s London HQ on the day of broadcast after the broadcaster refused to pull Leaving Neverland from its schedule.

Yesterday, Jackson’s daughter Paris also said that it is “not her role” to defend her late father against the allegations. She instead praised the response of cousin Taj, who plans to defend his uncle in a forthcoming documentary."
30,https://www.billboard.com/articles/columns/hip-hop/8502252/the-game-michael-jackson-instagram,['Michael Saponara'],None,"With the dust settling after allegations of child molestation were made against Michael Jackson in HBO's Leaving Neverland documentary last week, many artists have given their opinion about the highly charged accusations. The Game became the latest to do so on Tuesday (March 12), as the Compton rapper defended MJ's legacy in an Instagram post.

""Let The King Rest,"" he wrote, along with a middle-finger emoji. The photo features the King of Pop with his mouth covered and a couple of strong messages that read ""Innocent"" and ""Facts don't lie, People do."" Game also changed his IG profile picture to the graphic used in support of Jackson.

Juice WRLD took to Twitter on Suday to share his thoughts on the late pop star's legacy as well. ""Rip to the legend Michael Jackson let the legend rest and his legacy stand,"" the Chicago native wrote. In wake of the controversial doc's airing, Jackson's music catalog has seen a bump in sales and streams.

See The Game's post below."
31,https://www.freep.com/story/news/investigations/2019/03/14/lori-loughlin-college-admissions-michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-catholic-abuse-denial-outrage/3152770002/,"['Alia E. Dastagir', 'Published P.M. Et March']",2019-03-14 00:00:00,"CLOSE The college admissions scam involving Lori Loughlin and Felicity Huffman shows how some rich families use a “side door” to game an already unfair education system. Just the FAQs, USA TODAY

Americans are outraged after the Justice Department charged 50 people — including wealthy CEOs and actresses Lori Loughlin and Felicity Huffman — with paying bribes to secure their children's college admission. But does the idea that money equals merit for some college applicants surprise anyone?

Some radio stations stopped playing Michael Jackson music after HBO's documentary Leaving Neverlandfeatured two men who allege Jackson abused them as boys. But accusations against Jackson go back to the early '90s. Similarly, R. Kelly faced boycott protests after Lifetime's Surviving R. Kelly aired, featuring women who accuse him of abuse, even though allegations of such behavior plagued the singer throughout his career.

In August, many people found it shocking that a grand jury said Catholic Church leaders protected more than 300 ""predator priests"" in six dioceses across Pennsylvania. But the Catholic sexual abuse scandal first broke wide in Boston in 2002.

In some ways, the only thing shocking about these events is that they're shocking at all.

It raises the question: How does a bad thing go from being an open secret to being the center of national debate?

Actress Lori Loughlin arrives at the TV Land Icon Awards in Santa Monica, Calif. on April 10, 2016. Loughlin was charged with fraud and conspiracy on March 12, 2019, along with dozens of others in a scheme that according to federal prosecutors saw wealthy parents pay bribes to get their children into some of the nation’s top colleges. (Photo: RICH FURY, Invision via AP)

""Few people in or associated with higher education believe that it constitutes a fair system,"" said Amy Lippert, a professor of American history at the University of Chicago. ""The legacy system ... provides built-in advantages for the children and grandchildren of elite university alumni, and wealthy families employ their wealth to secure a variety of advantages for their children, from private tutors and coaches to expensive test-prep classes and summer programs or unpaid internship opportunities. This latest scandal, with its attendant arrests and ample documentation, simply channels that latent anger, sparking the powder keg of simmering resentment among everyone who feels the injustice of it.""

Deny, deny, deny ...

But when does it go from being latent to blatant? How long do we have to hear about something wrong before we acknowledge it? Believe it? Care about it?

""A long time,"" said psychologist Kate Roberts.

Denial, she said, is a strong force in our everyday lives. It's part of the way we cope with negativity around us. Roberts likened it to therapy. Just as therapists repeat key points to clients before they accept them — the public needs to hear the same accusations over and over.

""It has to be repeated again and again when it's something we don't want to see about our ourselves or someone else important to us,"" she said. ""We don't want to hear the message until it's absolutely essential for us to hear it.""

Catholics don't want to think their church protected pedophiles. Michael Jackson fans don't want to associate music that brought joy at weddings and school dances with accusations of child molestation (Jackson was never convicted and his estate continues to deny all allegations). White people don't want to believe that police protect them but abuse black people. Cinephiles don't want to admit that the men behind their favorite movies sexually exploited women in the process.

CLOSE Cardinals attending Pope Francis' summit on preventing clergy sex abuse have called for a new culture of accountability in the Catholic Church to punish bishops and religious superiors who fail to protect their flocks from predator priests. (Feb. 22) AP

""I think that we have faith that there's some integrity in the world,"" Roberts said. ""We have some faith that there's some truth and compassion in the church. We don't want to see the side that is exposed in these kinds of scandals. So the initial reaction is, 'no, it's not true, it can't be like that. If it's like that what does that mean? How does that affect me?'"" ... These questions that people don't want to ask themselves come to the surface when something bad happens that is out of their control.""

It's normal to want to distance ourselves from atrocities we read in the news each day. We try to tell ourselves it could never happen to our children, to someone we love, to ourselves. It's why rape victims are often so readily blamed for their behavior after an assault. We want to believe we can control whether that happens to us or not.

In American culture, particularly, there's a baked-in skepticism because we ""don't like the thought of being taken or of being naive,"" Lippert said. ""People have a tendency to sit back and wait and see whether accusations are going to be supported by other evidence.""

Experts say there are several factors at play when skepticism gives way to acceptance and eventually outrage:

Cause célèbre, because celebs

The Justice Department indicted 50 people in the college admissions scandal. But most of us are fixated on two names: Loughlin and Huffman. It's entirely possible this scandal would not be trending on Google and splashed across TV news without them.

""Fame can cut both ways: It can enable celebrities to bring attention to worthwhile causes or to abuses of more vulnerable populations, as in the Time’s Up Movement — but it can also make them the most readily identifiable lightning rods for larger scandals, as in the pay-to-play admissions indictments,"" said Lippert, who also teaches in the Center for Gender and Sexuality Studies.

Sexual exploitation in Hollywood and casting couch rumors are as old as cinema itself, but it took actresses willing to be named, such as Ashley Judd, coming out against mogul Harvey Weinstein to spark widespread outrage. Sexual harassment and assault are even older, but many victims had never shared their stories publicly before #MeToo. Begun more than a decade ago by activist Tarana Burke, #MeToo was meant to help young women, especially women of color, who have been sexually abused, assaulted, exploited or harassed. It was 2017 and a tweet by Alyssa Milano that sent it trending.

Specifics stick

Wealthy students have long benefited from advantages in getting into elite universities — with even the legal means, such as ""legacy,"" perceived by many as unfair.

Daniel Golden, author of the 2006 book The Price of Admission: How America’s Ruling Class Buys Its Way into Elite Colleges — and Who Gets Left Outside the Gates, exposed how wealthy parents use charitable contributions to secure their child a spot. He reported that real estate developer Charles Kushner pledged $2.5 million to Harvard University in 1998. Shortly after, his son Jared Kushner was admitted to the school.

But the specificity around Tuesday's federal indictment turns something obscure into something distinct. It has names, numbers and explicit explanation of flat-out bribery. Such details can change people's minds, experts say.

""Most people are very concrete. Especially in our day in age, information is coming in snippets very, very quickly. The more concrete evidence you can offer the more real it's going to become,"" Roberts said.

See it to believe it

Imagery has a major impact on our belief, says Lippert, author of Consuming Identities: Visual Culture in Nineteenth-Century San Francisco.

""Video recordings and photographs of assaults and injustices have a unique power to galvanize the public, and in turn, lawmakers, because of a long history of public fascination with and faith in visual media as a reliable documentation of actual events,"" Lippert said.

It's why cellphone and dashcam video has helped propel the Black Lives Matter movement, after decades of African-Americans trying to call attention to police brutality. It's why seeing R. Kelly's alleged victims, tears streaming down their faces, is harder to ignore than a printed news report. Seeing Jackson's accusers display the jewelry he gifted them seems to bolster their accusations. Bill Cosby rumors were often dismissed as just that. Then 35 women appeared on a New York magazine cover — a single, powerful image that felt impossible to ignore.

From the HBO documentary ""Leaving Neverland."" (Photo: Handout)

""Some of this has to do with changing values, and the technology that can sometimes assist that social transformation,"" Lippert said. ""Twitter, phone cameras, and other forms of social media or outreach to journalists ... can empower victims of sexual harassment or police brutality to record their experiences or reach out to share their stories. Through the power of the internet ... one woman’s story of sexual assault at the hands of Harvey Weinstein becomes multiplied to the point that the scale of his abuse becomes almost impossible for journalists — or anyone else — to ignore.""

With the college admissions scandal, Loughlin's daughter, social media influencer Olivia Jade, put an image in people's minds.

""People think, yes, this has happened before, but images come into play,"" Lippert said. ""Lori Loughlin's daughter is a social media star and they showed a clip ... where she says she's much more interested in going to parties than going to school. The imagery of that further enrages families who worked hard to get into those schools and get an education. It adds fuel to the fire.""

How something applies to our everyday lives is also part of what fuels outrage. Many American families have kids that are approaching college age, and they can see clearly that the system favors the wealthy.

""When the crime is close to home, the tipping point of belief has been hit,"" said psychologist Kim Metcalfe. ""It occurs when less wealthy parents see that the cheating and lying of others harms students who may have lost out on acceptance letters. This is especially true when it is their children who miss out on opportunities.""

Getting out of the outrage cycle

To avoid falling into the trap of reflexive deniability, Roberts says more people must think independently.

""It's healthy to question information, but not to ignore data. Take the pedophiles in the church. There's a lot of data there, so to be skeptical in the face of that data is not healthy. But to automatically assume something because the people in your town believe it is not healthy either."" she said. ""There needs to be a process of evaluation, to ask, 'does this add up? does this make sense?' Through that process people can come to a decision that they feel they can own.""

But the ability to take time, to evaluate and to apply logic can be difficult in the social media age.

“Social media is essentially dialing up the volume on moral outrage by ... making it less costly to express,"" said Molly Crocket, a professor of psychology at Yale who studies social decision-making told USA TODAY in May.

Our recent expressions of outrage around topics long discussed may be a reflection of changes in the things we care about. It may also be a reaction, Roberts said, to the current political moment.

""Right now there's a very tense climate in the country — people are more likely to be outraged,"" she said. ""Whether it's R. Kelly or the priests in the Midwest or the college scandal, any of those things are going to be magnified because people are already on edge.""

Read or Share this story: https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/investigations/2019/03/14/lori-loughlin-college-admissions-michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-catholic-abuse-denial-outrage/3152770002/"
32,https://www.indiewire.com/2019/03/leaving-neverland-surviving-r-kelly-documentaries-courts-1202048620/,['Liz Shannon Miller'],2019-03-05 17:00:04+00:00,"Why documentaries that center on the victims, not the celebrities, can lead to real social change.

Stories from sexual assault survivors often remain untold; justice can be even more rare. However, there’s a spate of documentaries that sprang from accusations against famous men, and they could have significant impact beyond the court of public opinion.

The six-part “Surviving R. Kelly” premiered on Lifetime January 3, and the two-part “Leaving Neverland,” premiered on HBO March 2. The series share a topic — a famous musician who used his power to engineer repeated sexual assaults on underage victims. However, what’s more noteworthy is their stories don’t focus on the celebrity; they emphasize on letting survivors speak out. It’s a creative decision with the potential to create real impact on the future perception of these cases.

“We are experiencing a golden age of documentary-making,” filmmaker Joe Berlinger told IndieWire via email, “and as investigative print journalism has been decimated by the impact of the internet and the line in television news has gotten blurry between ratings-driven entertainment vs. journalism, many stories of social injustice are only being told by independent documentarians.”

Lifetime

R. Kelly’s first appearance in court over sexual misconduct allegations stretches back to 1996, and reported pieces about his treatment of women had been in the mainstream press since July 2017. However, since “Surviving R. Kelly,” his music has been pulled from radio stations, former collaborators have apologized for working with him, his record deal has been put on hold, and he is the subject of criminal investigations in three different states.

Immediately after the release of “Surviving R. Kelly,” Lifetime senior VP of unscripted development and programming Brie Miranda Bryant told IndieWire that reaction to the miniseries had “now transcended the doc. I mean, we had always said that the survivors’ stories never started or stopped with the documentary, by any means. But now I think that this documentary has become a catalyst for a larger conversation that this country needed to have around sexual violence. … Not only has this become a national conversation, but it’s now a global conversation. I don’t think we could have ever expected that.”

The “Surviving R. Kelly” producers said impacting Kelly’s career wasn’t their intention. “From the beginning, [R. Kelly] was not so much the focus, but… these women and allowing them to have the platform…to be heard,” Bryant said. “That’s always been the driver of this ship — providing that platform, more than anything else. We feel that we did accomplish that.”

No game-changing documentary broke the Bill Cosby case; it took years of accusations before he faced charges. However, lawyer Gloria Allred, who represented many Cosby accusers, told IndieWire that her efforts to put her clients’ names and faces into the public sphere, via press conferences and a 2015 “Dateline” special, helped not just with the court of public opinion, but with those working to uncover the truth.

Clayton Chase

“Ultimately, I do think that it had some impact and certainly was of assistance to investigators, because they could see the number of women and the type of women and the names of the women who were making the accusations,” Allred said. “And that would be important in identifying for them who else might have been impacted by Mr. Cosby. Originally, for example, the prosecution in Pennsylvania declined to prosecute the first time when it was only Andrea Constand who was alleged to be the victim.”

The R. Kelly documentary, Allred noted, created “a powerful incentive” for prosecutors to pursue legal action against the singer. “Much of it was due to that Lifetime documentary, in the sense that they now knew there were multiple accusers who were willing to speak up and out on this,” she said. “And so there were that many, it was likely that there were more who would also be in the position of saying that he did it to them as well. And I think that in fact is exactly what happened, because I’m being contacted by a number of people who were not in the documentary who were also making accusations against Mr. Kelly. Would that have happened without the documentary? Unlikely.”

Allred compared viewers watching survivors tell their stories on screen to the experience of “jurors in a court of law. They are able to assess who’s saying it and their credibility and whether they believe them or not.”

With multiple survivors on screen, she added, “the more it is likely that the public will reach an opinion, usually in support of the survivors. That may not be the case, and generally isn’t where the first one comes out or the second or third one — when I said comes out, [I mean] speaks about their experience. But the more that comes out, then comes the question, well, are all these women lying, or is the accused the one who is lying when he denied it?”

Bryant noted that one reason “Surviving R. Kelly” made an impact when previous reported pieces hadn’t was that “there’s power in numbers. … The one thing in the very beginning, when we only had a couple of people, we realized that we needed to bring more and more into the fold to help us tell this story.” All told, 54 people were interviewed.

“It’s one thing to read an article,” said executive producer Jesse Daniels. “It’s another to see our survivors tell their stories. You see the emotion on their face[s] and the pain that they’re reliving. It’s powerful. I think that’s something that’s really struck a chord.”

Allred added, “Depending on what they say and who said it, and if there is also some corroboration of what they say, it definitely could have an impact in the court of public opinion. And also on the willingness of prosecutors to consider whether or not there should be a criminal investigation, and whether or not charges should ultimately be filed against the accused.”

Berlinger said he’s often witnessed the impact a documentary can have on an ongoing case or public issue. “Often politicians and/or stakeholders in an issue won’t take action or do the right thing until there is public pressure,” he wrote. “Our own ‘Paradise Lost Trilogy’ whipped up huge international support, which in turn caused pressure to release the West Memphis Three from death row for Damien Echols and life-without-parole sentences for Jason Baldwin and Jesse Miskelley Jr. My film ‘Intent to Destroy’ has raised the dialogue about Turkish denial of the Armenian Genocide. ‘The Cove’ had an amazing impact on dolphin slaughter in Japan. ‘Inconvenient Truth’ with taking action on Climate Change. The list goes on and on.”

Sundance / HBO

Many aspects of “Leaving Neverland” are horrifying to watch, including the fact that Wade Robson and James Safechuck weren’t the first survivors to come forward. Accusations of inappropriate behavior against Jackson first surfaced in 1993 — but Jackson dodged those charges, in part thanks to the testimony of Robson and Safechuck.

“Leaving Neverland” gives both men the opportunity to correct the record and discuss the full truth about their relationships with Jackson, and it’s staggering. Since Jackson is deceased, he can’t sue the “Leaving Neverland” producers for libel — although the Michael Jackson estate is suing HBO for $100 million. In his review, IndieWire’s David Ehrlich wrote that after watching “Leaving Neverland,” “You’ll never listen to Michael Jackson the same way again. In fact, you may never listen to Michael Jackson again at all.”

It remains to be seen how “Leaving Neverland” will impact Jackson’s legacy, but the attention it’s received supports the rise of similar documentaries. Allred felt that “people will have to make a choice about whether they’re going to appear or not. And I do think that some due diligence should be done by the producers… But I’m optimistic that there’s more attention paid by the criminal justice system. And if there are good ratings for documentaries like this, that as many eyeballs are watching, that’s going to encourage others to make this kind of documentary as well.”

That’s a good thing, she added, “because many of these women have never been able to share their truth publicly. Never felt comfortable doing it, didn’t have a vehicle to do it. And now they do feel comfortable and they have a vehicle to do it. And I do think there’s feeling in our culture that that is the right thing to do.”

Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news! Sign up for our Email Newsletters here."
33,http://www.hollywood.com/general/louis-vuitton-pull-michael-jackson-inspired-clothing-amid-backlash-60746095/,"['Hollywood.Com Staff', 'Kim Everman']",2019-03-15 07:31:18+00:00,"Louis Vuitton has pulled its collection of Michael Jackson-inspired clothing following backlash amid sexual abuse accusations surrounding the late singer.

Artistic director Virgil Abloh’s fall showcase for the luxury French fashion house took place in January (19), and featured a number of nods to the King of Pop, such as gloves, black leather loafers and a T-shirt with the image of the star’s dancing feet.

However, a week after the catwalk presentation, Dan Reed’s documentary Leaving Neverland premiered at the Sundance Film Festival, with the film featuring James Safechuck and Wade Robson making a string of allegations of sexual misconduct and abuse against Jackson, which reportedly took place when they were young boys.

Louis Vuitton faced backlash for its Jackson-inspired collection amid the controversy surrounding Leaving Neverland, and now Abloh has issued a statement making his position clear.

“I am aware that in light of this documentary the show has caused emotional reactions,” he said in a statement to WWD. “I strictly condemn any form of child abuse, violence or infringement against any human rights.

“My intention for this show was to refer to Michael Jackson as a pop culture artist. It referred only to his public life that we all know and to his legacy that has influenced a whole generation of artists and designers.”

The fashion house is now planning to pull any pieces “that directly (feature) Michael Jackson elements” from production, with the collection that goes to stores “purely reflecting the true values of the brand and of our artistic director”.

Michael Burke, the chairman and chief executive officer of Louis Vuitton, added in his own statement: “We find the allegations in the documentary deeply troubling and disturbing. Child safety and welfare is of utmost importance to Louis Vuitton. We are fully committed to advocating this cause.”"
34,https://www.chicagotribune.com/suburbs/libertyville/news/ct-lbr-column-lenhoff-tl-0321-story.html,['Pat Lenhoff'],2019-03-12 17:00:00,"Wow, my mind still is spinning after watching the HBO documentary “Leaving Neverland” about the story of two men who allege they were sexually abused as children by pop superstar Michael Jackson.

It was an intense four hours and difficult to watch. I see why HBO broke it into two segments. I also watched Oprah’s post-documentary program, featuring both men, the film’s director and an audience of abuse survivors.

Everyone knows sexual abuse exists, but it remains another issue among many until it directly affects us. But watching the HBO documentary had me in knots for so many reasons.

I grew up with Michael Jackson, from the early Jackson 5 days to his stellar career as an adult solo performer. He was an adorable child entertainer and compellingly innovative as an adult. Although some weren’t enamored with his persona as an adult, I was among the vast majority who found him irresistibly talented in his music and performance skills.

There was no denying he got quirkier as he aged, both in his behavior and his physical appearance. A frequent discussion among fans was confusion about why he felt compelled to keep altering his facial structure. He was a cute child who had grown into a good-looking man and yet, that didn’t seem to be his own opinion as his face continued to change over the years with troubling results.

For fans like me, it was sad to think he didn’t see himself the way we saw him. And instead, he continued on a seemingly obsessive quest for something different.

But when whispers about predatory behavior came out, many fans like myself took umbrage. The man seemed vulnerable, needing those of us who thought we understood him to speak out in defense. So we did, explaining him as someone who never had a childhood and was trying to recreate it now that he had the control and money to do so.

While rumors of predatory behaviors, such as sleepovers with young boys, convinced some people there was truth to those rumors, his strong fan base proclaimed him as a good guy albeit misunderstood.

But now, my denial has vanished. I’ve reluctantly joined the ranks of those who found him guilty as charged. As I watched the documentary unfold, I could see my own son — same age as the two men — full of charm and looking adorable, wearing black parachute pants, doing the moonwalk and loving the “Thriller” video.

I watched the two mothers being interviewed wondering, as a mother myself, how they allowed some of those things to occur, yet also realizing the film’s portrayal of the power of fame and trust they had with Michael.

Society may never think of Michael Jackson in the same way again. Or, we may have short memories as has become today’s norm. The only thing I’m left with is how terribly sad I am for victims of abuse and how difficult a task it is to protect them while also acknowledging that everyone is innocent until proven guilty.

Pat Lenhoff is a freelance columnist for Pioneer Press.

viewfromvh@yahoo.com"
35,https://www.latimes.com/entertainment/tv/la-et-st-michael-jackson-documentary-oprah-20190301-story.html,['Meredith Blake'],2019-03-01 00:00:00,"“For me, this moment transcends Michael Jackson. It is much bigger than any one person. It is a moment in time that allows us so see this societal corruption; it’s like a scourge on humanity,” Winfrey said Wednesday. “It’s happening right now; it’s happening in families. We know it’s happening in churches and in schools and sports teams everywhere. If it gets you, our audience, to see how it happens, then, some good will come of it.” (She was not available for further comment.)"
36,https://www.cbsnews.com/news/michael-jackson-family-leaving-neverland-controversy/,['Brian Pascus'],None,"Ahead of HBO's upcoming documentary ""Leaving Neverland,"" which premieres this weekend and includes allegations of sexual abuse by music legend Michael Jackson against two young boys, Jackson family members are speaking out in the late pop star's defense.

Michael Jackson's brothers Jackie, Tito, Marlon, and nephew Taj sat down with ""CBS This Morning"" co-host Gayle King to dispute the allegations raised in the film.

""I know my brother,"" Jackie Jackson said in the interview, which airs Wednesday on ""CBS This Morning."" ""He's my little brother. I know my brother. He's not like that.""

In ""Leaving Neverland,"" two men, James Safechuck and Wade Robson, claim Michael Jackson sexually abused them when they were children.

On Tuesday, ""Leaving Neverland"" director Dan Reed told ""CBS This Morning,"" ""This isn't a film about Michael Jackson.""

""It's a film about Wade Robson and James Safechuck, two little boys to whom this dreadful thing happened long ago. It's the story of their coming to terms with that over two decades and the story of their families,"" Reed said. ""As far as including other eyewitnesses to that, there was no one else in the room, I don't believe, when Wade was being molested by Michael or when James was having sex with Michael.""

Members of the Jackson family have denounced Safechuck and Robson as ""opportunists"" and ""admitted liars."" His estate sued HBO last week, calling the documentary a ""one-sided marathon of unvetted propaganda to shamelessly exploit an innocent man no longer here to defend himself."" The documentary did not seek comment from the Jackson family or estate.

Michael Jackson's family on ""Leaving Neverland"" accusers: ""It's all about money""

Prior to his death in June 2009, Michael Jackson faced separate allegations of child molestation in 1993 and 2003. In 1995, Jackson reached a $23 million settlement with the family of Jordan Chandler. In 2005, Jackson was acquitted by a California jury on charges of alleged abuse of a 13-year-old.

The new allegations in the documentary have now brought the spotlight back onto members of the Jackson family, who are speaking out to defend his legacy. His brothers shared stardom as members of the Jackson 5 and were inducted with Michael into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in 1997.

Below is a brief primer on members of the Jackson family and what they have been up to since Michael passed away nearly 10 years ago.

Jackie Jackson — brother

Jackie, 67, is the oldest of the Jackson brothers. He resides and performs in Las Vegas. According to his official website, Jackie has remained active in managing Michael's estate and in 2010 produced a reality show, ""The Jacksons: A Family Dynasty"" that was broadcast on the A&E Network for one season in late 2009.

Tito Jackson — brother

Tito, 65, is still a performer. In 2015 he starred in a reality TV program about his three sons, ""The Jacksons: Next Generation,"" that lasted six episodes on the Lifetime Network. In 2016, he released a solo album entitled ""Tito Time."" He has been touring for the past year with B.B. King's Blues Band.

Jermaine Jackson — brother

Jermaine, 64, has been active in both reality television and publishing. In 2011, Jermaine released a book about his brother titled, ""You Are Not Alone: Michael, Through a Brother's Eyes."" In August 2018, Jermaine announced plans to marry his fiancee, Maday Velazquez, who is 40 years his junior and would be the singer's fourth wife.

Marlon Jackson — brother

Unlike his siblings, Marlon, 61, Michael's older brother by one year, did not return to performing after the Jackson 5 released their last album in 1989. Marlon reportedly was involved in plans to build a tourist destination at the port of Bagadry in Nigeria, which would have doubled as a slave-port memorial and Jackson 5 museum. The project does not appear to have proceeded beyond its February 2009 announcement.

Michael Jackson's family (L to R): Taj, Jackie, Marlon and Tito Jackson sit down with ""CBS This Morning"" co-host Gayle King CBS News

Randy Jackson — brother

Not to be confused with Randy Jackson of ""American Idol,"" Michael's younger brother Randy, 57, is the second-youngest of the famous siblings. He did not officially join the Jackson 5 until the mid-1970s.

Taj Jackson — nephew

Tito's son Taj has sung in the pop group 3T with his brothers Taryll and TJ since the 1980s. Taj went public in 2013 with his own allegations of having suffered sexual abuse. He has spoken about how his uncle Michael Jackson supported him through the ordeal.

Michael Jackson's nephew says his uncle's ""naiveté was his downfall""

LaToya Jackson — sister

LaToya, 61, Michael's older sister by one year, is no stranger to the spotlight, having released several solo albums and starred in the reality television show ""Life with LaToya"" which aired for two seasons in 2013-2014 on the OWN Network, Oprah Winfrey's television channel.

(L-R): Sisters Janet Jackson and LaToya Jackson, and mom Katherine Jackson. Getty

Janet Jackson — sister



One of the best-selling recording artist of the 1990s, Janet Jackson, 52, is easily the most famous member of the Jackson music family besides Michael. She made headlines in 2004 for her ""wardrobe malfunction"" during a halftime performance at Super Bowl XXXVIII. In 2017, Janet gave birth to her first child, son Eissa, and in 2018 it was announced that Janet would be inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame. She's planning a Las Vegas residency for the summer of 2019.

Katherine Jackson — mother

The Jackson family matriarch is still going strong at age 88. The family said she's doing well despite reports she suffered a stroke last year. The family patriarch, Joseph ""Joe"" Jackson, died of pancreatic cancer in June 2018.

Michael Jackson's children — Prince, Paris and Prince Michael II

Michael Jackson's children (L-R): Prince Michael in 2017; Paris in 2017; and Prince Michael II in 2013. Getty

Jackson's three children were very young when the singer passed away in 2009. Since then, older son Prince Michael, 21, has involved himself in the Dee Dee Jackson Foundation, which supports children who have suffered trauma. Daughter Paris, 20, has had a successful acting and modeling career but revealed in a 2017 interview with Rolling Stone that she suffered from depression and drug addiction and attempted suicide in 2013. The youngest, Prince Michael II, once known as Blanket, is now 17 and goes by Bigi. He has remained out of the public eye."
37,https://www.cbsnews.com/news/michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-accusers-detail-how-alleged-abuse-began-this-is-how-we-show-each-other-our-love-today-2019-02-28/,[],2019-02-28 00:00:00,"Before Wade Robson even met Michael Jackson, the pop superstar was a giant in his mind.

""I saw the 'Making of [Michael Jackson's] Thriller.' Just instantly became obsessed. I wanted to be just like him. I dressed like him every day, I had my hair permed to look like him and all that stuff.""

James Safechuck met Jackson around his ninth birthday while shooting a Pepsi commercial.

""I wasn't necessarily a big fan before I met him and then when I got the commercial ... when you see me meet him is actually my first time seeing him. At that point, I was pretty excited. It was otherworldly, I guess,"" he said.

In a shocking new HBO documentary, ""Leaving Neverland,"" Safechuck and Robson allege that Jackson sexually abused them for years — claims the Jackson family has repeatedly denied — and discuss the intimate details of their relationships with him. Throughout his life Jackson always denied any inappropriate behavior with children.

Both men have sued the Jackson estate over the alleged abuse, but their lawsuits were dismissed because of the statute of limitations. They are appealing.

For their first TV interview about the documentary, the men spoke to ""CBS This Morning"" co-host Gayle King about their time with Jackson, including very graphic allegations of abuse, and what it was like at Jackson's Neverland Ranch, where Robson claims seven years of sexual abuse with the world famous performer first began.

In-depth:

""He said I was his first""

""This was just the most magical thing I'd ever seen … And that first night Michael, he just kind of took us on a little bit of a tour. And he said to me and my sister, 'You can stay in one of the guest rooms or you can stay with me if you want.' And my reaction was, 'Of course, I want stay with you,'"" Robson said. ""We had one more night that way myself and my family were going to leave and go on another kind of vacation to the Grand Canyon. I was devastated to leave Michael. Michael was devastated for me to leave. He actually sobbed.""

So, Robson got to stay. He said his parents allowed him to spend the next week with Jackson at Neverland Ranch.

""Within either the first or second night of Michael and I being alone at Neverland, the night started changing. One of the ways I remember it starting is, you know, Michael just sort of starting to touch my legs and touch my crotch over my pants ... It progressed to him performing oral sex on me, him showing me how to perform oral sex on him,"" Robson said.

""Did it scare you? Did you think it was wrong?"" King asked.

""A couple days prior to the abuse starting, he started touching me just in the sense of, like, hand on my leg, lots of hugs, kissing my forehead, rubbing my hand. So it'd been this kind of development of physical closeness that was happening already that felt like a father. It just felt amazing,"" he said. ""As Michael started doing these sexual acts, he started talking to me about, God brought us together. We love each other … And this is how we show each other our love.""

Safechuck, nodding his head as Robson spoke, said his alleged abuse began similarly.

""He introduced me to masturbation ... he said I taught him how to French kiss ... and then it moves onto oral sex,"" Safechuck said.

""Were you frightened or thinking, 'This is weird or wrong?'"" King asked.

""No. No,"" Safechuck said. ""It's in the context of a loving, close relationship … there's no alarm bells going off in your head or any thoughts like that. Really, it's just, 'I love this person and we're trying to make each other happy.' And he said I was his first. But even as a kid, you don't even know what that means … So you're lovers and you're best friends.""

Asked what being in a ""relationship"" meant to him at such a young age, Safechuck said, ""You just feel really connected to someone, and you just love them intensely.""

""Michael's training ... began the first night that he started abusing me""

The men both said the pop icon's attention, despite the age difference, wasn't strange to them at all at the time. It made them feel special.

""Yeah, that was the thing is that the way Michael approached the abuse, the sexual activity with me was always extremely tender,"" Robson said. ""There was never — I mean, he didn't beat me. He didn't, you know, he'd never said mean things to me. It was all, 'We love each other.' It was all tender.""

In spite of what they're claiming now, in 1993 both Robson and Safechuck denied being molested by Jackson when allegations were brought by another boy, Jordan Chandler. That case settled out of court.

In 2005, when Jackson faced criminal charges, Robson took the stand and his testimony is often credited with helping Jackson win in court.

""The training – Michael's training of me to testify began the first night that he started abusing me,"" Robson said. ""He started telling me that if anybody else ever finds out, we'll both go to jail, both of our lives would be over.""

""I believe there are many other boys""

The 2005 criminal trial of Jackson centered on molestation charges brought by a child cancer survivor named Gavin Arvizo. Court testimony shows that from the stand Robson denied ever kissing, showering, or even cuddling with Jackson. He withstood a blistering cross-examination and was called a star witness. Robson said he does harbor some guilt about that now.

""Yeah, I do think about that. I have and I do, you know, I wish that I was ready. I wish that I could've helped Gavin Arvizo receive some justice and some validation for what happened to him that was just like what happened to me and just like what happened to James. And I wish that I could have played a role in, at that point, stopping Michael from abusing however many other kids he did after that,"" Robson said.

Both men believe there are other boys out there that Jackson abused.

""But I don't expect them to start coming out the way we are coming out. It's such a difficult thing to do. To come out,"" Safechuck said. ""You have to do it when you're ready.""

""Yeah, I believe there are many other boys that Michael abused. I find it hard to believe that he had boys around for any other reason than to sexually abuse them,"" Robson said.

""We can't change what happened to us. It happened. It's done. But what can we do with it now? How can we provide comfort for other survivors? … That's what this is about. And Michael just happens to be the guy, the abuser in this child sexual abuse story,"" Robson said.

Michael Jackson's accusers say fatherhood helped them confront alleged abuse

""I saw images of Michael doing it to my son""

The Jackson family has denounced Robson and Safechuck as ""opportunists"" and ""admitted liars"" and in a separate interview told King they believe the men's allegations are motivated by money, something they both deny.

Robson, Safechuck said they were not compensated for participating in the documentary and have no stake in its success.

""This is the truth of what happened. But the reason for me to tell it now, the reason to do this film, is so much bigger than Michael. It's so much bigger than me and James,"" Robson said.

""It's an old argument that they've used,"" Safechuck said. ""They say it's just about the money. For me, the lawsuit was about fighting back for little James. You know, nobody fought for me as a kid. But I'm old enough now to fight for myself.""

Both men said it was having children of their own that helped them come to terms with the alleged abuse.

""If I never had a son, I might still be in silence,"" Robson said. ""I think there's a really good chance."" Safechuck agreed.

""I had become so disconnected from myself as a little boy over the years in — through the process of kind of pushing all of this down, that I had no — I had no relationship with little Wade. I had no kind of concept or care for in my mind little Wade,"" Robson added.

Robson said he saw himself as a little boy in his son.

""I started having visions or images of what happened to me happening to my son. And I saw images of Michael doing it to my son. And that was the first time that those kind of thoughts in relation to Michael ever had an extremely negative, scary, emotional reaction in me, you know?"" Robson said. ""It was once I could see, really understand this is what a little boy looks like, and feels like, and thinks like, and behaves like. This is what innocence feels like – that was me.""

""The parents were groomed, too""

The documentary prominently features Robson and Safechuck's mothers and addresses the question: What was their role during the years of alleged abuse? The men said the parents were groomed, too.

""The parents are groomed though,"" Safechuck said. ""The parents are groomed as well ... Michael spends a lot of time talking to your parents, and connecting with them, and building relationships with them.""

""Creating special relationships with them, yeah,"" Robson said.

""It is their job to protect us, and they didn't. But I try to look at it from their point of view without letting them off the hook because obviously that's their job,"" Safechuck said.

""What about Michael's staff?"" King asked.

""Well, the staff are everywhere,"" Robson said, adding, ""Michael had so many people, employees running his life, running his career, running his life. Secretaries … Security guards to make sure that the room I was in with him was secure and closed off and private so he could do anything he wanted with me.""

""It's hard for me to believe that — that people didn't know or at least people had to wonder, 'What is going on? Something weird is going on here,'"" Robson said.

""Maybe I would have taken it to my grave. I don't know.""

Asked where Jackson sits with them today, Safechuck said, ""I really can't answer that.""

""Yeah. I still have really — I can't — yeah, a lot of mixed feelings. There's still – there's still a bit of love, and there's still — it's almost like a guilt for saying the truth like I've betrayed him,"" Safechuck said ""Yeah. It's like I still have those old wiring, you know, that's still there. So, you know, my relationship or my understanding my relationship with him I think is gonna — it needs a lot of work.""

In a separate interview with King this week, the Jackson family pointed out the men's stories changed over the years.

""What do you say to that?"" King asked Robson and Safechuck.

""Right,"" Robson said. ""If Michael was still alive and all of the other rest of the details of my life were the same, meaning I became a father, right, and I went through the same process that I did of this realization and going through the healing process, my belief is that we'd still be doing this of course some details may be different.""

""I don't – yeah, I don't know. Would I have taken this to my grave? I certainly planned on doing that,"" Safechuck said. ""So I had no expectations of ever telling anyone. So, you know — if he — if he was still alive, yeah, I don't know. Maybe I would have taken it to my grave. I don't know.""

The documentary has faced criticism for not seeking comment from the musician's family or estate, which sued HBO last week, calling the film a ""one-sided marathon of unvetted propaganda to shamelessly exploit an innocent man no longer here to defend himself.""

Asked to address that criticism, director Dan Reed told ""CBS This Morning"" on Tuesday, ""We know that the family and the estate[s] and Jackson during his lifetime and his lawyers all deny that any sexual abuse took place and those views are strongly represented in the film. We give those views a lot of time in the film on screen and we have people casting doubt on Wade's change of heart.""

""Leaving Neverland"" airs Sunday, March 3, and Monday, March 4 on HBO."
38,https://www.radiotimes.com/news/tv/2019-03-04/leaving-neverland-michael-jackson-documentary-channel-4-air-date-time-hbo/,['Ellie Harrison'],2019-03-04 00:00:00,"Leaving Neverland is a new documentary which aims to expose Michael Jackson as a manipulator and child sexual abuser.

Advertisement

The film features graphic accounts from Wade Robson and James Safechuck, two men who allege they were groomed and sexually abused by Jackson from the ages of seven and ten, respectively, with much of the abuse alleged to have happened at Jackson’s Neverland Ranch in California.

Here’s how to watch it, who features in the film, a summary of the past and present allegations against Jackson and what director Dan Reed had to say about the documentary…

When is Leaving Neverland on Channel 4?

Leaving Neverland airs in two 90-minute episodes over two consecutive nights at 9pm on Wednesday 6th and part two following on Thursday 7th March on Channel 4.

In the US, the film has already aired, broadcast on Sunday 3rd and Monday 4th March on HBO at 8-10pm ET/PT. Following part two, Oprah Winfrey conducted a TV interview – titled After Neverland – with the documentary’s two accusers Wade Robson and James Safechuck.

While the Channel 4 version is three hours long to leave space for adverts, the HBO release had a running time of four hours. Channel 4 has not yet announced plans to broadcast After Neverland.

What’s Leaving Neverland about?

Leaving Neverland features detailed and graphic accounts from two men, Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who allege that Michael Jackson sexually abused them when they were children.

It tells two separate stories, from the perspective of the two boys and their families, beginning with how each first came to meet the King of Pop. The film then examines the alleged grooming and abuse of the boys by the singer over many years, and attempts to explain why, for a long period of time, Robson and Safechuck denied any sexual misconduct on Jackson’s part.

The documentary concludes with their reactions to the singer’s death, and their decision to go public with the allegations and how their lives have changed since then.

Who made Leaving Neverland?

Leaving Neverland is made by Bafta-winning British director Dan Reed, who has had a prolific career with documentaries including Three Days of Terror: The Charlie Hebdo Attacks, The Paedophile Hunter, Terror at the Mall, Dispatches: The Battle for Haiti, and Terror in Mumbai.

Speaking about the conception of Leaving Neverland, Reed recalls how he and then-Channel 4 commissioning editor Daniel Pearl “were talking about the big stories out there in the world which weren’t quite resolved and people sort of knew but didn’t really know the answer to, and Michael Jackson was one of them.”

Who appears in Leaving Neverland?

Wade Robson and James Safechuck are the two people at the centre of the documentary. The film also includes appearances from Robson’s siblings, mother and wife, as well as Safechuck’s mother and wife.

In interviews with the boys’ mothers, Joy Robson and Stephanie Safechuck, the two women question their own decisions to let their sons sleep in Jackson’s bedroom for long periods of time. At one point, Stephanie Safechuck says: “I f***ed up. I failed to protect him.”

“The bravest thing in the film was the mothers coming forward, admitting what happened,” says Reed.

Explaining how they were totally beguiled by Jackson, his fame, and the access he gave them, Reed adds: “You see Stephanie’s face light up when she talks about meeting Harrison Ford and the champagne and all this stuff, they’re still split between all the good things that happened through their relationship with Michael Jackson.”

Only members of the two families are interviewed in the documentary, but archival footage and photographs feature Jackson himself, his lawyers, actor Macaulay Culkin and Jackson’s former wife Lisa Marie Presley, among others.

Who are Wade Robson and James Safechuck and what are they accusing Michael Jackson of?

Wade Robson was living in Australia when he met Jackson after winning a dance competition. He claims to have been sexually abused by the singer between the ages of seven and 14.

James Safechuck met Jackson when they filmed a Pepsi advert together, and alleges that the singer sexually abused him from the age of ten.

Both men have previously testified in Jackson’s defence in court, when other allegations were brought against the singer (both testified during his 1993 case and Robson again appeared in court as part of his defence in 2005), but it wasn’t until Robson had a son that he felt compelled to confront his experiences of abuse and go public in 2013. Safechuck did the same a year later.

Robson went on to become a successful choreographer who worked with Britney Spears, N-Sync and many more, while Safechuck, a former musician, is now a computer programmer.

Safechuck and Robson both allege that Jackson abused them in his various homes, including at the Neverland Ranch in California.

What is the Neverland Ranch?

The Neverland Ranch was Jackson’s home and private amusement park, and was named after the imaginary island in Peter Pan. The sprawling estate had a cinema, tepees, a swimming pool and much more.

In 2003, police raided Neverland Ranch while investigating charges of child molestation that had been brought against Jackson.

What has the Michael Jackson Estate said about the Leaving Neverland film?

After HBO announced Leaving Neverland’s premiere date, the Michael Jackson Estate sent a ten-page letter to the broadcaster’s CEO denouncing the film and branding it as “one-sided” and “sensationalist”.

The estate also labelled Leaving Neverland a “disgrace”, saying: “The fact that HBO and its producing partners did not even deign to reach out to any of these people to explore the credibility of the false stories Robson and Safechuck told violates all norms and ethics in documentary filmmaking and journalism. It is a disgrace.”

A full copy of the letter has been published by Deadline, you can read it here.

In response to the letter, HBO said in a statement: “Our plans remain unchanged. The two-part documentary, Leaving Neverland will air as scheduled on Sunday, March 3rd and Monday, March 4th. Dan Reed is an award-winning filmmaker who has carefully documented these survivors’ accounts. People should reserve judgment until they see the film.”

Is there a trailer for Leaving Neverland?

Yes there is. Here you go…

Who has accused Michael Jackson of child sexual abuse over the years?

Jackson has been publicly accused by five people of child sexual abuse.

The first allegation came in 1993, when Evan Chandler accused Jackson of abusing his 13-year-old son Jordan. The case was settled outside court for a reported $23 million.

In 2005, Jackson was charged with abusing 13-year-old cancer survivor Gavin Arvizo. The singer was formally charged on nine counts – for child molestation and administering an intoxicating agent for the purpose of committing a felony – and stood trial for ten (a further charge of conspiracy to abduct a child was later added). He was acquitted of all charges after a trial lasting several months.

During the 2005 trial, Jason Francia, the son of Jackson’s housekeeper testified that Jackson had abused him when he was a child.

In 2013, Wade Robson, who had testified in defence of Jackson during the 2005 trial, alleged sexual abuse.

And finally in 2014, James Safechuck filed claims against the Michael Jackson Estate, alleging sexual abuse.

Did Wade Robson and James Safechuck know each other before Leaving Neverland was filmed?

“Wade and James met for the first time during the Jackson years,” explains Reed. “While Jackson was alive, when they were kids, their paths crossed. I don’t think they spent much time together or chatted much.

“The first time they met after that was in 2014 when they met at the law firm Wade had gone to to make his claim against the estate. When James joined that case they met at the offices of the lawyer… then had no further contact whatsoever by phone, email or anything until the day before [Leaving Neverland’s] Sundance screening [in 2019].

“So Sundance was the first time they met properly as adults and hung out together and spent some time together. They get on really well, and they get each other. It’s been a delight to watch and very emotional for them as well.”

Reed says Jackson’s image of himself as a Peter Pan character who loved to surround himself with children and bask in their innocence was “disguising something that was very different”.

“He was very manipulative, very deliberate in his grooming and in his sexual activities with these children that took place over many, many years.”

The director predicts more people have shared Robson and Safechuck’s experiences of abuse by Jackson – although he’s unsure whether they will go public after seeing the documentary.

“I don’t think Wade and James can be the only ones because Jordan and Gavin have come out in public and also the son of Jackson’s chambermaid Jason Francia has gone public, and I believe there are many more,” said the director.

“Will they come out or not? I don’t know, it’s something that people will do in their own time… I’m not interested in outing anyone or compelling anyone to come forward if they’re not ready.”

On whether Jackson’s music should be boycotted, Reed adds: “I wouldn’t get behind a campaign to ban his music, I don’t think that makes any sense. Is this a time to celebrate Michael Jackson? I don’t think so.

“I think it’s a time to acknowledge the man he was and he’s also a brilliant entertainer. Maybe those things one day can fit together in people’s minds but there’s going to be a period of reevaluation of who he was and then, of course, of his work as well.”

Are the views of Jackson’s family and supporters represented in Leaving Neverland?

While Reed did not interview Jackson’s family, lawyers or fans for the documentary, he says their views are represented through archival footage within the film.

“You can see how much space we’ve devoted to Jackson’s rebuttals and his lawyers’ rebuttals at the time when there were allegations made against him in court and in the media,” explains the director.

“I think we’ve devoted ample time to that and ample time to people who, when Wade came out in 2013, were very sceptical and denigrated him and generally said unkind and sceptical things about him. I think we’ve represented the response of the Jackson camp.

“To my knowledge, the estate hasn’t changed its view since 2005 when the criminal case finished, so they still maintain that Jackson was not a paedophile and that’s the point of view we’ve represented in our film.”

What has been the backlash from Michael Jackson’s fans?

Michael Jackson fans protested at the screening of Leaving Neverland at 2019’s Sundance festival, and Reed has also described the backlash he has received on social media.

“My message to them? Leave me alone,” he laughs.

“We’ve had probably thousands of emails and there’s been a lot of stuff on Twitter as you’d expect, there are probably tens of millions of Jackson fans out there… Anyone who’s stood up in favour of the film has been deluged with abuse.

“That’s coming from a tiny minority of Jackson fans and I call them the MJ cultists, they’re part of the MJ cult, they’re uncompromising, they won’t listen and their knee jerk reaction has been to denigrate and hurl abuse at children who were raped by Michael Jackson, and I don’t think that’s a very good look. Especially in 2019…

“No one’s surprised by the virulence of the response, but we have to put it in context. The victim is not Jackson. The victims in this case are Wade and James and we should take time to listen to their stories before trying to shut them down.”

Are there any other documentaries about Michael Jackson coming up?

Yes. In the build-up to Leaving Neverland’s air date, the BBC announced plans for a rival film by Jacques Peretti titled Michael Jackson: The Rise and Fall. As the name suggests, the documentary will look at Jackson’s childhood in Gary, Indiana, his time in family band The Jackson 5, his successful solo career and his struggles with fame and the press.

Using a group of contributors – no names confirmed yet – the film will attempt to “unpick the circumstances, controversies and accusations that continue to surround him today in an attempt to better understand the rise and fall of the pop superstar”.

Peretti has made three previous films on Jackson but it remains to be seen how his latest BBC release will hold up against the claims made in Leaving Neverland.

Advertisement

Leaving Neverland: Michael Jackson and Me airs at 9pm on Wednesday 6th and Thursday 7th March on Channel 4"
39,https://abcnews.go.com/Entertainment/wireStory/michael-jackson-brothers-accusers-film-neglects-facts-61354510,[],None,
40,https://radaronline.com/exclusives/2019/03/michael-jackson-accusers-detail-sexual-abuse-first-tv-interview/,['Rosa Sanchez'],2019-03-01 13:51:52+00:00,"Leaving Neverland, the scathing documentary about Michael Jackson’s alleged child sexual abuse has taken the world by storm, and now, in a follow-up TV interview, the late icon’s accusers have continued to speak out.

During an appearance on CBS This Morning on Thursday, February 27, Wade Robson and James Safechuck detailed their bizarre experiences with the King of Pop, saying that at the time, they truly believed they were in mutual, loving relationships with the star, despite the fact that they were just children.

Both men recalled the times they first visited Neverland, Jackson’s famed California ranch, were most of the abuses allegedly took place.

PHOTOS: Night Sweats & Paranoia! Michael Jackson’s Doc Reveals Star’s Secret Addiction Hell

It was “the most magical thing I’d ever seen,” said Robson. He said he visited the property with his sister and parents, but when Jackson asked him if he wanted to stay longer, just the two of them, he immediately agreed. He was just a young boy at the time.

“I was devastated to leave Michael. Michael was devastated for me to leave. He actually sobbed,” Robson said. “So I got to stay. And so it was just Michael and I in Neverland for the next week… My parents allowed that.”

He said that one of those nights, their relationship changed. Though Jackson used to touch him in a fatherly way, the physical acts became more sexual as the two got closer.

“One of the ways I remember it starting is Michael just sort of starting to touch my legs and touch my crotch over my pants. It progressed to him performing oral sex on me, him showing me how to perform oral sex on him,” Robson alleged. “A couple days prior to the abuse starting, he started touching me just in the sense of, like, hand on my leg, lots of hugs, kissing my forehead, rubbing my hand. So it’d been this kind of development of physical closeness that was happening already that felt like a father. It just felt amazing.”

PHOTOS: Inside Michael Jackson’s Twisted World: ‘Frightening’ Raid Evidence Exposed

Safechuck told a similar story, with both men agreeing that the abuse they allegedly suffered at the hands of Jackson was never violent, but rather “tender.”

“As Michael started doing these sexual acts, he started talking to me about, ‘God brought us together. We love each other… And this is how we show each other our love,'” Robson said.

Safechuck said it took a long time for him to realize he’d been sexually abused by the “Thriller” singer, as the abuse felt almost natural.

He “introduced me to masturbation,” said Safechuck. “He said I taught him how to French kiss. And then it moves onto oral sex.”

PHOTOS: A ‘B***h’ & A ‘Bigot!’ Michael Jackson’s Doc Reveals The Star’s Secret Celebrity Feuds

He added that all the sexual acts they performed on each other were “in the context of a loving, close relationship,” so he never had “alarm bells going off in your head or any thoughts like that. Really, it’s just, ‘I love this person and we’re trying to make each other happy.'”

Both Robson and Safechuck said they believed Jackson abused many children during his years in the spotlight, but agreed that it was unlikely anyone else would come forward after so many years.

“He said I was his first, but even as a kid, you don’t even know what that means,” added Safechuck. “So you’re lovers and you’re best friends… You just feel really connected to someone, and you just love them intensely.”

“The way Michael approached the abuse, the sexual activity with me, was always extremely tender,” Robson continued. “… He didn’t beat me… He never said mean things to me. It was all, ‘We love each other.’ It was all tender.”

PHOTOS: Michael Jackson’s Kids Paris, Prince, And Blanket Throw Huge Halloween Bash

RadarOnline.com readers know Jackson’s family has long denied the sexual abuse claims against the star, with his brother, Jermaine Jackson even accusing the alleged victims of fabricating their stories for money. The family is also suing HBO over the documentary, which recently premiered at Sundance.

Though both Robson and Safechuck previously claimed that Michael Jackson never abused them, they said on CBS that they were simply scared and ashamed to speak out against singer but have now done so in hopes of helping other kids from being sexually abuse.

We pay for juicy info! Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com? Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.

Get the exclusive celebrity scoop on all the stars you love before any of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast Straight Shuter below!"
41,https://www.hollywoodreporter.com/thr-esq/michael-jackson-estate-sues-hbo-violating-disparagement-deal-1188759,"['Eriq Gardner', 'Eriq.Gardner Thr.Com']",2019-02-21 11:17:27,"The Michael Jackson Estate is hardly letting go of Leaving Neverland, the documentary about the late pop star's alleged sexual abuse that is set to air next month on HBO. On Thursday, Optimum Productions and the two co-executors of the Jackson estate sued HBO and parent company Time Warner claiming the documentary constitutes a breach of a non-disparagement clause in an old contract.

""Michael Jackson is innocent. Period,"" begins the complaint filed in Los Angeles Superior Court. ""In 2005, Michael Jackson was subjected to a trial — where rules of evidence and law were applied before a neutral judge and jury and where both sides were heard — and he was exonerated by a sophisticated jury. Ten years after his passing, there are still those out to profit from his enormous worldwide success and take advantage of his eccentricities. Michael is an easy target because he is not here to defend himself, and the law does not protect the deceased from defamation, no matter how extreme the lies are.""

The law may give no recourse to dead individuals when it comes to reputation, but those managing the Jackson business have found a way to haul HBO into court over Leaving Neverland.

After going through attacks on Jackson's two accusers — Wade Robson and James Safechuck, plus filmmaker Dan Reed and HBO — for failing to meet with them to address concerns about what the estate sees as a one-sided propaganda film, the plaintiffs discuss the old contract that HBO made to air a first-ever televised concert after the release of Jackson's album Dangerous.

The year was 1992, and many media outlets were said to be chasing Jackson's televised concert at that time. Then came the deal.

""In those non-disparagement provisions, HBO promised that 'HBO shall not make any disparaging remarks concerning Performer or any of his representatives, agents, or business practices or do any act that may harm or disparage or cause to lower in esteem the reputation or public image of Performer,'"" states the complaint. ""Other provisions in the Agreement require HBO to notify and consult with Jackson and Optimum Productions if it wishes to air additional programming about Jackson.""

The complaint notes that at the time, HBO chief Richard Plepler was working as a senior vp communications and thus ""must have known, or should have known, about HBO's contract with Jackson, as Michael Jackson in Concert in Bucharest: The Dangerous Tour was the biggest event for HBO that year. Yet in his desperation, Plepler willfully ignored HBO's obligations to Michael Jackson.""

Among the complaints is how Leaving Neverland expressly suggests ""Jackson was abusing children in connection with and on the Dangerous World Tour,"" pointing to a scene where Robson's mother is shown discussing the children taken on that tour.

""To summarize, HBO profited off the Dangerous World Tour by airing a concert from the tour and promoting Michael Jackson’s talents,"" continues the complaint. ""Now, HBO is profiting off the Dangerous World Tour by airing a 'documentary' that falsely claims Michael Jackson was abusing children on the same tour. It is hard to imagine a more direct violation of the non-disparagement clause.""

Besides claiming violation of the disparagement clause, the estate is also talking about ""responsible journalism"" and alleging a breach of the covenant of good faith and fair dealing.

HBO on Thursday issued a statement, staying firm on its plans to premiere the documentary. ""Despite the desperate lengths taken to undermine the film, our plans remain unchanged,"" reads the statement. ""HBO will move forward with the airing of Leaving Neverland, the two-part documentary, on March 3rd and 4th. This will allow everyone the opportunity to assess the film and the claims in it for themselves.""

The lawsuit being handled by attorneys including Howard Weitzman and Bryan Freedman demands that HBO be compelled to participate in a non-confidential arbitration, where the Jackson estate says it will be seeking ""all damages proximately caused by HBO's reprehensible disparagement of Michael Jackson, which could exceed $100 million should HBO succeed in the damage it is intending to cause to the legacy of Michael Jackson.""

The Jackson estate could have first filed an arbitration demand, but obviously they wished to make noise right before the airing of the documentary. If this dispute moves forward in arbitration or otherwise, there could be challenges to the standing for suit as Michael Jackson's old touring company was a signatory to the agreement (said to be a predecessor of Optimum Productions) and there will be the question of injury. Additionally, expect an attack on the scope of this agreement (attached as an exhibit to the complaint). The confidentiality provisions include some discussion that obligations on non-disclosures post-date HBO's relationship with the singer, but it's less clear whether those post-term obligations extend to non-disparagement, and HBO will surely argue that it wasn't the intention of either party to bind what HBO could say about Jackson throughout eternity.

After the estate penned a letter earlier this month pointing to concerns about the film, HBO told The Hollywood Reporter, ""Our plans remain unchanged. The two-part documentary, Leaving Neverland will air as scheduled on Sunday, March 3rd and Monday, March 4th. Dan Reed is an award-winning filmmaker who has carefully documented these survivors' accounts. People should reserve judgment until they see the film."""
42,http://fortune.com/2019/02/21/michael-jackson-estate-sues-hbo-michael-jackson-documentary/,['Brian Raftery'],2019-02-21 00:00:00,"Michael Jackson’s team is looking to cancel HBO—at least in court.

Representatives for the late singer, who died in 2009, have filed a lawsuit against HBO and its parent company, Time Warner, over next month’s Leaving Neverland, a two-part documentary detailing multiple allegations of sexual abuse against Jackson. The movie, which is set to air on HBO on March 3 and 4—and which a Variety reviewed described as “devastating”—features claims from Wade Robson and James Safechuck, both of whom befriended Jackson while they were children.

“Michael Jackson is innocent,” the lawsuit notes. “Period.”

According to The Hollywood Reporter, the suit was brought forth by Optimum Productions—the company that oversees much of Jackson’s posthumous output—as well as pair of executors of the singer’s estate. They claim HBO is committing a breach of contract by airing Leaving Neverland, thanks to a deal the network made to air a 1992 concert broadcast headlined by Jackson.

In obtaining the rights to that special, which cost the network a then-shocking $20 million, HBO allegedly signed a non-disparagement clause that prevented the network from making “any disparaging remarks concerning [Jackson]…or do any act that may harm or disparage or cause to lower in esteem the reputation or public image,” according to the Reporter.

By airing Leaving Neverland, Jackson’s estate argues, HBO is in breach of contract. The lawsuit also attacks the network and the film’s director, Dan Reed, for not meeting with the estate to discuss the film’s claims.

Jackson’s estate is reportedly seeking “all damages proximately caused by HBO’s reprehensible disparagement of Michael Jackson, which could exceed $100 million.”

The lawsuit’s tactical approach was previewed in a tweet sent out by Jackson’s official Twitter account last January, as Leaving Neverland was making its premiere at the Sundance Film Festival. “In 1992, Michael gave HBO their highest rated special ever,” the tweet read. “Now, to repay him they give a voice to admitted liars.”"
43,https://www.usmagazine.com/celebrity-news/news/michael-jacksons-estate-sues-hbo-over-leaving-neverland/,"[""Alexandra D'Aluisio""]",2019-02-21 20:43:24+00:00,"Michael Jackson’s estate is suing HBO for $100 million over its controversial Leaving Neverland documentary, according to legal documents obtained by Us Weekly.

“The Jackson Estate will seek all damages proximately caused by HBO’s reprehensible disparagement of Michael Jackson, which could exceed $100 million should HBO succeed in the damage it is intending to cause to the legacy of Michael Jackson,” reads the complaint, which was filed on Thursday, January 21.

The lawsuit claims that the “documentary is “posthumous character assassination” of the late musician because it only shows one side of the story. “Michael Jackson is innocent. Period,” the complaint begins.

Attorney Howard Weitzman told Us in a statement: “HBO breached its agreement not to disparage Michael Jackson by producing and selling to the public a one-sided marathon of unvetted propaganda to shamelessly exploit an innocent man no longer here to defend himself. HBO could have and should have ensured that Leaving Neverland was properly sourced, fact-checked and a fair and balanced representation. Instead they chose to fund and produce a film where they knew the two subjects had for many years testified under oath and told family, friends and law enforcement that Mr. Jackson did nothing inappropriate to either of them.”

HBO responded to the suit in a statement to Deadline on Thursday. “Despite the desperate lengths taken to undermine the film, our plans remain unchanged. HBO will move forward with the airing of Leaving Neverland, the two-part documentary, on March 3rd and 4th. This will allow everyone the opportunity to assess the film and the claims in it for themselves

“Nearly four years after Michael died they suddenly changed their recollections, sued the Estate of Michael Jackson for hundreds of millions of dollars and had all of their lawsuits dismissed, yet they are still seeking money, having appealed,” Weitzman continued. “HBO and the director were well aware of their financial motives and that ample opposing facts are available from numerous sources, but made the unconscionable decision to bury any evidence casting doubt on their chosen narrative.”

He added: “Had they made an objective film it would have allowed viewers to make up their own minds about these allegations, instead of having a television network dictate to them that they must accept these false claims about Michael Jackson.”

Leaving Neverland premiered in late January at the Sundance Film Festival in Park City, Utah. The documentary features two accusers — Wade Robson and James Safechuck — who claim they were sexually abused by the “Man in the Mirror” singer as children in the mid-to-late 1980s.

Jackson was previously accused of molesting two other young boys. He vehemently denied the allegations, settled out of court with the first child in 1994 and was found not guilty in a 2005 trial with the second boy. Jackson died in June 2009 at the age of 50.

One day after the movie premiered, the former child star’s estate came to his defense in a statement obtained by Us. “Leaving Neverland isn’t a documentary — it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death,” the statement read. “We are extremely sympathetic to any legitimate victim of child abuse. This film, however, does those victims a disservice.”

Sign up now for the Us Weekly newsletter to get breaking celebrity news, hot pics and more delivered straight to your inbox!

Want stories like these delivered straight to your phone? Download the Us Weekly iPhone app now!"
44,https://www.bbc.com/news/entertainment-arts-47403951,[],None,"Media playback is unsupported on your device Media caption ""Every time I stayed the night with him, he abused me""

Two men have told the BBC they were abused hundreds of times by Michael Jackson, from the ages of seven and 10.

Wade Robson, 36, told the BBC's Victoria Derbyshire programme the singer had sexually abused him from the age of seven and tried to rape him when he was 14.

James Safechuck, 40, told the programme Jackson had sexually abused him ""from the age of 10 until around 14"".

Jackson's family say there's ""not one piece of evidence"" to prove the claims.

The two men have also spoken out in the documentary Leaving Neverland.

Warning: This article contains descriptions some may find offensive or upsetting

Asked if the abuse had occurred ""hundreds and hundreds of times"", both Mr Robson and Mr Safechuck agreed that this had been the case.

Mr Robson told the programme: ""Every time I was with him, every time I stayed the night with him, he abused me.""

Jackson had fondled him, ""touching my entire body"", and made him watch the singer performing a sex act, he said.

And then, when he was 14, Jackson had tried to rape him.

'Show our love'

""That was one of the last sexual abuse experiences we had,"" Mr Robson told the programme.

Image copyright Channel 4 Image caption In Leaving Neverland, Wade Robson (pictured) says Jackson sexually abused him in the 1990s

Jackson had groomed him to believe they ""loved each other - and this is how we show our love"", he said.

""And then he would immediately follow that up with, 'But If anybody else ever found out what we are doing, you and I would go to jail for the rest of our lives and our lives would fall apart,' he and I would fall apart,"" Mr Robson told the programme.

""All of this was terrifying to me.

""The idea of being pulled away from Michael - this man, this other-worldly figure, this god to me who had now become my best friend - no way was I going to do anything that would pull me away from him.""

Mr Robson said Jackson had told him ""I was his best friend and the only person he had ever done these sexual acts with"".

""So therefore I was - out of all the boys in the world - the chosen one, I thought,"" he said.

Mr Safechuck told the programme his abuse had begun with Jackson teaching him how to perform a sex act, at the age of 10.

""Then you start French kissing - he said I taught him how to do that,"" Mr Safechuck said.

And this had been followed by further abuse and other sex acts.

Find out more

Watch the Victoria Derbyshire programme's full interview with Wade Robson and James Safechuck from 10:00 GMT on the BBC News Channel in the UK.

Mr Safechuck told the programme Jackson had been able to abuse him over such a sustained period of time because he had also successfully groomed his parents.

""There's a long grooming process where Michael inserts himself into your family and becomes a part of your family,"" he said.

""It takes him a while to build up the trust - it doesn't happen overnight.""

And he then ""makes a wedge between you and your parents - and he isolates you from everybody else"".

'Master manipulator'

""At the same time when you're being abused, a part of you is dying,"" Mr Safechuck added.

Mr Robson also described Jackson as a ""master manipulator"".

He had driven ""this wedge between myself and my father, [and] my mother and my father"" to make it easier for the abuse to occur, he told the programme.

He also said part of the responsibility for the abuse should fall ""at the door of all the other people, all the other employees that were around Michael and me and James [Safechuck] all the time, who looked the other way"".

Image copyright Getty Images Image caption Fans turned the entrance to Neverland into a shrine after the singer died

'Very innocent'

In response, Michael Jackson's brothers Tito, Marlon and Jackie, and nephew Taj Jackson rejected the claims in Leaving Neverland - which is broadcast in the UK next week - that the singer had abused children.

Taj said his uncle's behaviour had seemed odd to some but had been ""very innocent"", adding: ""His naivety was his downfall.""

And Marlon said there was ""not one piece of evidence"" to back up the allegations.

Michael Jackson's estate, meanwhile said Mr Robson and Mr Safechuck had previously ""testified under oath that these events never occurred"".

""They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers,"" it said.

For information and support, visit the Action Line website.

Follow the BBC's Victoria Derbyshire programme on Facebook and Twitter - and see more of our stories here."
45,https://deadline.com/2019/02/michael-jackson-family-leaving-neverland-cbs-this-morning-1202566097/,['Greg Evans'],2019-02-27 13:40:19+00:00,"Three of Michael Jackson’s brothers and his nephew defended the late singer against charges of child sexual abuse made in Leaving Neverland, Dan Reed’s shattering documentary airing this weekend on HBO.

Appearing today on CBS This Morning as part of the morning show’s three-day look at the documentary, the Jacksons insisted that the film is untruthful and the two men making the explosive accusations are lying in an attempt to get money from the Jackson estate. (Watch the segment above).

None of the four Jacksons – brothers Tito, Marlon and Jackie, and nephew Taj – have seen the documentary. “I know my brother,” Jackie Jackson said. “He’s my little brother. I know my brother. He’s not like that.”

Leaving Neverland focuses on Jackson accusers Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who claim, in graphic detail, that Michael Jackson sexually abused them for years when they were children.

Today, the Jacksons denied the claims, as they have since the film made its much-discussed debut at this year’s Sundance Film Festival, and dismissed Robson and Safechuck as motivated by money. The accusers, whose lawsuit against the Jackson estate was dismissed, are appealing that ruling.

“It’s always been about money,” Taj Jackson said. “I hate to say it when it’s my uncle, it’s almost like they see a blank check. These people felt that they’re owed something. You know, instead of working for something, they blame everything on my uncle.”

Marlon Jackson said the film “is not telling the truth.”

“There has not been not one piece of evidence that corroborates their story,” Marlon said. “And they’re not interested in doing that.” None of the brothers or nephew offered what, exactly, such evidence might be.

The Jacksons’ appearance on CBS This Morning is the second part of the show’s exclusive three-day series. Yesterday, Leaving Neverland director Dan Reed explained his decision not to interview the Jackson family for the film: “No one else was in the room, I don’t believe, when Wade [Robson] was being molested by Michael or when James [Safechuck] was having sex with Michael.”

Tomorrow’s installment of the CBS This Morning series will be an interview with Robson and Safechuck.

Today, CBS This Morning co-anchor Gayle King asked the Jackson’s about Michael’s famous “sleepovers” with children. The brothers and nephew continued the family’s longstanding narrative that the “slumber parties” were innocent. Marlon Jackson today even criticized anchor Gayle King’s description of Michael “sharing his bed” as having untoward connotations.

“I grew up in it, so for me it wasn’t odd,” Taj Jackson said. “You know, I think, to the outside world, yes, I think it can be odd. I mean, I’m not oblivious to what it sounds like. But when you’re actually there in that atmosphere and you’re around it, and you’re watching movies, whether, with his kids, whether it’s Little Rascals or Three Stooges, and you’re watching these things, it’s like, it’s very innocent. But I think, the fault on my uncle was he just, he didn’t have that bone in his body to look at it the other way. And I think that was the thing, is that his naiveté was his downfall in a way.”

Said Jackie Jackson, “Michael was always a kid at heart.”

But yesterday director Reed took aim directly at that characterization. “I think for many years Jackson got away with this image of being a bit of a child himself and being very affectionate with children, and I wanted to make sure people understood this wasn’t overenthusiastic kissing or cuddling,” Reed said. “This was sex, the kind of sex adults have but he was having with a little child.”

Robson and Safechuck will be interviewed tomorrow on CBS This Morning. The two-part Leaving Neverland airs Sunday, March 3 and Monday, March 4 (8-10 pm ET/PT both nights) on HBO."
46,https://www.bostonglobe.com/opinion/2019/02/22/leaving-michael-jackson/ecHFQ1GUk7BKX10lYblroL/story.html,['Globe Columnist'],2019-02-22 00:00:00,"AFTER THE GUEST of honor was roasted and toasted at her birthday party last year, the DJ cranked up the evening’s playlist.

One of the first songs was R. Kelly’s “Step in the Name of Love.” As most people in the room got giddy and loose, I stood on the side having a conniption.

“Are you kidding me?! R. Kelly?! For real?! How y’all still playing R. Kelly?!” I wailed to no one in particular, and no one paid any mind to me or my righteous indignation. (They’d heard it all before.) I found it unconscionable that anything associated with someone long accused of sexual assault could be part of a festive gathering.

Advertisement

Of course, if the song had been, say, Michael Jackson’s “Workin’ Day and Night,” I’d have led the charge to the dance floor.

Get Today in Opinion in your inbox: Globe Opinion's must-reads, delivered to you every Sunday-Friday. Sign Up Thank you for signing up! Sign up for more newsletters here

Lately my own hypocrisy is becoming untenable. The only difference between the two musicians is that Kelly’s alleged victims are female, while Jackson’s are reported to be young boys.

Nearly a decade after Jackson’s death, those allegations are again news. On March 3 and 4, HBO will air “Leaving Neverland,” a four-hour documentary featuring two men who say that, as children, they were first befriended, then sexually abused by Jackson. In the film’s trailer, one of the accusers says Jackson told him, “If they ever found out what we were doing, [you] and I would go to jail for the rest of our lives.” Later he adds, “I want to be able to speak the truth as loud as I had to speak the lie for so long.”

Jackson, who was acquitted in 2005 on all charges related to another child molestation accusation, always maintained his innocence. After “Leaving Neverland” debuted at the Sundance Film Festival this year, Jackson’s estate excoriated the accusers. In a statement, his family said, “The facts don’t lie, people do. Michael Jackson was and always will be 100% innocent of these false allegations.” Now, Jackson’s estate is suing HBO for $100 million.

Not once have I doubted the brave women who’ve spoken against Kelly, thoroughly documented by Chicago journalist Jim DeRogatis who first broke the story and has followed it into very dark places for nearly 20 years. More recently, the documentary “Surviving R. Kelly” revived interest in the allegations. Kelly has since been dropped by his longtime record label. Friday, he was charged with aggravated criminal sexual abuse.

Advertisement

I don’t believe most people are inclined to concoct harrowing tales about rape, sexual assault, and molestation. And while I always thought it highly inappropriate that Jackson shared his bed with children who were not his own, I refused to think about it much beyond that. I allowed my lifelong fandom for Jackson to overshadow the possibility that he groomed children and their starstruck parents, and ruined young lives.

A few months after the #MeToo movement went worldwide in late 2017, I pulled from my bookshelves and CD racks everything featuring a musician, actor, director, or producer outed for sexual misconduct.

There were Mozart symphonies and Rossini operas conducted by James Levine, the former Metropolitan Opera and Boston Symphony Orchestra musical director; acclaimed films co-starring Kevin Spacey; Academy-Award winning movies produced and distributed by Harvey Weinstein’s companies; and a stack of classic hip-hop from Def Jam Records, co-founded by Russell Simmons.

Notably absent from that pile was anything from Jackson – and I have plenty, from original vinyl to boxed sets. There are also ticket stubs from two concerts, a poster from my college dorm room, and even an original black-and-white photograph taken by a photographer friend at a 1975 Milwaukee concert that still hangs in my study.

Believe survivors, I’ve often said. I believe Bill Cosby’s accusers, and the many grown men and women who say they were sexually abused as children by priests. I always believed Anita Hill. I listened to every word of Christine Blasey Ford’s testimony before the Senate Judiciary Committee last year, and heard only truth.

Advertisement

I know survivors are scorned and accused of seeking money or attention, and how their revelations can leave their lives in tatters. It’s not that I thought Jackson’s accusers were lying; I simply, and willingly, ignored the accusations because Jackson was too much a part of my life and history to abandon.

‘I simply, and willingly, ignored the accusations because Jackson was too much a part of my life and history to abandon.’

Before their national debut on “The Ed Sullivan Show,” I first saw the Jackson 5 on a Miss Black Teen pageant. Yes, I was mesmerized by the songs, the harmonies, and the sharp choreography. Still, it was also the improbable sight of these African-American kids on TV who could have been plucked from my own neighborhood. I felt a pride previously unknown, especially in Michael who was closest to my age. I was hooked.

Now the accusations against Jackson may be too compelling, even for lifers like me. Scheduled for fall, a Chicago tryout for “Don’t Stop ’Til You Get Enough,” a Broadway-bound musical about Jackson, has been cancelled. A show spokesman claims the change wasn’t fueled by “Leaving Neverland,” but one has to wonder about the timing.

Jackson’s family has called the film “a public lynching.” It’s a tactless reference — for historically obvious reasons, but also because Cosby’s and Kelly’s advocates used the same revolting phrase in shameless attempts to silence accusers. Jackson will continue to have his defenders, especially because he’s no longer here to defend himself.

I can no longer be one of them. Holding dear my childhood memories pales when compared to what others kids may have endured at the hands of a man I’ve adored for as long as I can remember. Now I am leaving Michael Jackson, as uncomfortable stories are again unearthed and idols crumble from gods into monsters.

Renée Graham can be reached at renee.graham@globe.com . Follow her on Twitter @reneeygraham"
47,http://thesource.com/2019/02/28/michael-jackson-taj-jackson-fbi/,[],2019-02-28 00:00:00,"As the premiere of the controversial documentary Leaving Neverland draws near, the family of the late pop icon, Michael Jackson, continues to fight in his defense against the biased incriminating project. This morning, Jackson’s nephew, Taj Jackson, who is the son of his brother Tito Jackson called into the Breakfast Club with his uncle Marlon Jackson to debunk the credibility of the HBO documentary and the accusers.

Charlamagne tha God started off the segment by mentioning Dan Reed’s, director of Leaving Neverland, recent claim that accusers Wade Robson and James Safechuck were not being compensated and Taj does not seem to find any truth in the statement. “You can turn being relevant into making money. They have an appeal going on right now with the [Michael Jackson] estate, so it’s in their best interests to get the public on their side so they can make as much money as possible.”

The dialogue went on to touch base on the Michael Jackson Estate’s lawsuit against HBO, in which the Breakfast Club hosts questioned if the dispute will encourage the network to pull the documentary from premiering on Sunday (Mar. 3). Taj expressed he believes the network is in dire need for the attention due to a foreseen demise thanks to Netflix.

“I think that there is too much at stake for them. I think HBO is in a certain position where Netflix is eating their lunch and I think they need this publicity.”

According to ET, the lawsuit presented by Optimum Productions and co-executors of the Michael Jackson estate claims the HBO project violates a non-disparagement clause that is sanctioned in a contract made with HBO in 1992 which prohibited the network from making any disparaging remarks about the King of Pop or any of his representatives that may harm or deface his public image. The contract was made after the release of his classic album Dangerous and Michael Jackson Live in Concert in Bucharest: The Dangerous Tour special.

When asked if he found any of the child molestation accusations to be true, the vocal nephew of the pop legend spoke in Jackson’s defense as the allegations being false and went on to reveal that the Federal Bureau of Investigation investigated the Thriller singer for 10 years and have found no evidence proving the claims to be true.

“One hundred percent no. My uncle was one of the most scrutinized people in the world. He has a secret ten year FBI investigation going on him that no one knew about,” Taj said. “Three hundred pages of documents, not one shred of evidence. They would have locked him up if they had something.”

According to a 2009 CNN report, just six months after Jackson’s shocking death, the FBI published 17 years worth of accumulated data on Jackson online. The information was made publicly available in lieu of the Freedom of Information Act.

Taj went on to say, “When your name is Michael Jackson, you’re just a target.”

Towards the end of the call, Taj gave his stance on the popular collusion that Jackson’s death was a plotted murder by highlighting the supreme entertainer’s league of music publishing ownership.

“My uncle pretty much-owned half of the music industry publishing company. We’re talking everything from the James Bond theme,” he said. “He was getting paid and paid and paid. He became too powerful. He has a deal where he owned half of Sony Music’s catalog.”

This includes the catalogs of Babyface, ’90s rock band Oasis, and the infamous case of the Beatles.

To the entire #MJFam… THANK YOU 🙌🏽. You’re dedication and loyalty to my beloved uncle will ALWAYS be appreciated. My Uncle always talked about his fan support and today you are showing that love right back. Words can’t thank you enough for fighting the leeches of the world. 🙏🏽 — TJ Jackson (@tjjackson) February 17, 2019

Thank you. I can only do this because I feel the huge overwhelming support from MJ fans worldwide. I am receiving so many messages of love and encouragement. 🙏🏽 The media spread lies, bullied and picked on my uncle throughout his life. We are taking a stand for him. Enough! https://t.co/VIQSDYO51U — Taj Jackson (@tajjackson3) January 22, 2019

Over the past month, Taj Jackson, along with his brother TJ Jackson has been sensationally vocal about the biased documentary, especially through the social networking platform of Twitter. Both have merged with dedicated fans to vocalize and present a pure defense for the beloved entertainer due to the mere fact that he is no longer here to voice his own defense. Their activism has started to receive appropriate media attention as the days of Leaving Neverland approach and the family refuses to back down."
48,https://www.philly.com/entertainment/music/michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-documentary-hbo-ryan-adams-r-kelly-cancel-culture-20190221.html,"['Dan Deluca', 'Michael Klein', 'Staff Reports', 'Laura Smythe', 'Jenny Dehuff', 'For The Inquirer']",2019-02-21 00:00:00,"Adams is not yet completely canceled: His songs are still heard on Spotify playlists like “Chill as Folk"" and “Roots Rising.” But his career has taken a serious hit. Big Colors, the first of three albums he planned to release this year, is no longer scheduled to come out in April. Variety reported that three music gear companies have ended sponsorship deals with him."
49,https://www.newyorker.com/culture/cultural-comment/a-day-of-reckoning-for-michael-jackson-with-leaving-neverland,"['Amanda Petrusich', 'Megan Amram', 'Susan B. Glasser', 'Andy Borowitz', 'Masha Gessen', 'Megan K. Stack', 'Jim Derogatis', 'Kelefa Sanneh']",None,"“Leaving Neverland,” a two-part, four-hour documentary about two survivors of alleged sexual abuse by Michael Jackson, premières on HBO this Sunday. It’s certain to be a bleak day of reckoning for serious fans of Jackson, who has been trailed, even in death, by accusations of unconscionable behavior. The film was directed by Dan Reed, a British documentarian (in 2014, he released a film about vigilante pedophile hunters), and hinges on extensive on-camera interviews with Wade Robson, who is now thirty-six, and James Safechuck, who is now forty. Both men allege that Jackson groomed and abused them when they were children.

The film immediately establishes just how exhilarating it was for the boys to be chosen by Jackson, who, in the nineteen-eighties, was the most widely idolized pop star on earth—to be offered not just his interest and affection but access to a rarefied, enchanted life style, absent of parents, school, or meddling by adults. “Leaving Neverland” does not offer any new evidence of abuse, but it is nonetheless a gruelling and devastating film that asks viewers to reconfigure how they think about both Jackson and potential victims of rape. Robson and Safechuck actively sought out and sustained contact with Jackson. They loved him. Each was heartbroken when he eventually turned his attention elsewhere, to other boys.

The film presents just one side of the story: what Robson and Safechuck recall about their experiences with Jackson, and, decades later, how both of these men have navigated the subsequent trauma. But what about Jackson’s side? What sympathy or voice, if any, is he owed now, in death? In his lifetime, Jackson furiously denied any sexual interest in children. It has been hard for Robson and Safechuck to bring their allegations to trial. They sued in 2013 and 2014, but their claims were dismissed for technical reasons. They have since appealed the ruling.

It is admittedly difficult, while watching “Leaving Neverland,” to hold in mind two contradictory but equally imperative ideas: that victims should be believed, and that the accused are innocent until proved guilty. The first is wildly crucial if we wish to protect the disenfranchised from egregious abuses of power. The second remains the crux of the American criminal-justice system. Can these two ideas coexist? Right now it feels as if they have to, which means that we are sometimes required to make personal choices about how we accept or dismiss the information made available to us. The first part of “Leaving Neverland” is explicit in the two men’s precise (and, it should be said, nearly identical) descriptions of abuse. Listening to Safechuck give a virtual tour of Jackson’s home—after describing each new room, he says, “We had sex there”—is especially nauseating for its casual use of “we,” as if a child could ever actively participate in his own abuse. I found all four hours of “Leaving Neverland” horrifying and unforgettable.

In recent months, pop critics have undergone a mass reëvaluation of the career of the R. & B. singer R. Kelly, who was first accused of sexual assault in the nineties but managed to accumulate breathless accolades for many more years afterward. It is hideous, but true, that allegations of this sort have historically been treated differently when the accused is a virtuosic and deeply beloved male performer: Miles Davis allegedly beat his wives; Jimmy Page allegedly had a relationship with a fourteen-year-old girl; the late rapper XXXTentacion allegedly battered his ex-girlfriend when she was pregnant; Chuck Berry was convicted of transporting a minor across state lines for “immoral purposes”; and on, and on, and on, until the entire history of Western music collapses in a haze of abuse and transgression, unable to survive any sort of moral dragnet. In Jackson’s case, for the public fully to accept these charges as true would mean reversing our hardwired reactions to pop songs as rhythmically transcendent as “Don’t Stop ’Til You Get Enough,” or “Smooth Criminal,” or “Wanna Be Startin’ Somethin’ ”—to willfully and painstakingly transform a long-held, almost instinctive response (joy, exhilaration, deep pleasure) into disgust.

I suspect that it’s finally time for that terrible arithmetic to begin. But the conundrum of how to receive and metabolize art generated by abusive men is made even more complicated when those conversations are happening posthumously, and when the men involved were not tried for their alleged transgressions. In 2003, after the airing of another documentary, Jackson was charged with molesting Gavin Arvizo—a thirteen-year-old cancer survivor—and other counts of child molestation and providing alcohol to minors. At the time, the Santa Barbara district attorney, Thomas W. Sneddon, Jr., had been investigating Jackson for more than a decade, starting in 1993, when Jackson was first accused of molesting a thirteen-year-old boy. (That witness and his family accepted a civil settlement, reportedly valued at more than twenty million dollars, which ended the criminal investigation.)

Sneddon sent forty police vehicles to Neverland Ranch, Jackson’s three-thousand-acre estate near Los Olivos, California. Officers searched the property but didn’t find evidence of any illegal activities. The subsequent investigation went on for two years. The actor Macaulay Culkin and Robson, who was by that time twenty-two and a successful choreographer, both testified on behalf of the defense, claiming that they had each shared a bed with Jackson but had never been molested. The comedians George Lopez and Chris Tucker also gave testimony in court, claiming they, too, had felt extorted by the Arvizo family after donating to Gavin’s cancer fund. Jackson was eventually found not guilty on all counts. Thomas A. Mesereau, Jr., Jackson’s lawyer, called the Arvizos “con artists, actors, and liars.” Of course, even if Jackson didn’t molest Arvizo, that doesn’t mean that he didn’t molest Robson and Safechuck. But it is the only trial verdict on this issue that we have.

Michael Jackson and James Safechuck. Photograph Courtesy HBO

Although Reed knows better, perhaps, than to interrogate the behavior of alleged child victims, “Leaving Neverland” is a striking (if inadvertent) indictment of Robson’s and Safechuck’s family members, who accepted and enjoyed the many material perks of Jackson’s fame. They appeared strangely comfortable with the idea of Jackson sharing his bed with kids he barely knew and allowed Robson and Safechuck to spend days or weeks alone with Jackson at Neverland Ranch. I was made distinctly uncomfortable by many of the nonsexual disclosures of “Leaving Neverland”—the way Jackson charmed and isolated the children, how he plied their families with extravagant gifts, how he routinely brought young boys on tour as “travelling companions.”

Robson was called upon to testify on Jackson’s behalf twice—first in 1993, and again in 2005. Both times, he asserted under oath that Jackson had never molested him. The shame, confusion, and rage endured by survivors of childhood sexual abuse is often boundless, and, if Robson was molested, it’s obvious why he might bury or deny those memories. “I was excited by the idea of being able to defend him, being able to save him,” Robson says of his first testimony, when he was eleven. The second time, it’s clear that he felt enormous pressure from his mother, who told Robson that he might be the only person left who could save Jackson. They agreed that Jackson would never survive prison.

In “Leaving Neverland,” Robson says that he hadn’t yet come to understand his experience as abuse. “I didn’t feel like I was hurt by it, that it was anything bad that had happened to me,” he says. “I loved Michael, Michael loved me, this was something that happened between us—that’s it.” By the time of the second trial, Robson was an influential figure in pop-music circles, having helped to repopularize the pop-and-lock, a jerky but exacting style of hip-hop dance, which was then being embraced by boy bands and pop ingénues. Robson choreographed Britney Spears’s Super Bowl commercial for Pepsi, in 2001, and her video for “I’m a Slave 4 U”; he directed ’NSync’s “No Strings Attached” tour, which was then the second-highest-grossing tour in North America; he starred in his own MTV show, called “The Wade Robson Project.” (There was even conjecture that Robson contributed to the breakup of Spears and Justin Timberlake, who dated from 1999 to 2002; Timberlake may have written “Cry Me a River” about their affair, although he has never disclosed any details about the song’s exact meaning.) It wasn’t until 2012 that Robson—by then a husband and father, and suffering from severe depression and anxiety—publicly reversed his earlier statements. Safechuck also got married and had a child before coming forward with his accusations.

The Jackson estate has responded to “Leaving Neverland” with vitriol. Howard Weitzman, an attorney for the family, released a ten-page letter lambasting the film and its creators. “We know that this will go down as the most shameful episode in HBO’s history. We know that Michael’s devoted fans, and all good people in the world, will not swiftly forgive HBO for its conduct,” he wrote. Online, Jackson’s many fervent acolytes have been actively defending his legacy, attacking Reed, Robson, Safechuck, and anyone writing favorably about the film. Smoke does not mean fire, they insist, especially with someone who was as rich and famous as Jackson. For them, Jackson is the only actual victim.

Trial by popular opinion is excruciating, and Robson says that he only spoke out in order to empower other survivors to come forward. “I want to be able to speak the truth as loud as I had to speak the lie,” he says in the film. “Leaving Neverland” is a gruesome and fascinating document. Independent of how it might lead us to reassess our relationship with Jackson’s music, it feels important that these men are able to tell their stories, however many years later, in whatever way they choose."
50,https://www.digitalmusicnews.com/2019/02/22/michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-hbo-lawsuit/,"['Daniel Is An Avid Writer Who Was Born', 'Raised In Los Angeles.', 'Alongside Writing', 'He Is Also A Passionate Reader', 'An English Teacher For Ell Students. He Dedicates His Spare Time To Raising His Two Bagirls.']",2019-02-22 00:00:00,"The Michael Jackson Estate Sues HBO for More Than $100 Million over ‘Leaving Neverland’

The Michael Jackson estate has made good on its promise, taking HBO to court in Los Angeles.

In the documentary Leaving Neverland, director/producer Dan Reed investigates how the late pop singer reportedly started a relationship with two young boys – aged 7 and 10 – along with their families. At the peak of his fame, the two men – now in their 30s – claim that the King of Pop sexually abused them multiple times.

Both men – Wade Robson and James Safechuck – have previously testified that the singer hadn’t inappropriately touched them.

Following its last-minute addition to the Sundance Film Festival, the exposé left audiences shellshocked and the Michael Jackson estate furious.

HBO and the UK’s Channel 4 quickly picked up the rights to air the controversial four-hour documentary this spring.

Soon thereafter, the Michael Jackson estate vowed to sue HBO should it move forward with its plans to air Leaving Neverland.

Now, with HBO set to air the documentary, the late King of Pop’s family has made good on their promise.

Suing HBO over an agreement made in 1992.

The estate of Michael Jackson has sued HBO for violating a non-disparagement clause. This comes from the cable network’s decision to air Leaving Neverland.

Forcing HBO to litigate in a public arbitration process, Jackson’s family has asked for $100 million or more in damages.

Nevertheless, the cable network has confirmed that its “plans remained unchanged” to air the documentary. In fact, HBO has moved up the dates of Leaving Neverland’s premiere on the network.

“Despite the desperate lengths taken to undermine the film, our plans remain unchanged. HBO will move forward with the airing of ‘Leaving Neverland,’ the two-part documentary, on March 3rd and 4th. “This will allow everyone the opportunity to assess the film and the claims in it for themselves.”

According to Jackson’s family, in its decision to air Michael Jackson in Concert in Bucharest: The Dangerous Tour in 1992, HBO agreed to a non-disparagement agreement.

Filed at Los Angeles Superior Court, the lawsuit claims Leaving Neverland is based on false accusations. In addition, Jackson’s accusers allegedly have a financial motive to lie about the abuse.

Slamming the cable network for overlooking factual evidence, Howard Weitzman, an attorney for the Jackson estate, stated,"
51,https://www.washingtonpost.com/entertainment/tv/a-devastating-and-credible-leaving-neverland-will-turn-you-off-michael-jackson-for-good/2019/02/27/1b3809f4-393a-11e9-aaae-69364b2ed137_story.html,"['Hank Stuever', 'Tv Critic', ""Hank Stuever Has Been The Washington Post'S Tv Critic Since He Joined The Paper In As A Reporter For The Style Section"", 'Where He Covered Popular Culture.']",2019-02-27 00:00:00,"

Michael Jackson poses for a photo with a young Wade Robson. (HBO)

TV critic

It’s remarkable what happens when you take Michael Jackson out of the latest Michael Jackson scandal. Remove the usual “King of Pop” soundtrack and all that glitters, and things get so much clearer. The details are still appalling, but what we see and hear in Dan Reed’s riveting and sharply convincing four-hour documentary, “Leaving Neverland” (airing in two parts Sunday and Monday on HBO), supplies the viewer with an unexpected measure of calm. Even the outrage feels at last like the real deal, instead of the manufactured byproduct of tabloids and TMZ.

Already the talk of this year’s Sundance Film Festival, “Leaving Neverland” is the story of two men — noted pop choreographer Wade Robson, 36, and James “Jimmy” Safechuck, 41 — who each tell us, with the resolute certainty that they lacked as younger witnesses deposed and questioned in other cases, that Jackson sexually molested them when they were boys, starting in the late 1980s and early 1990s and continuing into their teenage years.

What they are talking about is not just the creepy affection, playful roughhousing and tender hand-holding we were once told was the innocent expression of love between a man (Jackson), who sacrificed his own childhood to bring joy to millions, and the star-struck boys he was thus entitled to enjoy as special pals. What we get this time are disturbing, graphic and wholly consistent accounts of the predation, grooming and rape of two children by a man who wielded considerable psychological control over everyone in his environment — including the boys’ parents.

To a certain degree, “Leaving Neverland” is potentially more devastating than even “Surviving R. Kelly,” the Lifetime documentary that aired in January and seemed to do what a mountain of previous reporting and victim accounts could not, resulting in Kelly’s Feb. 22 arrest and charges of 10 counts of alleged criminal sexual abuse of four victims — three of them minors — dating to 1998.



From left, Wade Robson, director Dan Reed and James Safechuck at the Sundance Film Festival in January to promote “Leaving Neverland.” (Taylor Jewell/Invision/Associated Press)

A similar heap of past journalistic efforts, to say nothing of Jackson’s acquittal in a prolonged and hotly prosecuted 2005 molestation trial, accompanies the unsettling facts that “Leaving Neverland” presents so unflinchingly. To say that we’ve all been here before and that many suspected this all along is an understatement; we simply have not been told this story in quite this way, at this level of frank detail.

The biggest difference between then and now, of course, is that Jackson is dead, having succumbed to a lethal dose of tranquilizers at age 50.

It’s impossible, therefore, to not view “Leaving Neverland” in the context of the #MeToo movement, which emphasizes extrajudicial respect for what victims tell us about past abuse and its lingering damages. (Indeed, to watch the entire film requires a steeled resolve from the viewer; there’s a warning at the beginning about the graphic descriptions and language.) It’s also impossible to watch “Leaving Neverland” and not think that Jackson’s goose — if it were available — is cooked. It’s no different from what we’ve already seen with such powerful boldface names as Harvey Weinstein, Kevin Spacey and Bill Cosby.

A goose of another sort is, of course, in jeopardy here — the golden one of royalties and publishing rights — which is perhaps why some of Jackson’s siblings and a nephew are giving interviews to defend his stature, noting that Robson already came out with his allegations in 2013 and then unsuccessfully sued Jackson’s estate for damages. The Jacksons object to “Leaving Neverland” as yet another opportunistic grab for Jackson’s considerable fortunes (which skyrocketed once the singer was gone and unable to squander his millions). The Jacksons have also claimed, in a lawsuit, that HBO has violated a nondisparagement clause in a deal it signed many years ago to air a Michael Jackson concert.

There’s a familiar echo in the Jackson family’s protest — a strategy Robson and Safechuck remember from being persuaded to defend Michael in court and depositions whenever he felt threatened: In Michael’s world, his enemies live to make up terrible lies so that they can steal his money and ruin his name. In that fragile falsetto that became his public speaking voice, Michael decried his haters long before it was cool to have haters, playing his charitable side to an advantage.

How could I harm a child, he complained, when I love them so much?

None of that self-pitying, saccharine logic stands up to the astonishing and empathetic discipline of ""Leaving Neverland,"" which remains focused all four hours on listening to Robson and Safechuck, along with their mothers, family members and spouses.

Here, at last, is the Michael Jackson documentary that has little to no use for the routine adulation of Michael Jackson, particularly the dazzling songs, performances and other proprietary clips that would form the basis of a celebrity rockumentary. Robson and Safechuck talk at some length about their awe for the star, shared by children everywhere, and it is more effective than the brief clip of ""Thriller"" that survives the cut.

Instead, “Leaving Neverland” makes excellent use of scrapbooks, personal photographs, videos, recorded phone messages, faxes, letters and other assorted ephemera kept by the men and their families — particularly their moms, who, by the film’s end must account for the blind trust that made the abuse possible.

For much of the documentary’s first two hours (Sunday’s episode), Robson and Safechuck recount the happy beginnings of their separate friendships with Michael.

In Brisbane, Australia, a 5-year-old Robson won a shopping-mall dance contest in 1987 that included tickets to see Jackson in concert and meet him backstage. Two years later, on a repeat encounter, Robson — now 7 and sporting a perm so his hair would look more his idol’s — got another chance to meet Jackson and impress him with his dance moves. Before they could process what was happening, the middle-class Robson family was whisked away to America and Jackson’s inner circle. It wasn’t long before Wade and Michael were sleeping together in hotel suites — increasingly distanced from the rest of the family.

Jimmy Safechuck’s story is similar: He was the son of a hairstylist and junk hauler in Simi Valley, Calif., working occasionally as a child model and actor in commercials. He was cast in a Pepsi commercial in which Michael discovers a handsome boy snooping around in his dressing room, and the two become instant friends. Jackson was so drawn to Jimmy that he invited the Safechuck family on the “Bad” tour, for which Jimmy was given a cameo role dancing onstage.



Jackson invited James “Jimmy” Safechuck onto his “Bad” tour. (HBO)

His mother, Stephanie Safechuck, recalls in the film her early insistence that her son could not stay overnight in Jackson’s bed; she drew a line that was somehow quickly erased. Staying with Michael in a Paris hotel suite, Jimmy recalls, “[Michael] introduced me to masturbation and that’s how it started. . . . He set it up like, ‘I’m going to show you something everybody does, and you’ll really enjoy it.’ It was like he was teaching me something new.”

Robson also specifically remembers the first time Jackson molested him, which began with fondling: “And then him guiding me to do the same thing to him, moving my hands to touch his penis,” Robson says. “Him talking to me [saying] ‘You and I were brought together by God. We were meant to be together. . . . This is how we show love.’”

A compelling aspect of “Leaving Neverland” is the similarity of the boys’ accounts of these encounters — and how they mirror accounts that came later, in 1993 (from an alleged victim, Jordan Chandler, whose parents settled out of court for an undisclosed amount believed to be as high as $25 million) and in 2005 (from an alleged victim, Gavin Arvizo, whose tentative and inconsistent testimony failed to sway a Santa Barbara County Superior Court jury). The Michael Jackson molestation stories all wind up being eerily alike — the disarming ability to charm, the showering of gifts for the whole family, the air of innocence and friendship that made it all seem okay.

Wade’s mother, Joy Robson, is a fascinating study in the gullibility that comes with being star-struck and treated to first-class service. By the time Jackson is routinely molesting her child, he has persuaded her to relocate with Wade and his sister to California, splitting up the Robson family, which possibly contributed to her husband Dennis’s mental decline. (He killed himself in 2002.)

Even now, both men talk about Jackson with a measure of care that can be heartbreaking. They each felt like they were in a relationship with him, a special bond. Safechuck opens a small box full of expensive rings that Jackson gave him, including one that the two used in a private, mock wedding ceremony.

The breakups, too, came with a hurt that felt authentic. As Jimmy got older, the Safechucks had less access to Jackson’s largesse; a new boy became Michael’s constant companion, and the boy’s family, Stephanie recalls, “reminded me of us.”

Not long after Robson’s family arrived in California, they got a chillier reception from Jackson’s camp, discovering that another, much more famous boy — the actor Macaulay Culkin — had become Michael’s new best friend. (The film notes that Culkin denies any sexual abuse by Jackson.)

As the years went by, both the Robsons and Safechucks were rewarded for their loyalty (and testimony), but by then, Michael existed in a different universe — married twice and the father of three. Both Wade and Jimmy met and married supportive women (both interviewed here) and became fathers. But both also struggled with their secrets. The last hour of the film focuses on what happened in each family as the men finally revealed what happened — the anger, the blame, the fallout. “It still feels a whole lot better than the lie did,” Robson says.

“I didn’t protect my son,” Stephanie says. “That will always, always haunt me. I had one job, I had one child, and I f----- up. I had all these months of loving my life with Michael and traveling and living the good life, so to speak. . . . It was all based on the suffering of my son. [Jimmy] had to suffer to have this life.”

Jimmy is asked whether he blames his parents for what happened. After a pause, he replies, “I’m still working on it.”



Michael Jackson leaves court in California on April 8, 2005. (Carlo Allegri/Getty Images)

Taking all this in, one can and should wonder: What about the music?

“Leaving Neverland” offers what might be the ultimate litmus test for consumers who keep finding themselves torn between loving the art and deploring the artist. In the grocery store and everywhere else where ’80s music continues to be a default setting, I’m already hearing something newly disdainful in the ubiquitous playback of Jackson’s later hits (mostly from “Thriller” and “Bad”).

With Robson and Safechuck’s words and descriptions still rattling around in my head, I can easily envision a world with 95 percent less “Smooth Criminal” in it. I’ve heard enough Michael Jackson to last the rest of my years. Maybe you have, too.

Sometimes I wonder whether I wasted the small chunk of my career spent at the computer keyboard thinking and writing about Michael Jackson, usually on deadline. He was, after all, the biggest celebrity on the planet. That’s important to keep in mind while watching “Leaving Neverland” and harshly judging Stephanie Safechuck and Joy Robson for not resisting the gravitational pull of Michael Jackson.

For reporters, he was always a story, whether you were poking around for more info into whatever allegations there were (or the disastrous finances, or any of the bizarre events, up to and including dangling his youngest son, Blanket, from a Berlin hotel balcony), or trying to discern meaning in his devolving physical appearance and behavior. (Were his insecurities telling us something about race, or about parental abuse, or closeted sexuality, or maybe about the very nature of self-identity? To intellectualize and interpret him was its own art form.)

Or covering his appearances in court. During the 2005 trial, which several Washington Post reporters (including me) covered in shifts lasting two to three weeks each, I watched as prosecutors grappled with what seemed to be the right charges with the wrong witnesses.

At the trial, seriousness competed with silliness. I was there the day Michael tested the judge’s patience by showing up more than an hour late, wearing fancy pajama bottoms. I was there the day Gavin Arvizo (as a child, he was referred to anonymously during the proceedings) gave an account that echoes much of what Robson and Safechuck so meticulously describe — down to the grooming techniques, sworn secrecy, sex acts and even the pet nicknames Michael gave to his special boys (Applehead, Doo-Doo Head).

One afternoon I got a seat directly behind Jackson and his parents. He was maybe 10 feet away. Usually there’s an ineffable spark when a celebrity that big is that close. But I couldn’t get a fix on his presence — mainly because there was no presence. Just powder, just bones in a suit. I remember writing down that he might as well be dead.

Then, sooner than anyone expected to publish one, there was the obituary. Co-writing it came as a kind of relief. Even in death, Michael was murder on East Coast print deadlines, always breaking his own news in the early evening as pages were closing and presses were running. As we threw together 2,000 words on his happy/sad life and career, I couldn’t help but think: At least I won’t have to write about him ever again.

Yet here we are — and with good reason. Turn off the music and listen to these men.

Correction: An earlier version of this review misreported the first name of Wade Robson’s late father, Dennis Robson. The article has been updated.

Leaving Neverland (four hours) airs in two parts Sunday and Monday at 8 p.m. on HBO."
52,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/02/14/theater/michael-jackson-chicago-musical-cancelled.html,['Michael Paulson'],2019-02-14 00:00:00,"The Michael Jackson estate, facing questions prompted by a new documentary detailing abuse allegations against the singer, announced Thursday that it was canceling a planned Chicago tryout of a new jukebox musical about him.

The estate and its producing partner, Columbia Live Stage, said that they would instead aim to bring the musical straight to Broadway in the summer of 2020.

The reason for the change in plans, the producers said in a statement, was not the documentary but “scheduling difficulties” caused by a labor dispute. A five-week job action by Actors’ Equity, which was resolved last week, delayed a planned developmental lab for the show, and the producers decided they needed more time before staging the full show.

The musical, called “Don’t Stop ’Til You Get Enough,” has a highly credentialed creative team. The book is by Lynn Nottage, a two-time Pulitzer Prize winning playwright with a history of deeply researching the subject matters she writes about, and the director and choreographer is Christopher Wheeldon, a prominent English artist who won a Tony Award for choreographing a stage adaptation of “An American in Paris.”"
53,https://www.hotnewhiphop.com/michael-jacksons-leaving-neverland-what-can-we-expect-news.71557.html,['Robert Blair'],2019-02-13 15:03:36+00:00,"The Sundance Film Festival has never been deterred by the threat of controversy. Founded by Hollywood icon Robert Redford, the event has been a stronghold for provocative independent films, ranging from Kevin Smith’s supposedly blasphemous “Red State,” “The Blair Witch Project,” “The Birth Of A Nation” and the routinely explicit work of Lars Von Trier. With that said, arguably no production has brought as much controversy to Park City, Utah as Dan Reed’s Leaving Neverland. Helmed by the Emmy & BAFTA nominated director behind Terror In Mumbai and The Paedophile Hunter, the new documentary has come under fire from Michael Jackson’s most fervent supporters. As a result, the local police precinct has been placed on “high alert.”

Complete with placards emblazoned with the slogan “Seek Truth, Think For Yourself,” the efforts of those in Utah coincide with fans plastering hashtags #BoycottSundanceFilmFestival and #StopLeavingNeverlandNOW across Twitter and Facebook. For hardened MJ fans, the problem lies in what the film has set out to accomplish. “Through gut-wrenching interviews with the now-adult men and their families,” reads the official synopsis, “Leaving Neverland crafts a portrait of sustained exploitation and deception.” Ten years after his death, and fourteen after Jackson was found not guilty of sexual abuse allegations, the documentary has once again shone a light on the rumored perversions that once plagued the Neverland Ranch.

Carlo Allegri/Getty Images

Set to be aired in March on HBO, the preamble surrounding its widespread release has given us a good idea of what to expect, the revelations it has yielded and why Jackson’s family and unflinchingly devoted fans are up in arms. For its British director, the origin of Leaving Neverland’s production was a simple desire to disperse the lingering ambiguity around Michael Jackson’s relationship with children. Detailed in a post-premiere Q&A, Reed elaborated on how he found the story of the two alleged victims that would form the basis of the documentary:

“I came across a reference in one of the forums to a court case held by Wade (Robson) and James (Safechuck). I thought ‘that’s strange, I didn’t know about this’ and this might mean that, for the first time, someone might be able to tell the story of what actually happened. About a year later, I found myself sitting in front of them with a camera and this extraordinary story began.”

The stories he’s referring to are that of two men claiming to have been molested by the global icon in the 1990s. Upon the news that screenings of this two-part, four-hour long documentary would come equipped with therapists, it was safe to assume that this would be a no-holds-barred account of the abuse that Robson and Safechuck were said to have been subjected to. Filled with revelations that prompted Indiewire Film Critic David Ehrlich to remark that he’d “need 400 showers to ever feel clean again”, his ensuing review spares no details as to what viewers can expect. Rather than cast any reasonable doubt, Ehrlich presents the film’s content as unequivocal fact, no matter how depraved or unsettling it may be.

Where dispatches from his 2005 trial scratched the surface of his alleged crimes, Leaving Neverland sheds searing light on his infamous “sleepovers,” mock wedding ceremonies and regimented systems of abuse that came equipped with “drills” on how to get dressed quickly should they be interrupted. In the second part, the film moves away from the accusations themselves and focuses on the ramifications that this alleged abuse had on the lives of these kids and their families. When it comes to what the alleged victims are getting out of this, James Safechuck- who first encountered Jackson on the set of a Pepsi commercial- has vehemently denied that it’s some exploitative cash-in. “From the get-go, there was no money ever offered and we never expected anything,” he explains. “It was really trying to tell the story and shine a light on it. To give people [who have survived abuse] the same connection and comfort we’ve got going through this.”

Met by a standing ovation from Sundance audience members, the pair has been receiving commendations for their bravery from viewers and critics alike. Yet Michael Jackson’s estate has portrayed them as far more malicious figures. In the wake of the film’s premiere, the family has unreservedly discredited it as a “public lynching,” making every attempt to undermine the accusers’ credibility by citing the legal proceedings of the past. “The creators of this film were not interested in the truth. They never interviewed a single solitary soul who knew Michael except for the two perjurers and their families,” reads a statement from the Jackson estate. “That is not journalism, and it’s not fair, yet the media are perpetuating these stories. But the truth is on our side. Go do your research about these opportunists. The facts don’t lie, people do. Michael Jackson was and always will be 100% innocent of these false allegations.”

Amid labeling the film as salacious, the estate has also been quick to reiterate that “the two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred.” Elsewhere, many of those close to Michael have come to his defense, refuting the notion that he could’ve been a pedophile. Across podcasts, social media posts and television appearances, everyone from his sperm donor Mark Lester to older brother Jermaine have rubbished the documentary’s findings, with the latter pleading for everyone to leave Michael’s legacy alone in an emotional on-air speech. Left enraged by the film, Tito Jackson’s son Taj has assigned himself the task of exposing the truth about his uncle’s life via an opposing documentary. Envisioned as a way to “conclusively destroy decades of salacious myths which have been told and sold about Michael Jackson ad nauseam,” he has set up a GoFundMe in order to aid his progress; at the time of writing, he has amassed $46,000 of his $777,000 goal.

In a more grassroots campaign, everyday supporters of the legendary artist have rallied behind him through an online petition that calls for the film to be shelved. Titled “End The Defamation Of Michael Jackson,” the contrast between the oppositional front of these 57,000 vocal supporters and the praise it’s receiving from audiences epitomizes why this film carries a real sense of occasion. Predestined to have millions tuning in, the morbid fascination it has conjured up is no mean feat. Whatever side of the fence you’re on, March will give us all a chance to witness Leaving Neverland in all of its heinous detail. It’s our job to objectively make up our minds as to whether we’re witnessing opportunism or a matter that could irrevocably change Jackson’s legacy as we’ve come to know it."
54,https://www.theguardian.com/music/2019/mar/01/leaving-neverland-is-it-still-ok-to-listen-to-michael-jackson,"['Alexis Petridis', 'Lyndsey Winship', 'Priya Elan', 'Laura Snapes', 'Simran Hans', 'Greg Tate']",2019-03-01 00:00:00,"His records were woven into the lives of millions – but Leaving Neverland appears to make clear the King of Pop was a paedophile. So can we divorce the music from his alleged crimes?

Greg Tate: ‘We recognised MJ’s special kind of self-destruction decades ago’

All forced conversations in America about race, sex and celebrity are inevitably framed by horror and absurdity, history and the modern day. Because of this, many of my people – as in American born Blackfolk – refuse to countenance moral or legal absolutes when allegations of our stars committing sexual assault hit the news. They instead invoke a form of mathematical objectivity in pursuit of American democracy’s most impossible dream: a racialised level playing field. In this accounting, Bill Cosby and R Kelly aren’t defended despite victim-testimony and compelling evidence, but because not enough equally evil-ass white men have suffered enough public shaming for their crimes.

So Michael Jackson’s legacy is being discussed in another judicial session and once again black folk are being asked to weigh in on the latest charges. The thing is our community recognised MJ’s special kind of self-destruction decades ago. Many Blackfolk learned to compartmentalise Jackson the moment they saw the cover of Thriller; they separated the spectacular soul singer and dancing machine from his increasingly mad choices, including self-erasing skin-bleaching facelifts, chin enhancements and rhinoplasty. Would the brown-skinned, big-lipped, wide-nosed MJ who appears on the cover of Off the Wall have been allowed by white parents to have as much unsupervised time with their pre-tweens? Would he have been trusted to disappear into his mansion for hours days and nights with them?

Having seen only the trailer for Leaving Neverland, whatever confessional justice was intended by its two informants is compromised by its director’s hackneyed, tabloid true-crime approach. It doesn’t mean the testimony is untrue, just that it depends on the film-makers selling several racially burdened oxymorons at once: white-male innocence, white-male fragility and white-male truth-telling. Of course, MJ doesn’t belong just to the court of white public opinion or to the miscreant deeds he may have perpetrated at Neverland. He got connected to something far bigger than himself way back during his Motown years: he became an inextractable and irrevocable piece of Blackfolk’s story that can only be crooned, shouted, stomped, screamed and sanctified into the public record.

Greg Tate is a New York-based writer and musician. He was a staff writer at The Village Voice from 1987-2003

Facebook Twitter Pinterest The Jackson Five with Michael Jackson on the far right. Photograph: NBC/NBC via Getty Images

Alexis Petridis: ‘Too many people have too much of their lives bound up with his music’

About five years ago, I interviewed a collection of diehard Gary Glitter fans, unbowed by the singer’s convictions for possession of child pornography and sexual abuse. Some of them were clearly in denial about his crimes. Most weren’t, though, and talked calmly about separating the artist from the art. One told me that when Glitter was first convicted, he had thrown out all his records, only to find his music exerting an allure regardless. “You don’t choose music,” he said. “It chooses you.” Later he added: “It’s not just wiping him out of history, is it? It’s us, they’re whitewashing us as well. They’ve nicked 15, 20 years of my history.”

I thought about that remark when the furore around the Leaving Neverland documentary blew up. More compelling allegations that Jackson was a paedophile will undoubtedly lead to more calls for his music to be treated the way Glitter’s is – unofficially banned from radio and TV, never mentioned in public (even the Glitter fans I met would only talk to me under a veil of anonymity). I can see why, but I don’t think it’s going to happen. You can’t easily eradicate Jackson from history: too many people have too much of their lives bound up with his music. And perhaps you shouldn’t. Perhaps it is all right that his music continues to be heard, so long as it comes with a caveat: that it reminds us great art can be made by terrible people, that talent can be weaponised in the most appalling way, that believing an artist automatically embodies goodness because we like their work is a dreadful mistake that can have awful consequences.

Alexis Petridis is the Guardian’s chief pop critic

Facebook Twitter Pinterest Akram Khan. Photograph: Tristram Kenton/The Guardian

Lyndsey Winship: ‘Choosing to listen to his music is a personal reckoning’

Separating man and music is difficult when that man’s output amounts to a cultural phenomenon and his influence went way beyond music. Jackson brought black dance styles into the mainstream. He didn’t invent steps like the moonwalk but he was responsible for bringing them to the world’s attention. He inspired people to dance – especially boys, especially non-white ones – and he is cited by some of the superlative performers of their generation as the person who sparked their desire to move. From Cuban ballet star Carlos Acosta to kathak-contemporary dancer Akram Khan, from the back streets of Havana to suburban Wimbledon, Jackson’s reach was immense.



But, the allegations against him are hideous. Abuse can never be excused. As a society, what we consume and what we celebrate is what forms our values. Does that mean a ban on his music? It is impossible to erase from our consciousness (and much of its brilliance was created by others – Quincy Jones, Rod Temperton – not Jackson alone), but choosing to now actively listen to, or dance to Jackson? Once people have seen the film, that will be a personal reckoning, yet it must be possible to condemn the person, even shelve the records, without being ashamed of the influence his music had on us, the good things he inspired and the careers he started.

Lyndsey Winship is the Guardian’s dance critic

Facebook Twitter Pinterest Off the Wall.

Priya Elan: ‘My initial reaction was to throw Off the Wall in the bin’

My pop allegiances were always with Prince and Madonna, but I came of age when Bad-era Michael Jackson was massive. He transcended race, he transcended gender and for me he transcended a personal connection. Being a fan of his felt like being a fan of a skyscraper or a corporation. You could admire its foundations, its height, the sheer spectacle, but it would be harder to love the bones of it. He was unlike Prince and Madonna, who seemed to let their freakish rebellion hang out with a carefree abandon.

Later in life, I couldn’t resist Thriller and Off the Wall. Spurred on by Spike Lee’s documentary of the making of latter, I fell in love with the magical disco grooves and the story of the child star turned spangly king of the dancefloor. Watching Leaving Neverland, I felt an allegiance with the survivors: their story of manipulation, control and parental neglect is a familiar tripartite to those who have experienced emotional or physical abuse as children. By the end of the unrelenting four hours, I was broken by the story of grown men and parents trying to examine the scars of their past. My initial reaction was to throw Off the Wall in the bin (I didn’t), but the next day, listening to a 70s soul compilation whose first song was the Jacksons’ Blame it on the Boogie, it was to skip that track. I couldn’t go there.

Priya Elan is editor of the Guardian Guide

Facebook Twitter Pinterest Michael Jackson arrives to give a lecture at the Oxford University in 2001. Photograph: Russell Boyce/Reuters

Laura Snapes: ‘It’s a cautionary tale against idol worship’

I have never really associated Jackson with his music. I was born in 1989, and grew up in a pop landscape where he was decreasingly visible. His songs remained totemic, but so much so that it rarely occurred to me that they had been made by humans, the same way that I never wondered who designed the McDonald’s logo, or what’s really in a can of Coke. The first time I really became aware of Jackson the man was in the build-up to Martin Bashir’s 2003 documentary, which my parents wouldn’t let me watch because it was “inappropriate”. Obviously, I watched it anyway. Since then, I have always associated Jackson with allegations of paedophilia, and so I never sought out his albums.



Still, the irresistibility of his music crept up on me. The irresistible power Jackson brought to his music is the same power he wielded to abuse children and hoodwink their families into letting him do so. It is the same power that afforded him a coterie of enablers with a vested financial interest in ensuring that the public perceived these allegations to be ridiculous. Jackson’s greatest legacy is as an unparalleled example of how the entertainment industry prioritises profit over pain. It’s a cautionary tale against idol worship, and a reminder to question figures who willingly exploit that dynamic. This is the point where, for me, the man and the music become inextricable, and for ever inadmissible.

Laura Snapes is deputy music editor of the Guardian

Facebook Twitter Pinterest Michael Jackson’s Thriller. Photograph: Alamy Stock Photo

Chuck Klosterman: ‘He is too massive to cancel’

The possibility of separating an artist’s work from the artist’s life isn’t a practical question right now. We are at a point (either temporarily or in perpetuity) when people don’t want to engage with that debate. The conflict still exists and the philosophical puzzle hasn’t changed, but the public argument is pretty much over. What is specifically complicated about the Michael Jackson scenario is the sheer magnitude of his footprint. Even if every worldwide streaming service removed his songs and Apple Music terminated his catalogue, there are still at least 60m physical copies of Thriller scattered around the globe. He is too massive to cancel.

'He was a master manipulator’: Abducted in Plain Sight and the truth about abuse Read more

What will happen, I suspect, is that the ever-increasing population of transgressive musicians (both living and dead) who find themselves recast as irredeemably problematic will eventually be lumped into a separate silo of cultural history. The unspoken rule will be that their work can be consumed and analysed, but not without overtly recognising that they are members of this exiled fraternity. It will be somewhat similar to how a film student can still reference the cinematography of Leni Riefenstahl, but only after first noting her political relationships. Jackson’s work is brilliant and unusually ubiquitous, so people will always want to talk about it. They just won’t be able to talk about that music to the exclusion of non-musical events, which will incrementally change its musical meaning.

Charles Klosterman is an author and essayist. His most recent book is But What If We’re Wrong?

Facebook Twitter Pinterest Wade Robson, director Dan Reed and James Safechuck. Photograph: Taylor Jewell/Invision/AP

Simran Hans: ‘I’m no longer able to square the art with the artist’

I watched Leaving Neverland on my birthday, a bruising 9am screening at the Sundance film festival. The experience was, as you might imagine, somewhat of a downer. Yet, what’s both fascinating and illuminating about this film is the precision with which its two central survivors, James Safechuck and Wade Robson, describe the doublethink of abuse. Survivors can hold two contradictory thoughts in their heads; Michael Jackson was “one of the kindest, most gentle, caring, loving people I knew”, says Safechuck matter of factly. He was also a paedophile, and an abuser. If you weren’t convinced of Jackson’s guilt before (and many of us were), it is near impossible to turn a blind eye to it now, so powerful and incriminating are the testimonies the director, Dan Reed, presents.

There is also a contradiction, or at least a tension present for Jackson fans such as myself when revisiting his art. To detach Jackson’s tarnished celebrity persona from his music and reappraise it as pure and faceless pop commerce because it is more comfortable doesn’t feel right. Listening to him doesn’t feel right, either. I’m not calling for him to be “cancelled” but personally I’m no longer able to square the art with the artist; it doesn’t exist in a vacuum. Jackson made brilliant, titanic pop, and he sexually abused children. People have known both of these things for years. Nothing has changed except the times in which the work is being received.

Simran Hans is a film critic for the Observer

This article was amended on 4 March 2019 because James Safechuck was referred to as Safechurch.



"
55,https://www.indiewire.com/2019/02/leaving-neverland-trailer-michael-jackson-child-sex-abuse-documentary-1202045162/,['Zack Sharf'],2019-02-19 18:58:39+00:00,"Dan Reed's controversial documentary comes to HBO following a world premiere at the Sundance Film Festival earlier this year.

HBO has debuted the official trailer for “Leaving Neverland,” the four-hour documentary in which two men discuss in detail their relationship with Michael Jackson. The non-fiction feature, directed by “The Pedophile Hunter” and “Frontline Fighting” filmmaker Dan Reed, alleges Jackson sexually abused the documentary’s two subjects. The allegations in the film have turned it into one of the year’s most controversial offerings.

The official synopsis from HBO reads: “‘Leaving Neverland’ is a two-part documentary exploring the separate but parallel experiences of two young boys, James Safechuck, at age ten, and Wade Robson, at age seven, both of whom were befriended by Michael Jackson. Through gut-wrenching interviews with Safechuck, now 37, and Robson, now 41, as well as their mothers, wives and siblings, the film crafts a portrait of sustained abuse, exploring the complicated feelings that led both men to confront their experiences after both had a young son of his own.”

“Leaving Neverland” has proven controversial ever since the project was announced as a 2019 Sundance Film Festival world premiere. Michael Jackson’s estate has criticized the movie for featuring allegations of sexual abuse against the music icon. Despite pressure from the estate not to air the movie, HBO president Casey Bloys has remained committed to bringing the documentary to television.

“I don’t know where those reports came from, but there has been no wavering,” Bloys told IndieWire, adding HBO has “absolutely not” second-guessed their Sundance buy. “All I ask on this show is that people reserve judgement until they watch it, and after you see how powerful it is and how eloquent [the subjects] are about [describing] the abuse they suffered, it’s hard to argue with. Everybody has to watch it and make their own decisions.”

In his B+ review out of the Sundance Film Festival, IndieWire’s David Ehrlich said the documentary definitively proves Michael Jackson sexually abused children. “You’ll never listen to Michael Jackson the same way again,” Ehrlich wrote. “In fact, you may never listen to Michael Jackson again at all.”

“Leaving Neverland” will air March 3 and March 4 on HBO. Watch the official trailer below.

Sign Up: Stay on top of the latest breaking film and TV news! Sign up for our Email Newsletters here."
56,https://www.esquire.com/entertainment/movies/a26345515/leaving-neverland-michael-jackson-estate-hbo-lawsuit/,['Justin Kirkland'],2019-02-21 09:29:00,"HBO's publicity for the upcoming Michael Jackson-centric documentary Leaving Neverland may be damning for the Jackson estate, but with the premiere of the documentary on the horizon, the executors of the estate may have found a loophole to keep it from reaching any more eyes than it has already. According to The Hollywood Reporter, the Jackson family has filed a 52-page lawsuit against HBO, alleging that the documentary would ""constitute a breach of a non-disparagement clause.""

What that ultimately boils down to is complicated. The breach of contract would not particularly in regard to this documentary, but how this documentary affects a contract that the cable channel signed with the estate back in 1992 when it aired Michael Jackson in Concert in Bucharest: The Dangerous Tour. Part of that agreement included a clause that the cable network would not portray Jackson in a negative way.

No word on what the statute of limitations on that agreement was, but considering that the suit was filed for amounts that ""could exceed $100 million should HBO succeed in the damage it is intending to cause to the legacy of Michael Jackson,"" it's safe to assume there's some legal ties that bind. Even still, HBO stated to The Hollywood Reporter that it is still planning to air the documentary as planned.

The complaint filed by the estate, which begins by further asserting Jackson's innocence in the documentary's exploration of sexual abuse, goes on to connect the current documentary to The Dangerous Tour, alleging, ""HBO is profiting off the Dangerous World Tour by airing a 'documentary' that falsely claims Michael Jackson was abusing children on the same tour. It is hard to imagine a more direct violation of the non-disparagement clause.""

Leaving Neverland, which is slated to air in two parts on March 3 and 4 on HBO, is directed by Dan Reed and follows the accounts of James Safechuck and Wade Robson who claim to have been sexually abused by Jackson. They had filed lawsuits against the Jackson estate before both were ultimately dismissed in 2017.

"
57,https://www.washingtonpost.com/national/michael-jackson-estate-lawsuit-sues-hbo-over-documentary/2019/02/21/9e96f190-3618-11e9-8375-e3dcf6b68558_story.html,[],2019-02-21 00:00:00,
58,https://www.news8000.com/entertainment/arts/michael-jacksons-family-calls-documentary-a-public-lynching/1031765986,[],2019-02-22 02:26:53+00:00,"Tim Whitby/Getty Images Michael Jackson was Nicole Richie's godfather. The late King of Pop also picked famous godparents for his own children, Prince Michael and Paris.

Tim Whitby/Getty Images Michael Jackson was Nicole Richie's godfather. The late King of Pop also picked famous godparents for his own children, Prince Michael and Paris.

One of the most talked-about documentaries of the year hasn't even released yet.

HBO's forthcoming ""Leaving Neverland"" examines disturbing claims by James Safechuck and Wade Robson that Michael Jackson sexually abused them over a period of several years when they were children.

The documentary, which was screened at the Sundance Film Festival last week, has revived conversation about whether Jackson was a predatory pedophile.

Jackson's family released a statement Monday condemning the film.

""Michael always turned the other cheek, and we have always turned the other cheek when people have gone after members of our family - that is the Jackson way,"" the statement said. ""But we can't just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him.""

Robson, now 41, first met Jackson when he was about five years old in his native Australia. He said he stayed with Jackson at his Neverland Ranch in California on several occasions.

Safechuck, now 37, appeared in a Pepsi commercial as a child with Jackson and said he was also a frequent visitor to the singer's home.

Both defended Jackson against other allegations of child abuse, but later filed suits -- Robson in 2013 and Safechuck in 2014 -- against the singer's estate with abuse allegations of their own. (Jackson's estate denied the accusations. Their cases were initially dismissed but reportedly remain under appeal.)

""I never forgot one moment of what Michael did to me, but I was psychologically and emotionally completely unable and unwilling to understand that it was sexual abuse,"" Robson said during an appearance on the ""Today"" show after he filed suit in 2013.

Wade Robson calls Michael Jackson 'a pedophile'

On Sunday, ""Leaving Neverland"" director Dan Reed responded in an interview with USA Today to an earlier statement from Jackson's estate which stated: ""The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact. These claims were the basis of lawsuits filed by these two admitted liars, which were ultimately dismissed by a judge.""

""It's pretty much what you'd expect them to say,"" Reed told the publication. ""They obviously haven't seen it, and I'm not engaging with the substance of what they're saying.""

Jackson was previously the subject of two high-profile abuse cases.

In 1993, a then 13-year-old boy accused Jackson of sexually molesting him repeatedly over a five-month period.

The boy said that Jackson bathed with him, shared a bed with him, gave him gifts and fondled him.

Jackson paid approximately $25 million to settle a civil suit by that alleged victim in 2004.

In 2003, Jackson was charged with seven counts of child molestation for allegations from a cancer-stricken boy invited to the singer's home.

Jackson, who repeatedly denied the allegations, was acquitted of those charges. He died in 2009 from an overdose of Propofol.

Michael Jackson Fast Facts

Critics who attended the four-hour ""Leaving Neverland"" screening last week described the film as ""devastating.""

Others took to social media to defend Jackson.

""Michael Jackson fans are heavily educated on all the allegation cases, we're not apologists or blindly supporting him,"" one person tweeted. ""We're going out of our way to support an innocent man who isn't here to defend himself, in an era where falsified victim claims seem to be rendered non-existent.""

At a Q&A session at the ""Leaving Neverland"" event, where its subjects and filmmaker reportedly received a standing ovation, Robson said he understood why some of Jackson's fans would doubt his account of abuse.

""Even though it happened to me I still couldn't believe it and I couldn't believe that what Michael did was a bad thing, so I understand, "" he said, according to a Deadline report.

""We can only understand and accept something when we are ready,"" Robson concluded.

This story has been updated to reflect Robson's and Safechuck's current age."
59,http://www.thesunchronicle.com/features/stories/michael-jackson-s-brothers-say-accusers-film-neglects-facts/article_f186c5b6-c40d-59c3-8f4d-f15365005634.html,"['Andrew Dalton Ap Entertainment Writer', 'Chris Pizzello', 'Michael A. Mariant', 'Taylor Jewell']",None,"×

remaining of

Thank you for Reading! On your next view you will be asked to log in to your subscriber account or create an account and subscribepurchase a subscription to continue reading."
60,https://www.vox.com/culture/2019/2/27/18241432/leaving-neverland-review-michael-jackson-hbo-safechuck-robson,['Feb'],2019-02-27 00:00:00,"Nobody wants Leaving Neverland to exist. That much is clear.

In HBO’s two-part, four-hour documentary, which airs on March 3 and 4, Wade Robson and James Safechuck discuss in painful detail the molestation they say they experienced at the hands of pop superstar Michael Jackson when they were boys. The film is not the first time Jackson has been accused of molesting young boys — in 1993, a lawsuit against him was settled out of court. And in 2005, he was acquitted of similar accusations in a criminal trial that was prompted in part by the 2003 documentary Living With Michael Jackson, in which the singer held hands with 12-year-old Gavin Arvizo and talked about sharing his bed with children.

In both court cases, Robson testified in court on Jackson’s behalf, while Safechuck defended him to investigators. But now, both men say that Jackson molested them as children (and both have tried to sue Jackson’s estate before, in cases that are under appeal).

This is the first time the allegations have been so detailed and presented in such an unrelenting fashion. And the response has been deafening from those who would defend the deceased singer. Leaving Neverland prompted swift backlash from Jackson’s estate and fans after its debut at the Sundance Film Festival in January. The estate is now suing HBO for $100 million, presumably hoping to prevent it from airing.

It’s clear from the film itself, though, that Robson and Safechuck don’t want it to exist either. Neither do their mothers, their wives, or other family members (including Robson’s siblings and grandmother), who all appear onscreen to speak at length about their families’ entanglement with Jackson. Everyone involved is clearly horrified by what Robson and Safechuck say happened. Everyone involved feels betrayed by Jackson, whom they considered a friend, a hero, a member of the family.

And that extends far beyond the participants; everyone wishes there were no cause to listen to allegations against a cultural figure as beloved and important as Jackson. Everyone wishes that we could live in a world where such things never happen. That we didn’t have to hear these stories at all.

But Leaving Neverland does exist — and it is a slow, methodical, measured, and devastating rebuttal to claims that victims of sexual assault in general and Robson and Safechuck in particular are just “in it” for the fame and the money. Together with other recent films that focus on victims rather than the accused (such as Surviving R. Kelly and Untouchable, the Sundance documentary about Harvey Weinstein), it’s an indictment of a culture too enamored of celebrity to care about the dignity of ordinary people. It demands to be watched and taken seriously by anyone who wishes to speak about Jackson — either in defense or condemnation — in the future.

I, too, wish this film didn’t exist.

Jackson’s side of the story was accepted as fact for decades. Leaving Neverland is the other side.

With Leaving Neverland, director Dan Reed has not made a journalistic documentary — or, at least, not the kind that hews to the fiction that you have to present “both sides” in order to say something true. Jackson first told his side of the story — that he was a gentle soul who just liked to have sleepovers with young boys but didn’t do anything untoward with them — more than 25 years ago, and then again during his testimony in the 2005 criminal case. Since then, it’s been repeated by fans and by the media for years. And Leaving Neverland exists in the real world, where that case and those versions of events have been given plenty of airtime.

But documentaries are not, definitionally, works of journalism. They are nonfiction films. And Leaving Neverland supplies something bigger and more important than a straightforward reported piece would. It’s an intricate recentering of the Jackson narrative, a reorientation of past stories that have already been written and told. Jackson himself is present throughout, in photographs and video clips, but this is not his story. We do not hear about his childhood, his rise to fame, or even his career trajectory, except as it intersects with Robson and Safechuck’s stories.

Both men first encountered Jackson when they were young, in the early 1990s. Robson was 7 years old; Safechuck was 11. Both were obsessed with Jackson’s music. Both became part of Jackson’s life, and he quickly became part of their families’ lives. Each boy made trips to Jackson’s palatial California estate, Neverland Ranch, with his family, and eventually would sleep in Jackson’s room, with family nearby. Both say that Jackson eventually initiated intimate and then sexual contact with them.

The process that each man describes — which fills most of the first two-hour episode — is one of intense, methodical grooming. In both Robson and Safechuck’s tellings, Jackson would court the family with gifts and fun trips and constant communication, then gradually wedge himself between the boys and their families, by spending more and more time with them, inviting them to accompany him on tour (sometimes with family members in tow, sometimes not), and molesting them in his bed at night. And about every year, Robson’s sister says in the film with the horror of hindsight, Jackson would seem to choose a new “favorite” boy, while still keeping the others in his orbit.

Why any parent would consent to leave their young child alone with a man they don’t really know — let alone let them sleep in the same room, unsupervised, over and over again — is a question that everyone interviewed in Leaving Neverland, including Robson and Safechuck, raises over and over again. So many years later, everyone is visibly horrified. But the answer seems to simply be that Jackson seemed childlike and good-hearted and generous, and, of course, he wasn’t just anyone; he was Michael Jackson.

For Robson and Safechuck’s mothers in particular, Jackson’s celebrity, coupled with the fact that everybody seemed to trust him, blurred the now-obvious red flags. Both women are aghast and angry with themselves for having been fine with it back then.

But though their family members figure prominently in the film, this is primarily Robson and Safechuck’s story to tell. Each man speaks of hero worship that evolved into feeling like he was Jackson’s special friend, then into confidence that Jackson loved him, and, eventually, confidence that he was in love with Jackson. And then each speaks of the confusion, anger, and devastation that followed when he was replaced in the center of Jackson’s attention by another boy, and the years of psychological and emotional fallout from the alleged abuse.

What may be most jarring to watch is Robson and Safechuck’s internal struggles to verbalize, even all these years later, what was really going on during that time. A boy of 7 or 11 is not old enough to consent to a sexual relationship with a grown man, or to truly be in love, and both men know this.

But the feelings they experienced weren’t fake, and even after decades of trying to come to grips with what happened to them — something both the men and their wives and families talk about in the last hour of Leaving Neverland — it’s hard for them to feel, as children eager to please and be valued, that they were being used. (The difficulty of reorienting oneself as an adult to a relationship you considered to be equal when you were younger is a theme that was echoed in last year’s devastating film The Tale, also on HBO.)

Both men speak at length about how they felt when molestation allegations first surfaced against Jackson in the early 1990s, when they were still children and still in intimate, ongoing contact with the singer. Robson in particular speaks in devastating detail about the conflicting emotions that seem to have torn him apart, and the reasons he denied having sexual contact with Jackson in Jackson’s 1993 trial (alongside actor Macaulay Culkin, another of Jackson’s close child friends, who, as the film notes, continues to categorically deny he was abused).

The one event in Jackson’s life that gets plenty of airtime in Leaving Neverland is his death in 2009, which occurs about three hours into the four-hour film. The remaining hour is spent on how the boys, now grown to men, felt the effects of Jackson’s death and of their history with Jackson in their own lives, and how wide the fallout radius was — on their romantic lives with their spouses, their children, and their careers. (Robson is known to many as one of the world’s top choreographers, having worked with artists like Britney Spears and N’Sync, and on So You Think You Can Dance, for which he won an Emmy in 2007.) By the end, it’s hard not to be shocked that they’ve been able to finally tell the story, so great is the mental and emotional trauma they describe.

Leaving Neverland is a work of extraordinary restraint and moral urgency

It may seem preposterous to call a four-hour film “restrained,” but that’s what Leaving Neverland is: a work of extraordinary restraint. It is not salacious or leering or opportunistic. There aren’t any twists. You know where it’s going from the start. At many points, the camera just quietly waits for the subject to formulate his thoughts and find a way to keep speaking.

But the power is undeniable. It is easy — far, far too easy — to dismiss the testimony of survivors of assault as “looking for attention” when you read about it in the newspaper, or just catch a short segment about it on the news, or see a headline on Facebook. Indeed, Jackson’s estate’s lawsuit against HBO alleges that the film and its subjects are “out to profit from [Jackson’s] enormous worldwide success and take advantage of his eccentricities,” and that he is “an easy target because he is not here to defend himself.”

Never mind that false reports of sexual assault are rare, or that the reasons survivors often do not come forward right away are well-known and documented. Assuming that survivors are speaking out in pursuit of their own fame and fortune is still an incredibly common response to those who allege sexual harassment or assault, particularly if it happened many years prior. And it’s especially prevalent when, in retrospect, it seems as if everyone must have known what was going on, or likely going on, but were willing to ignore it because a powerful, famous man denied it and offered proximity to glamour, fame, and opportunity in return.

So it is important, even vital, that filmmakers have taken up the work not of chronicling the “scandals” but of creating documents of testimony. Actually seeing Robson, Safechuck, and their families speak, watching and listening as they fill in the stories about what was happening in the space between the photographs and the videos, is at least as important as the words they are speaking. Humans need more than just text to understand difficult truths; we need faces, emotion, expression, time to process. Leaving Neverland gives us that, with steady and sober urgency.

Untouchable, a documentary that has Harvey Weinstein’s accusers at its center, takes a similar tack, as does Lifetime’s explosive Surviving R. Kelly. Both films focus on the victims of alleged serial abusers, rather than the “scandal” or the abusers themselves. That approach is much rarer than you might expect.

As Vox’s Constance Grady wrote about Surviving R. Kelly, there’s something “uniquely unsettling” about watching victims and their families speak, something that prompts belief and action. And writing about Untouchable, I noted that “cinema, an image- and time-based medium, can do what print cannot. It can make us sit with victims and serve as witnesses while they recount their experiences.”

It is easy, and often desirable, to believe otherwise. You could watch Leaving Neverland and still choose to believe that Robson and Safechuck’s stories are elaborate webs of baldfaced lies designed so that they can benefit, in some way, from a brilliant, troubled dead man. Many doubtless will. But you’d better pause to take a long, hard, unsparing look inside first.

Leaving Neverland airs on HBO in two parts on Sunday, March 3, and Monday, March 4."
61,https://www.bostonglobe.com/arts/television/2019/02/28/michael-jackson-documentary-leaving-neverland-riveting-shattering/DC4pbr2dIQqTP5sub7c7zH/story.html,['Globe Staff'],2019-02-28 00:00:00,"Throughout Michael Jackson’s adulthood, he presented himself as a victim. And many people have gone along with that assessment, even after years of allegations of child sexual abuse, out-of-court settlements, and two public legal cases.

The logic is tempting, as, like armchair psychologists, they believe that Jackson loved innocence so passionately, that he enjoyed surrounding himself with preteen kids so constantly, because he’d been robbed of his own childhood. He was compensating for his loss. And he’d sacrificed his childhood for his genius, trying to make us happy, so perhaps there was some guilt in the readiness to accept his idiosyncrasies and fetishes. We deprived him of his childhood; the least we could do was indulge the supposedly harmless excesses it led to.

But the allegations in HBO’s “Leaving Neverland,” a riveting, grimly persuasive four-hour documentary, are the most powerful challenges yet to the public denial about Jackson that has thrived since his first sexual abuse case in 1993, which he settled out of court. Jackson may have been a victim in ways, as the intensity of his lifelong fame drove him to take refuge in a fairy-tale world. But according to the two-part film, which airs Sunday and Monday at 8 p.m., Jackson was at the same time a victimizer of the most insidious kind, a man whose hunger for innocence led him to rob children of that same precious commodity.

Advertisement

The film, which created a stir at the Sundance Film Festival in January, and which inspired the Jackson estate to sue HBO for $100 million to stop the airing, alleges that Jackson, as an adult, strategically groomed boys, seduced their parents into submission with elaborate trips and money, and sexually abused the boys over and over again, each of the many nights they spent together, sometimes with the mothers in the next room. According to the film, he fitted Neverland Ranch with hidden rooms and alarms to protect him from getting caught in flagrante. As presented by James Safechuck, now 40, and Wade Robson, now 36, every step of Jackson’s enticement of them was deliberate and cynical, particularly as, they say, Jackson did what he could to separate the boys from their parents for full access.

Get The Weekender in your inbox: The Globe's top picks for what to see and do each weekend, in Boston and beyond. Sign Up Thank you for signing up! Sign up for more newsletters here

Some of the most unexpectedly powerful portions of “Leaving Neverland” revolve around Safechuck’s mother and Robson’s mother, grandmother, brother, and sister. Both in old clips and in fresh interviews, you can see how they, too, lost their bearings as the global superstar took special interest in their families, showing up in their modest homes to play with the boys. In the photos we see of those visits, Jackson looks like a giant Disney World Mickey Mouse beside these ordinary families in their average living rooms. The families traveled the world as part of a royal entourage, and along the way they dismissed instincts, questions, and suspicions, even as the boys held hands and slept with a fully grown man. The remorse the mothers feel now over their complicity — after having defended Jackson over the years since 1993 — is profound, and their families still remain in tatters in Jackson’s wake.

The film toggles between the two similar stories of alleged abuse suffered by Safechuck and Robson. Director Dan Reed keeps the cameras close to their faces for the interviews, so we can see every blink and swallow while they chronicle their relationships with Jackson in agonizing detail, including what they describe as years of sexual molestations. Robson first met Jackson in 1987, after winning a Michael Jackson dance contest in Brisbane, Australia, where his family lived. Jackson eventually invited his little fan to join him onstage at concerts, and soon Robson’s mother and sister moved to Los Angeles to be closer to Jackson and to take advantage of his promises about Robson’s career. The adult Robson says he felt “anointed.” Safechuck wasn’t a big Jackson fan as a child, but he appeared in a 1987 Pepsi commercial with the star and was eventually drawn into Jackson’s dazzling inner circle.

There is elaborate visual and audio documentation of everything, except, of course, the scenes of alleged abuse. Reed effectively paints in the two stories with old homemade photos and videos by the two families as well as news coverage of Jackson’s public appearances at the time. We get to hear phone messages left daily by Jackson and faxes he sent to the boys, all of which are disturbing in their emotionality and in their treatment of the boys as if they were contemporaries. Watching the young Robson and Safechuck in the clips, dancing with Jackson onstage and playing with him behind the scenes, it’s stunning to be reminded of just how small and susceptible these boys were. From this vantage point, after having seen “Finding Neverland,” it seems outrageous that the world ever passively watched this man — a man who, in terms of finance and fame, could run with any crowd he chose — wandering the world with prepubescent boys in tow.

Also disturbing is the predictable way, according to Safechuck and Robson, Jackson hammered home to the boys the importance of keeping the sexual activity a secret, telling them that they’d go to jail if anyone found out. He urged them not to trust people — especially women. And the boys loved Jackson, too, which added to their desire to protect him. Robson, in particular, says he has had a hard time viewing his sexual relationship with Jackson as exploitation. When the superstar swept into their lives, making them feel like the luckiest kids in the world, even having a mock wedding ceremony with one of them, their relationships with Jackson took on airs of romance. Once Jackson found new favorites, both boys felt the kind of rejection that a scorned lover feels, but still the glow lingered. Jackson would renew regular contact with the boys and their families — along with gifts, including a house — when he needed them to defend him in court, which they did.

Advertisement

You might go into “Leaving Neverland” prepared to dismiss the allegations as a play for money and attention, especially since these men did formerly publicly deny that they were abused. But the film is particularly forceful as it accounts for every stage of their respective recoveries, which are still in progress, including their darkest feelings of fear, denial, and shame. Now married to women, both acknowledge that the birth of their first child triggered their internal reckonings over what happened to them.

“Leaving Neverland” is not a particularly imaginative documentary, in that it sticks to a straightforward narrative, and, in its empathetic approach, doesn’t bother trying to include views from “the other side.” But that’s most fitting for this film, which arrives just before the 10th anniversary of Jackson’s death in June 2009. It’s a shattering, unforgettable piece of work that will change forever the way I hear Jackson’s music.

LEAVING NEVERLAND

On: HBO

Sunday and Monday nights, 8-10

Matthew Gilbert can be reached at gilbert@globe.com . Follow him on Twitter @MatthewGilbert"
62,https://www.theguardian.com/music/2019/mar/01/australian-choreographer-tells-of-sexual-abuse-in-michael-jackson-documentary,['Australian Associated Press'],2019-03-01 00:00:00,"Wade Robson, one of two accusers in Leaving Neverland documentary, says he was abused by star as a child

The Australian dance choreographer Wade Robson has alleged in a US TV interview how a “magical” first visit to Michael Jackson’s Neverland Ranch as a seven-year-old boy led to the pop star sexually abusing him.

Robson, now 36, and another alleged Jackson victim, American James Safechuck, 40, feature in the two-part documentary, Leaving Neverland, that premiered at the Sundance film festival.

Jackson was touring Australia when he first met five-year-old dance prodigy Robson. A friendship grew and Robson and his family were invited to stay at the Neverland Ranch in California.

Michael Jackson estate suing HBO for $100m over tell-all documentary Read more

“This was just the most magical thing I’d ever seen,” Robson, describing visiting Neverland for the first time, told CBS This Morning on Thursday.

On a tour of the property, Robson alleged, Jackson gave him and his sister the option of staying the night in a guest room or with him.

“And my reaction was, ‘of course, I want stay with you’,” Robson said.

Play Video 0:41 Watch the trailer for Leaving Neverland: Michael Jackson and Me – video

When it was time for Robson’s family to leave the ranch and visit the Grand Canyon, Robson said he and Jackson were so upset they cried.

Robson said he was allowed to stay the week with Jackson alone, but the first or second night Jackson allegedly started “to touch my legs and touch my crotch over my pants”.

Facebook Twitter Pinterest Wade Robson in 2005 after testifying at Michael Jackson’s trial. Photograph: Hector Mata/AFP/Getty Images

“It progressed to him performing oral sex on me, him showing me how to perform oral sex on him,” Robson alleged.

Robson said Jackson told him: “God brought us together. We love each other … and this is how we show each other our love.”

Timeline Michael Jackson child sexual abuse claims Show Hide LAPD investigation After Jordan Chandler makes allegations during a police interview that Jackson has abused him, an investigation begins. Jackson had met the 12-year-old boy the previous year. Barnes and Robson press conference Teenagers Brett Barnes and Wade Robson hold a press conference stating that they had shared a bed with Jackson on multiple occasions, but that nothing sexual had happened. Chandlers sue Jackson A lawsuit from the Chandler family alleges sexual abuse by Jackson and seeks $30m. Jackson video statement Jackson describes being strip-searched and photographed by the LAPD two days earlier as “the most humiliating ordeal of my life”. He states: ""I am not guilty of these allegations, but if I am guilty of anything it is of giving all that I have to give to help children all over the world.” Jackson settles lawsuit Jackson settles out of court with the Chandlers for $22m – $15m goes to Jordan Chandler to be held in a trust fund until he turns 18. LAPD investigation fails After two grand juries fail to indict, and Jordan Chandler tells authorities he will not testify in court, the Los Angeles and Santa Barbara district attorneys end their investigation. Scream released The lead single from Jackson’s album HIStory is released. A duet with his sister Janet, the song angrily addresses media coverage of the child sexual abuse allegations against him.

Bashir documentary Jackson discusses regularly having sleepovers with children, including a young cancer patient named Gavin Arvizo, in Living with Michael Jackson – a documentary fronted by the British journalist Martin Bashir. ""It's not sexual,"" said Jackson on-screen. ""We’re going to sleep. I tuck them in. It's very charming."" The film rekindles police investigations. Police raid and arrest Jackson's Neverland estate is again searched by police, and a week later Jackson is arrested. Jackson charged Michael Jackson is formally charged with committing lewd and lascivious acts with a child under the age of 14. Trial begins During Jackson's trial, Arvizo and his younger brother testify that the singer showed them pornography and made them drink ""Jesus juice"" – wine. Both say Jackson masturbated in front of them and molested Arvizo on multiple occasions. Blanca Francia, one of Jackson's former housekeepers, testifies she saw Jackson showering with Wade Robson. Witnesses for the defence, including Macaulay Culkin and Robson, say that Jackson never molested them. Not guilty verdict The jury finds Jackson not guilty on all 14 charges brought against him. Jackson dies In the run-up to This Is It, a planned residency at London's O2 Arena, Jackson dies age 50 of a cardiac arrest. Wade Robson sues Wade Robson takes legal action against the Jackson estate, alleging that Michael Jackson molested him over a seven-year period between the ages of seven and 14. James Safechuck sues Safechuck alleges Jackson abused him on more than 100 occasions after the pair met when Safechuck appeared in a Pepsi commercial alongside the singer. Leaving Neverland Dan Reed's four-hour documentary Leaving Neverland opens at the Sundance film festival. In it Wade Robson and James Safechuck discuss at length the abuse they claim they suffered at Jackson's hands. It is described as ""a public lynching"" by Jackson's surviving family. Television screenings Leaving Neverland is shown on the HBO network in the US, with a UK screening on Channel 4 on 6 and 7 March. The Jackson estate sue HBO for $100m, claiming the network is in breach of a non-disparagement clause in a 1992 contract. Radio ban Radio stations around the world, including in New Zealand and Canada, begin to pull Jackson's music from the airwaves.

Safechuck, who was nine when he first met Jackson when he was cast in a Pepsi commercial, said the pop star groomed him in a similar way.

Jackson’s brothers Jackie, Marlon and Tito and nephew Taj have rejected the allegations, and accused Robson and Safechuck of being motivated by money.

Robson and Safechuck said they were not compensated for participating in the documentary and have no stake in it.

Robson, who went on to work with Britney Spears and boy band NSYNC, previously was a staunch supporter of Jackson, with the Australian testifying at Jackson’s 2005 criminal trial in California involving another alleged child victim.

Jackson was acquitted after Robson testified Jackson never sexually abused him.

Jackson died in 2009 and in a surprise move, Robson went public with his abuse claims and filed a civil lawsuit against the Jackson estate alleging he had been molested by the pop star from the age of seven to 14.

‘We won’t shy away from controversies’: BBC announce rival Michael Jackson film Read more

A Los Angeles judge tossed out the case in 2015, ruling Robson waited too long to file and missed the 12-month statutory deadline after Jackson’s death.

The judge did not rule on the credibility of Robson’s allegations.

Robson and Safechuck said it was not until they had their own children that they came to terms with what they claim Jackson did to them."
63,https://www.voanews.com/a/michael-jackson-brothers-say-accusers-film-neglects-facts/4806196.html,['Associated Press'],None,"The family of Michael Jackson had a feeling the years-old child molestation allegations against the pop superstar would resurface at some point. So they say they weren’t entirely surprised to learn that a forthcoming HBO documentary would feature two of his accusers.

“I thought, ‘Oh here we go again,’” Jackson’s oldest brother Jackie Jackson said Tuesday of the moment he learned of “Leaving Neverland” while on tour in Australia. “That’s the first thing we said,” Jackie Jackson said during an interview with The Associated Press seated next to his brothers Tito, Marlon and his nephew, Taj.

The documentary, which premiered at the Sundance Film Festival to a standing ovation , will starting Sunday air the abuse allegations of two men , Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who had previously denied Jackson molested them and supported him to authorities and in Robson’s case, very publicly.

“It was going to be the 10-year anniversary,” Taj Jackson said, referring to his uncle’s June 2009 death. “I remember a year ago I was like, ’This is too appetizing for the media. They’re going to do something. This is the time when everyone comes out of the woodwork, the same cast, the same characters that have been discredited throughout the years. They have a platform now to talk about Michael Jackson.”

It was the latest and most public pushback from the family and Jackson estate, which have repeatedly denounced the documentary in recent weeks through written statements, a lawsuit , and letters to HBO and Britain’s Channel 4, which plan to air the film. HBO announced Wednesday that it will air a special on Monday night in which Oprah Winfrey also interviews Robson and Safechuck.

Their central criticism has been the film’s failure to talk to family members or other defenders of Jackson, whom they insist never molested a child.

The brothers said they would have answered the allegations had the filmmakers asked them.

“Oh, we definitely would have come and talked to them about the situation ... to protect our brother,” Tito Jackson said. “He’s not here no more. He’s passed, and, we’re his brothers, we’re supposed to do this.”

Marlon Jackson added, “I look at it as yes, you’re protecting your brother, but you’re telling the truth, and we want people to understand the truth. And I do not understand how a filmmaker can make a documentary and not want to speak to myself or some of the other families that were at Neverland.”

The documentary’s director Dan Reed has repeatedly defended his film, which uses only the voices of Robson, Safechuck and their families.

“It’s the story of these two families and not of all the other people who were or weren’t abused by Michael Jackson,” Reed told the AP the day after the film’s premiere. “People who spent time with him can go, ‘he couldn’t possibly be a pedophile.’ How do they know? It’s absurd.”

Robson, 36, and Safechuck, 40, both came forward as adults, first via 2013 lawsuits and later in the documentary, to talk about the alleged abuse, which Robson says started when he was 7, Safechuck when he was 10.

Both had previously told authorities there had been no abuse, with Robson testifying in Jackson’s defense at the 2005 molestation trial that ended with the superstar’s acquittal.

Jackson family members say they were especially stunned to first hear such allegations coming from Robson, a noted choreographer who has worked with Britney Spears and ’N Sync. Many Jacksons, including Taj, had known Robson and his family since he was a child. Robson had dated Jackie Jackson’s daughter for over seven years.

“I was like ’No that can’t be Wade Robson not the same guy that I knew, They must have got the names wrong,” Taj Jackson said. “Wade was the most adamant person when it came to 2005 and the trial. He was their first defense witness. He was the star witness. He was adamant that nothing ever happened.”

Taj Jackson said he remembers thanking Robson the day he testified, and Robson responding that it was the least he could do for Michael.

“To see that 180, it feels like the biggest backstab that you could possibly feel,” he said.

The film acknowledges and discusses the men’s initial denials of abuse. Both say they experienced trauma that emerged as adults when they started to accept what happened to them.

No one in the Jackson family has any memory of meeting Safechuck. They have focused their criticism on Robson, whose allegations, they say, have coincided with financial problems. They say in particular that being denied a job with a Jackson-themed Cirque du Soleil show prompted him to change his story.

Robson has said it had no bearing on the allegations, and that he actually removed himself from the Cirque du Soleil show because he was having nervous breakdowns. Those prompted him to talk to his therapist for the first time about the abuse.

The men’s lawsuits have been thrown out on technical grounds, but are on appeal.

The Jackson estate’s lawsuit , filed last week, alleges “Leaving Neverland” violates a 1992 contract agreeing the channel would not disparage Jackson in the future. HBO called the lawsuit a desperate attempt to undermine the film.

Jackson’s family urged those inclined to watch “Leaving Neverland” to look deeper into the situation.

“That’s all we’re worried about is just facts,” Marlon Jackson said. “The facts, which are public record, tell a totally different story than what this documentary talks about.”"
64,https://www.vanityfair.com/hollywood/2019/02/michael-jackson-broadway-musical-allegations-leaving-neverland,"['Julie Miller', 'Vanity Fair', 'Yohana Desta', 'Maureen Orth']",None,"Three weeks after a haunting Michael Jackson documentary debuted at the Sundance Film Festival, raising new sexual abuse claims against the late singer, Jackson’s estate has made it known that it will continue with plans to launch a stage musical based on the life and works of the late musician, titled Don’t Stop ’Til You Get Enough.

The news was folded into a report from The New York Times stating that the Jackson estate and producing partner Columbia Live Stage would be canceling a planned Chicago premiere for the show. Though that run is being halted, the estate still hopes to unveil the musical—with a book by two-time Pulitzer Prize winner Lynn Nottage and directing and choreography by Tony winner Christopher Wheeldon—on Broadway in the summer of 2020. The official reason given for the Chicago cancellation was not the press around the documentary, Leaving Neverland—which will air on HBO in early March—but “scheduling difficulties” brought on because of a labor dispute.

According to the Times, “the musical will focus on the period of time leading up to Jackson’s ‘Dangerous’ world tour which began in 1992.”

Jackson’s family has remained adamant that the Leaving Neverland documentary—which details Jackson’s alleged sexual abuse of Wade Robson and James Safechuck when they were children—is “disgraceful” and “tabloid character assassination.”

In a televised interview late last month, Jackson’s surviving brother Jermaine said that he was “1,000 percent sure” Michael was not guilty of what Robson and Safechuck have accused him of, “because [he] was tried by a jury and . . . he was acquitted on all of this.” (Jackson was indicted on charges including four counts of molesting a minor in 2004; in 2005, a jury found him not guilty on all charges. Jackson was also accused of sexually abusing a 13-year-old boy in 1993, and settled out of court with the boy’s family for more than $20 million in 1994.) Jermaine added, “Our family is tired. Let this man rest. He did a lot for the world. Let him rest. I’ll just say this: there is no truth to this documentary.”

Jackson’s estate recently sent a letter to the U.K.’s Channel 4 in hopes that it would pull Leaving Neverland from its schedule. The estate argued that the documentary “violates the network’s programming guidelines,” in that the filmmakers did not seek a response from Jackson’s estate, family, or friends about the allegations made within the film. The network, however, has already dismissed the letter—claiming that the allegations against Jackson are rebutted in the film by denials Jackson made himself before dying in 2009.

“On this occasion the person against whom the significant allegations are being made is deceased,” the network responded. “It is therefore appropriate that his denials during life are included in the program.”"
65,https://qz.com/quartzy/1561099/hbos-michael-jackson-documentary-gets-after-show-hosted-by-oprah/,[],None,"When HBO’s documentary detailing allegations of sexual abuse of children against Michael Jackson premiered at Sundance last month, mental health professionals were on hand to help viewers process what they saw. For the documentary’s premiere on TV, that role will be handled by Oprah Winfrey.

Before an audience of sexual abuse survivors, Oprah will lead a discussion with the two subjects of Leaving Neverland, Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who allege that Jackson abused them when they were children. The interview will air simultaneously on HBO and Oprah’s TV network, OWN, on March 4 immediately following the conclusion of the two-part documentary.

“Through gut-wrenching interviews with Safechuck, now 40, and Robson, now 36, as well as their mothers, wives and siblings, ‘Leaving Neverland’ presents their accounts of sustained abuse, exploring the complicated feelings that led both men to confront their experiences after both had a young son of their own,” HBO said.

Jackson, who died in 2009, was first accused of sexually molesting a minor in 1993. The music legend denied the claims and settled the case out of court. In 2005, he was found not guilty of molesting 13-year-old Gavin Arvizo in a trial that garnered wall-to-wall media attention throughout the world. During the trial, Robson testified that Jackson did not molest him. In 2013, he and Safechuck filed a lawsuit against Jackson’s estate that the star in fact did molest them both, though the suit was dismissed in 2017.

A multitude of critics have hailed Leaving Neverland as a devastating portrait of abuse, arguing that Safechuck and Robson’s allegations against Jackson are extremely convincing. Jackson’s family has repeatedly denied the claims, calling the documentary “a public lynching.” They sued HBO and its parent company, Time Warner, for breaching an old non-disparagement contract the network had with Jackson stemming from a 1992 concert HBO aired.

Leaving Neverland director Dan Reed told Rolling Stone in January that his documentary is less about Jackson, and more about the lives of the alleged survivors. “This is not a story about Michael Jackson. It’s a story about child sexual abuse that happened to two families whose lives intersected with Jackson. The fact that the abuser is Michael Jackson gives the film a reach and a relevance that I welcome. But it’s a story of grooming and pedophilia.”

Oprah’s interview with Jackson in 1993 remains the most-watched live TV interview in American history. It was an exceedingly rare window into Jackson, who had only agreed to one other interview in the 15 years prior. That interview was a huge part of Jackson’s legacy; Oprah’s interview with his two accusers 27 years later could be the one that destroys it."
66,https://slate.com/culture/2019/02/leaving-neverland-lawsuit-michael-jackson-estate.html,['Marissa Martinelli'],2019-02-21 21:44:06+00:00,"An aerial view of Neverland Ranch. HBO

The estate of Michael Jackson is suing HBO for damages of $100 million or more over Leaving Neverland, the documentary in which two men, Wade Robson and James Safechuck, claim that the pop star sexually abused them as children. The lawsuit filed Thursday calls Leaving Neverland a “posthumous character assassination” and “a one-sided hit piece,” invoking a 27-year-old concert special that aired on HBO to accuse the network of violating a non-disparagement agreement. You can read the court filing here, thanks to Deadline.

Though the Jackson estate disputes the claims made by Robson and Safechuck in the documentary, it cannot sue HBO or anyone else involved for defaming Jackson because the laws do not apply when the subject is deceased. Instead, the suit claims that in exchange for airing a live concert special in 1992, Michael Jackson in Concert in Bucharest: The Dangerous Tour, HBO agreed not to “make any disparaging remarks concerning Performer or any of his representatives, agents, or business practices or do any act that may harm or disparage or cause to lower in esteem the reputation or public image of Performer.” Leaving Neverland, it argues, violates that agreement:

HBO profited off the Dangerous World Tour by airing a concert from the tour and promoting Michael Jackson’s talents. Now, HBO is profiting off the Dangerous World Tour by airing a “documentary” that falsely claims Michael Jackson was abusing children on the same tour. It is hard to imagine a more direct violation of the non-disparagement clause.

The lawsuit also argues that HBO, facing competition from Netflix and Amazon coupled with the looming end of Game of Thrones, is airing Leaving Neverland because it is desperate for ratings: “Like so many before him, [chairman and CEO] Richard Plepler decided to turn on Michael Jackson for the money.”

The petitioners accuse the network and director Dan Reed of ignoring “mountains of other evidence eviscerating Robson’s and Safechuck’s credibility, all of which the Jackson Estate would have provided if the filmmakers had sought a comment on these claims, which they did not.” It’s true that Leaving Neverland contains no denials or statements from the current Jackson estate, only archival footage of the artist defending himself against the allegations. In fact, the only people interviewed on-camera in the documentary are Robson, Safechuck, and their families. Reed says he also spoke to detectives and prosecutors involved in two investigations of Jackson, but that he did not include footage of anyone else because “I felt that interviews from the public sphere would break that spell and place us back on the outside.”

HBO responded to the lawsuit Thursday by saying that it still plans to air Leaving Neverland, which originally debuted last month at the Sundance Film Festival. “Despite the desperate lengths taken to undermine the film, our plans remain unchanged,” the network said in a statement. “HBO will move forward with the airing of Leaving Neverland, the two-part documentary, on March 3rd and 4th. This will allow everyone the opportunity to assess the film and the claims in it for themselves.”

Subscribe to Slate’s Culture newsletter for the best of movies, TV, books, music, and more, delivered twice a week."
67,https://www.okayplayer.com/music/michael-eric-dyson-beyonce-michael-jackson.html,[],2019-02-18 15:43:58-04:00,"Hot take.

Michael Eric Dyson sat down for an interview with Power 105’s The Breakfast Club Monday morning (Feb. 18) and delivered the hot take of the week.

The author and academic made a case for Beyoncé surpassing Michael Jackson, referencing an essay he wrote called “The King of Pop and the Queen of Everything” which appears in Veronica Chambers‘ forthcoming book, “Queen Bey: A Celebration of the Power and Creativity of Beyoncé Knowles-Carter.”

“My argument is that Beyoncé snatched the crown from Michael Jackson,” Dyson says.

READ: Beyoncé’s Iconic #Beychella Performance Marks A Turning Point For Coachella [Photo-Essay]

He goes on to say he saw Michael Jackson at his height but remains steadfast that Bey has surpassed him. “He was extraordinary. He’s a genius. But what she’s doing is on another level.”

“Fred Astaire and Ginger Roberts were partners back in the day,” he continued, “and she did everything Fred Astaire did except backwards and in high heels. And that’s the way I feel about Beyoncé.”

He continuous, calling Bey an “extraordinary genius.” “She doesn’t get credit for the remarkable way in which she changed the musical vocabulary of contemporary art.” He adds, “I think she’s a godmother for some of the mumble rappers. Not in terms of content, but in cadence— the rap-singing she did. The way in which she changed the whole genre with a female-centered presence and bringing her blackness along unapologetically.”

READ: Janelle Monáe Is Redefining What It Means to Be a Genius [INTERVIEW]

When Angela Yee asked his opinion on the forthcoming Leaving Neverland documentary that features two men accusing the late entertainer of sexual abuse, Dyson responded, “It’s tough.”

“We know that Michael had tremendous traumas. Did he have vitiligo? Certainly… He also had self-hatred… Was he involved with children? That’s what the documentary says. Those two guys, when they were younger, said it wasn’t true. But we know what happens when you’re younger and you’re seduced and the hypnotic sway of fame and celebrity may preclude you from telling the truth. Or, your parents got bought out and they sold you out,” he says.

He continued, in a non-accusatory air, “Hanging out with kids that age, it ain’t something we would recommend. It’s not something that we would do for our own kids… We have to be open and honest. it’s hard to reckon with the flaws of our great heroes.”

Watch the full interview above."
68,https://www.usatoday.com/story/life/2019/02/08/michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-alleges-awful-crimes-now-what/2704693002/,"['Maria Puente', 'Published P.M. Et Feb.']",2019-02-08 00:00:00,"Michael Jackson on March 5, 2009, at a press conference at the London O2 Arena. (Photo: Joel Ryan/AP)

""Leaving Neverland,"" the new film that revives old allegations that the late music superstar Michael Jackson was a pedophile, landed last month at the Sundance Film Festival like a stun grenade among film and music lovers. On Friday, HBO announced it will air the four-hour film on March 3 and 4.

Here's a look at the controversy around the film and what could happen next.

What is the film about?

The film asserts that Jackson did unspeakable things to little boys for years at his Santa Barbara County ranch-turned-amusement park, based on the testimony of two boys, now adults, Wade Robson, 36, and James Safechuck, 40.

In its press release about the film, HBO called it ""a portrait of sustained abuse"" that ""explores the complicated feelings that led both (accusers) to confront their experiences after each had a young son of his own. Playing out against the backdrop of our collective experience, the film documents the value of breaking silence, even when it implicates a powerful and revered figure.""

Who made the film?

Dan Reed, 54, the British director of the film, has led the campaign to promote and defend the film. In an interview with New York magazine's Vulture column last month, he said he made the film because there was already a question at large in the culture about Jackson's behavior.

""And I think we’ve delivered the answer to that question,"" Reed said. ""Why are people so interested in the truth about what this man did in the late ’80s and early ’90s? I think it’s because of his presence in the fabric of American life and people’s lives worldwide, the fact that he means something to people.

A woman who drove from Calgary, Canada, holds a sign of support for Michael Jackson outside of the Sundance Film Festival premiere of ""Leaving Neverland."" (Photo: DANNY MOLOSHOK/INVISION/AP)

""And the meaning of that thing is going to change, and we’re attempting to change it."" Reed declined to be interviewed by USA TODAY.

What has been the reaction to the film?

There's no question the film has ignited an uproar: Media and film critics are mostly swooning about it, calling it gut-wrenching, powerful and persuasive. Jackson's extensive and intense fan base is enraged, lashing out on social media against the film. The Jackson family and its lawyers are fighting back with daily denunciations of the film as a mendacious ""smear"" of Jackson.

Thomas Mesereau, the Los Angeles celebrity lawyer who successfully defended Jackson on child sex abuse charges in 2005, says he hopes Reed's film will fail at negatively influencing public attitudes about Jackson and his legacy.

""I'm hoping the truth prevails,"" Mesereau told USA TODAY. ""The Michael Jackson I knew would never abuse any child. I don't know if I will watch (the film). Part of me is curious but part of me does not want to dignify it by watching it.""

Who are the accusers, and what is their relationship with Jackson?

There's a long, complicated, contradictory history between Jackson and Robson and Safechuck, who sang his praises for 20 years and now say he repeatedly sexually abused them from the age of 7 until they were young teens.

Vince Finaldi, the California civil lawyer for Robson and Safechuck (he specializes in representing victims of sexual abuse), says they participated in the film to make their stories public so that people can make up their own minds about whether Jackson was a pedophile.

Michael Jackson accuser Wade Robson, left, with ""Leaving Neverland"" director Dan Reed and fellow accuser James Safechuck. (Photo: Taylor Jewell, Invision/AP)

Also, Finaldi says, they want to protect other children in the entertainment industry, where they believe sexual abuse of kids continues. If the film helps only one child, then it's worth it, he said.

""It's about educating people to understand that sexual abusers are not just creepy guys hiding in the bushes in a trench coat – they're pleasant, nice, engaging, and able to groom children, families and the public,"" Finaldi told USA TODAY. ""The goal is to get the story out there.""

He and his clients acknowledge that Jackson was a great entertainer and did ""a lot of great things for kids. We're not denying that. But he was also one of the worst sexual abusers in the country, or even the world.""

Indeed, Robson and Safechuck have told dramatically different stories about Jackson over the years. For two decades they praised him as a friend and mentor, swearing under oath that he never did anything bad to them. When Jackson was prosecuted on 14 counts of child sex-abuse in Santa Barbara County in 2005, Robson was the first witness on the stand for Jackson's defense.

""He was a very powerful witness in support of Michael Jackson,"" Mesereau says. ""He was intelligent, articulate, likable, and from what I could see, no one was forcing him"" to testify. ""He was eager to assist the defense.""

Michael Jackson with Wade Robson, who alleges that he was sexually abused by the pop singer from ages 7 to 14. (Photo: Courtesy of Sundance Insitute)

Jackson was acquitted on all counts, a ""total vindication,"" Mesereau says. Robson now says he lied on the stand, but Mesereau doesn't buy it. Robson ""didn't perjure himself, he told the truth,"" he says. (Robson can't be prosecuted for perjury because the statute of limitation has long since expired.)

In 2013 and 2014, respectively, Robson and Safechuck turned on Jackson, dead four years by that point. They sued the singer's estate seeking damages for allegedly ""exposing"" them to sexual abuse by Jackson. A probate judge dismissed their lawsuits in December 2017 but did not rule on the validity of their allegations.

They appealed the ruling and a decision from the appellate court is expected in the fall, Finaldi says, so there might yet be a civil trial on their claims. That means Robson's and Safechuck's allegations in the film might go before a civil jury.

What does the Jackson estate have to say about the film?

The Jackson estate lawyer, Howard Weitzman, delivered a 10-page letter to HBO Friday, seeking a meeting with the network to discuss its claims that HBO failed to comply with ""journalistic ethics,"" failed to thoroughly vet the two accusers, and allowed itself to be used as a ""tool"" in their on-going litigation against the Jackson estate.

""We know HBO and its partners on this 'documentary' will not be successful,"" Weitzman's letter said. ""We know that this will go down as the most shameful episode in HBO’s history...This 'documentary' will say a lot more about HBO than it ever could

about Michael Jackson.""

On Friday, in response to the estate's letter, HBO issued a statement saying, ""Our plans remain unchanged"" and the film will air as scheduled. ""(Director) Dan Reed is an award-winning filmmaker who has carefully documented these survivors’ accounts. People should reserve judgment until they see the film.”

Jackson's family and the executors of his multi-million-dollar estate believe Robson and Safechuck want to force Jackson's estate to pay them millions.

""This film smearing Michael is a means to that end,"" said Jackson estate co-executor John Branca in a statement to USA TODAY.

Michael Jackson exits the Santa Barbara County Courthouse, March 24, 2005 in Santa Maria, Calif. with his father, Joe Jackson, right, and his attorney, Thomas Mesereau, following a day of testimony in his trial on charges of child molestation. (Photo: MICHAEL A. MARIANT/AP)

Jackson family members and the estate have labeled the film ""tabloid character assassination"" and a ""public lynching"" while denouncing the accusers as liars.

Branca told USA TODAY that he believes the film is intended to further their lawsuits.

“This has been about money since 2010 when Wade Robson came to me to direct an estate project and was denied,"" Branca said. “Given that Robson and Safechuck have an active appeal, how can they say their actions aren’t about money when they are still seeking millions of dollars from Michael’s estate?

""They would never have brought these claims while Michael was alive and here to defend himself,"" Branca said. ""Slander laws don’t protect the deceased. We have great sympathy for any victims of child abuse, but this is not Michael.""

Finaldi says ""Leaving Neverland"" has nothing to do with his clients' lawsuit because they're ""separate issues.""

""Wade and James wanted, as part of their healing process, to let people know what happened to them and how Michael Jackson's 'machine' worked to isolate kids and groom the kids and parents, and sometimes you can get that out through a (civil) trial.""

What happens next?

So what will all this do to the legacy of the King of Pop – in his grave nearly 10 years – now that this film has gotten us pondering again the nature of Jackson's relationships with children?

We know this: It's not possible to prosecute, sue or shame a dead man. It's unlikely the Jackson family or estate could sue the filmmakers or the accusers because defamation laws do not apply to the dead.

The #MuteMichaelJackson hashtag, which seems to have existed on Twitter since at least 2012, isn't surging in support from either celebrities or ordinary users. Will significant numbers of music lovers eventually turn off one of America's greatest pop stars?

Recall that the #MuteR.Kelly campaign gained more power after Lifetime aired a six-part film series last month examining longstanding allegations against the R&B star involving sexual misconduct with underage girls. It's not yet clear that ""Leaving Neverland"" will have the same effect.

Since Jackson can no longer defend himself, whatever shame results from ""Leaving Neverland"" could end up borne by his children and the rest of his famous family. Does that matter? (Coincidentally, Jackson's model daughter, Paris, 20, last month told her 3 million followers on Instagram that she was ""taking a break"" from the limelight.)

On July 2, 2009, the train station at Neverland Ranch in Los Olivos, Calif. Michael Jackson's former home was renamed Sycamore Valley Ranch and put up for sale in 2017. (Photo: Carolyn Kaster/ AP)

""It could happen but the truth is the truth, and ultimately the goal is to protect kids and keep them safe from being abused in the entertainment industry, because there are still kids being abused,"" Finaldi said.

Branca also criticized Reed, who has acknowledged that he made no effort to include anyone in the film who discounted the sexual abuse allegations because he wanted to focus more on the two accusers and their families and how and why it took so long to come to terms with what they say happened to them.

Thus, the film makes no mention of Jackson's supporters, such as former child-star pals, Macaulay Culkin, Mark Lester, and Corey Feldman, who have defended Jackson in the wake of the film.

""(Reed) sold this one-sided tabloid-like story to his backers who bought it hook, line and sinker,"" Branca said. ""The truth would have been much less interesting and far less lucrative.""

Read or Share this story: https://www.usatoday.com/story/life/2019/02/08/michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-alleges-awful-crimes-now-what/2704693002/"
69,https://www.bbc.com/news/newsbeat-47013732,[],None,"Image copyright Getty Images

Michael Jackson gave a young boy jewellery in exchange for sexual acts, according to new documentary Leaving Neverland.

The ""devasting and disturbing"" film has been shown at The Sundance Film festival in Utah, America.

It focuses on two men who claim Michael Jackson had abused them as children.

His estate deny the claims saying it's ""an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in"" on the singer, who died in 2009.

USA Today reporter Patrick Ryan was at the world premiere on Friday.

Skip Twitter post by @PatRyanWrites Among the many, many disturbing revelations of #LeavingNeverland: MJ gave one of his young male victims jewelry in exchange for sexual acts, and even staged a mock wedding complete with vows and diamond ring. #Sundance2019 — Patrick Ryan (@PatRyanWrites) January 25, 2019 Report

Wade Robson and James Safechuck say they were aged seven and 10 when the singer befriended them and their families.

Now in their 30s, they claim they were sexually abused by Michael Jackson.

He always denied the allegations when he was alive.

Police raided his Neverland Ranch in California in 2003 while investigating claims he had molested a 13-year-old boy.

The case went to trial and Wade Robson was a main witness for him. He said under oath that the singer never abused him and Michael Jackson was acquitted of all charges in 2005.

Image copyright Getty Images Image caption Wade Robson used to perform alongside Michael Jackson when he was a child

Since then Wade Robson has become a father and in an interview he said after two nervous breakdowns he finally revealed to his therapist the dark secret he'd been hiding.

""It was just pain and disgust and anger, the idea something like that could happen to my son.""

In 2013 he filed a lawsuit against Michael Jackson's estate claiming he had been sexually abused by the singer, but a judge ruled he'd waited too long to seek legal action.

'Credible filmmaking'

The two-part film is directed by Dan Reed and the synopsis reads: ""Through gut-wrenching interviews with the now-adult men and their families, Leaving Neverland crafts a portrait of sustained exploitation and deception.""

Image copyright Getty Images Image caption British filmmaker Dan Reed also made Terror in Mumbai and The Paedophile Hunter

Reporter Adam B Vary watched it and posted afterwards: ""A deeply emotional Wade Robson and James Safechuck receive a standing ovation after the screening of Leaving Neverland. There will be a lot to say later, but I can say this: This is a thorough, devastating, deeply credible piece of filmmaking.""

Kenneth Turan, the LA Times film critic posted: ""A #sundancefilmfestival first: introducing the screening of the disturbing ""Leaving Neverland"" Michael Jackson documentary, fest topper John Cooper announced ""there will be health care professionals"" in the Egyptian Theater lobby if needed. This is one intense film.""

And film critic for US Weekly Mara Reinstein put: ""Shaking. Wow. We were all wrong when we cheered for Michael Jackson.""

Image copyright Getty Images Image caption Fans turned the entrance to Neverland into a shrine after the singer died

Because of Wade Robson and James Safechuck's previous support of Michael Jackson and claims that he never molested them, his fans have asked the festival to pull it, while his own estate has hit back at the project in a statement: ""The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact.

""The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred. They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers.""

They go on to say that because the filmmaker purposefully decided not to interview anyone else other than the two men and their families he ""neglected fact checking so he could craft a narrative so blatantly one-sided that viewers never get anything close to a balanced portrait.""

The documentary will be shown on Channel 4 in Spring 2019.

Michael Jackson always denied any abuse allegations while he was alive.

He died on 25 June 2009 aged 50 after receiving a lethal dose of the anaesthetic propofol.

Follow Newsbeat on Instagram, Facebook and Twitter.

Listen to Newsbeat live at 12:45 and 17:45 every weekday on BBC Radio 1 and 1Xtra - if you miss us you can listen back here."
70,https://www.nbcnews.com/pop-culture/celebrity/michael-jackson-s-family-calls-leaving-neverland-documentary-public-lynching-n963536,[],None,"Breaking News Emails Get breaking news alerts and special reports. The news and stories that matter, delivered weekday mornings.

Jan. 28, 2019, 4:39 PM GMT / Updated Jan. 28, 2019, 4:54 PM GMT By Variety

LOS ANGELES — Michael Jackson's family released a statement on Monday condemning ""Leaving Neverland,"" the two-part HBO documentary that alleges the late singer molested young boys as a ""public lynching."" The documentary premiered Friday at the Sundance Film Festival, prompting a statement from the singer's estate that called it a ""tabloid character assassination.""

""We can't just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him,"" the statement reads. ""Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made.""

Variety's review of the film states, ""Wade Robson and James Safechuck, both in their late 30s, [describe], with disarming eloquence and self-possession, how Jackson befriended them when they were children and then, for years (starting when they were 7 and 11 years old, respectively), sexually abused them. The film suggests that they were far from the only victims.""

As did the estate, the family notes that both Robson and Safechuck said the singer had not molested them during Jackson's 2005 trial; subsequent lawsuits filed against the estate in 2013 were dismissed.

The family's statement follows in full below:

""Michael Jackson is our brother and son. We are furious that the media, who without a shred of proof or single piece of physical evidence, chose to believe the word of two admitted liars over the word of hundreds of families and friends around the world who spent time with Michael, many at Neverland, and experienced his legendary kindness and global generosity. We are proud of what Michael Jackson stands for.

""People have always loved to go after Michael. He was an easy target because he was unique. But Michael was subjected to a thorough investigation which included a surprise raid of Neverland and other properties as well as a jury trial where Michael was found to be COMPLETELY INNOCENT. There has never been one piece of proof of anything. Yet the media is eager to believe these lies.

""Michael always turned the other cheek, and we have always turned the other cheek when people have gone after members of our family — that is the Jackson way. But we can't just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him. Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made.

""The creators of this film were not interested in the truth. They never interviewed a single solitary soul who knew Michael except the two perjurers and their families. That is not journalism, and it's not fair, yet the media are perpetuating these stories.

But the truth is on our side. Go do your research about these opportunists. The facts don't lie, people do. Michael Jackson was and always will be 100% innocent of these false allegations."""
71,https://radaronline.com/exclusives/2019/01/michael-jackson-nicknamed-boy-rubba-rubba/,['Cliff Renfrew'],2019-01-27 19:29:44+00:00,"Another man has come forward to allege that he was abused by late superstar Michael Jackson.

Michael Jacobshagen has told The Sunday Mirror newspaper in Great Britain that Jackson dubbed him ‘Rubba Rubba’ boy when he joined him on a string of tours.

Jacobshagen was only 14-years-old when the alleged abuse happened.

Now, a father, he claims that Jackson took him to bed as the pair struck up a bizarre relationship.

The 35-year-old father of three said: “He overstepped the mark with me and with other children.

PHOTOS: Michael Jackson’s Kids Paris, Prince, And Blanket Throw Huge Halloween Bash

“I’m almost the same age now Michael was when he met me. If I was to share a bed with a child, this would not be right. It is not normal and it’s not right.

“He was always asking me to sleep in his bed. I would say, ‘No Michael, I can sleep in my own suite’, but he was saying ‘Please, please… for Michael Jackson’.

“Since I had a son, it made me look at everything in a different way and I realize now how wrong it was. Becoming a father changed my feelings.”

Jackson was 38-years-old at the time of the alleged abuse and touring Europe.

PHOTOS: A ‘B***h’ & A ‘Bigot!’ Michael Jackson’s Doc Reveals The Star’s Secret Celebrity Feuds

Jacobshagen said the star touched him inappropriately after cuddling up to him in bed but his behavior got worse if he had taken his medication.

He alleges that Jackson stripped naked as they shared a Jacuzzi, gave him a book full of naked boys and bought him a Cartier watch to buy his silence.

He is now a public ­relations manager and lives in Munich, Germany, where he was famously photographed at a hotel window with Jackson and pictured in newspapers round the world at the time.

Jacobshagen went on to spend three weeks with Jackson staying in his hotel suite.

PHOTOS: Night Sweats & Paranoia! Michael Jackson’s Doc Reveals Star’s Secret Addiction Hell

He revealed: “When I got back to school, pictures had been in all the media. Other kids would say, ‘You make sex with Michael Jackson’ and ‘You’re gay’

“It affected me psychologically, but I never told Michael. It made me feel shame. Teachers warned my mother about allegations about Michael, but she said it was my decision if I wanted to keep seeing him.”

Originally, he had been thrilled to meet the superstar during an earlier visit to Disneyland Paris after his mother asked an assistant if her son could be introduced to the star.

He recalled: “Suddenly, I was being picked up and taken to another hotel. When I went into his suite and Michael Jackson was there waiting for me, I just thought ‘Wow’. I was a huge fan.

PHOTOS: Gay Triple Play! Paris Jackson Dating Three Women At The Same Time

“He gave me a hug and said in German ‘I love you’. We spent the day playing games like hide and seek and on his PlayStation.

“After that he kept phoning every day asking ‘Do you want to come again?’ and we spent the whole holiday together.”

Jackson then invited him to join him on tour in various European countries.

He revealed: “Michael invited us to other concerts, including the ‘HIStory Tour’, when I was 14. I travelled with him to other countries.

PHOTOS: Inside Michael Jackson’s Twisted World: ‘Frightening’ Raid Evidence Exposed

“When I slept in his bed, we wore just boxer shorts and he would put his arm around me and push his body to my body, like you would with a girlfriend.

“He would put our bodies on each other and kiss me on the head and cheek. I woke many times and his hands were on me… one hand on the top of my legs and one hand around me.

“When he was high on his medication he would get closer in the same way as when a man gets drunk. It disinhibited him.

“He’d pull me closer and be grabbing me more and kissing me more on the head and on the cheek, He would also stroke my hair.

PHOTOS: Blue-Haired Beauty Paris Jackson’s Bizarre Behavior ‘Terrifies’ Family

“I didn’t feel comfortable with it, but I thought ‘I can’t say No’. When you’re 14 and you’re there with the biggest megastar in the world, you say ‘okay’.

“He never carried out an explicit sexual act on me, but there were sexual intentions.

“He must have been getting something out of it sexually. I feel now like he was testing me, seeing how far he could go.”

The star was infatuated with Michael and sent notes saying he “truly missed him” – as well as instructions on hotel meets.

PHOTOS: ‘Disturbed’ Jacko ‘Cried’ During Police Raid, Former Attorney Reveals

Michael also told how Jackson gave him a copy of ‘The Boy: A Photographic Essay’, containing naked snaps of young lads.

He added: “I found it strange. ‘This is one of my favorite books’ and he wrote personal notes inside. In one he called me ‘his special friend’ and his ‘rubba rubba friend’ because of what used to happen in the bed.”

Years later, another copy of the book was found in Jackson’s bedroom at his Neverland ranch in California after he was arrested on suspicion of abuse.

At his subsequent trial in Santa Maria, California, in 2005, Jackson was cleared of 10 charges relating to sexual abuse.

PHOTOS: Anorexia, Brain Drama & Chemical Castration—Jacko Death Doc’s Shocking Health Claims

Jacobshagen alleges that Jackson stripped off in front of him in a hotel hot tub. It was 1998 – three years after they met.

He said: “We were in the Jacuzzi inside Michael’s bathroom. He took his swim shorts off and said ‘If you want, you can take yours off as well’.

“I told him ‘No, I don’t do that. I don’t feel comfortable being naked. I was 14, but I always looked younger.”

The teenager did not tell anyone about his behavior claiming the star groomed him to remain quiet.

He only came clean about the relationship with his mother after Jackson died from a prescription overdose in 2009. He last saw Jackson in Las Vegas two months before his death at the age of 50.

“When I became a man he did not have so much interest in me. When I went to visit the last time he didn’t ask me to sleep with him. I had to sleep on the couch,” he revealed.

“His fans won’t like me saying these things. They treat him like a God. But the truth is the truth.”

We pay for juicy info! Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com? Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night."
72,https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/michael-jackson-sexual-abuse-documentary-leaving-neverland_us_5c4f1ecfe4b0287e5b8d071a,['Reporter'],2019-01-28 11:49:57-05:00,"The family of singer Michael Jackson on Monday joined the firestorm against “Leaving Neverland,” calling the harrowing new documentary about Jackson’s alleged history of sexually abusing boys a “public lynching.”

“People have always loved to go after Michael. He was an easy target because he was unique. But Michael was subjected to a thorough investigation which included a surprise raid of Neverland and other properties as well as a jury trial where Michael was found to be COMPLETELY INNOCENT. There has never been one piece of proof of anything. Yet the media is eager to believe these lies,” the late singer’s family said in a statement Monday, after the documentary’s Sundance Film Festival premiere on Friday left attendees stunned and shellshocked.

“We can’t just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him,” the statement continued. “Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made.”

Jackson’s estate and some of his fans have actively campaigned against the film in statements and on social media, questioning its veracity and attacking defenders of the film, its director Dan Reed, and Jackson’s accusers Wade Robson and James Safechuck, whose stories are featured in the four-hour documentary.

Taylor Jewell/Invision/AP Wade Robson (left), director Dan Reed (center), and James Safechuck (right) have been attacked by Michael Jackson's estate and some of his fans for their part in the documentary ""Leaving Neverland.""

Responding to the attacks against the film, Reed said Monday that the project was the result of a painstaking investigation and is less about Jackson and more about the lifelong trauma of sexual abuse survivors.

“A four-hour piece, is that a tabloid? I didn’t characterize Jackson at all in the film. I think if you watch it you’ll have noticed that it’s a story about these two families, and Jackson is an element of that story. But I don’t seek to characterize him at all. I don’t comment on Jackson. It’s not a film about Michael,” he said in an interview with The Hollywood Reporter. “The film itself is an account of sexual abuse, how sexual abuse happens and then how the consequences play out later in life.”

Jackson’s fans have seized on the fact that both of the accusers previously defended Jackson against other child sexual abuse allegations. However, sexual abuse experts note that trauma can affect survivors’ memories and perceptions of their experiences, particularly if they were children at the time of their abuse, as Robson and Safechuck would have been.

During a 2005 trial, Robson testified that Jackson did not molest him when he was a child. But Robson has said that he later realized he “compartmentalized” the abuse because of his close relationship to Jackson.

The family of Jackson, who died in 2009, continues to maintain that he “was and always will be 100 percent innocent of these false allegations,” and in their statement Monday, referred to Robson, Safechuck and the filmmakers as “opportunists.”

Robson and Safechuck have denied accusations from Jackson’s defenders that they were paid to tell their stories.

Danny Moloshok/Invision/AP A protester hands out pamphlets to attendees at the documentary's premiere Friday at the Sundance Film Festival.

Reed also insisted that “Wade and James were not paid in any way, directly, indirectly,” he told The Hollywood Reporter. “The family were not [remunerated]. There was nothing. No compensation in any form whatsoever.”

The director, who has said that he received death threats because of the documentary, claims that “there’s a level of organization” to the attacks from fans and that Jackson’s estate and family “have a very precious asset to protect.”

“Every time a song plays, a cash register goes ‘ka-ching,’” he said. “It doesn’t surprise me that they’ve come out fighting in defense of their asset.”

Ahead of Friday’s Sundance premiere, festival organizers established extra security procedures in anticipation of protests. A handful of protesters stood outside the theater, telling attendees to “do your research.”

Inside the theater, mental health professionals were on hand to assist viewers with processing the graphic nature and emotional intensity of the four-hour film, and the festival’s director introduced the screening with a trigger warning.

The documentary is slated to air on HBO this spring.

This story has been updated with comments from Reed."
73,https://stylecaster.com/paris-jackson-michael-jackson-documentary-rehab-response/,['Nicole Brydon Bloom'],2019-02-04 19:01:12+00:00,"Leaving Neverland is a recent two-part mini-docuseries on HBO that focuses on the allegations of two men who say that the late Michael Jackson abused them as children. After the series’ premiere, Jackson’s daughter, Paris Jackson, responded to the Michael Jackson documentary and rehab rumors that have been circulating for the past month. I

In a now-deleted tweet, Jackson denied experiencing a “meltdown” because of the documentary and confirmed that she’s “happy” and “healthy.” “There’s no meltdown, no ‘losing [my] shit,’ or being demanding of anyone,” she tweeted.

In January, a source told E! News that the 20-year-old had checked into a treatment facility to “take some time off to reboot, realign and prioritize her physical and emotional health.” Paris, who has long been active on social media, later explained her break from the spotlight in an Instagram. “the media is exaggerating per usual.. yes i’ve taken a break from work and social media and my phone because it can be too much sometimes, and everyone deserves a break,” she wrote. “but i am happy and healthy and feeling better than ever! gabriel and i have some new music we’re stoked to share with y’all! (@thesoundflowers) hope you guys’ new year started out with lots of love and light and all the things. i’ll be back soon!! xxox 🌻♥️”

Jackson’s rehab rumors started in the middle of December after the model stopped sharing photos on social media. (In this social-media-driven world, we guess people are very invested in how frequently someone posts.) Fans were quick to assume it was related to a breakdown, given Finding Neverland was set to premiere at the Sundance Film Festival in January. The film, which Jackson’s family has denounced, first screened at Sundance and is now set to premiere on HBO sometime in March. The family denies all accusations made against the late King of Pop.

“We’re living in a time where people can say anything and then it’s taken [for] the truth,” Michael Jackson’s brother, Jermaine Jackson told ITV’s Good Morning Britain on January 30, 2019. “They would rather believe a documentary than looking at what was said under oath, in front of a judge, jury, everything.”

He added, “Just leave us alone, leave him alone, let him rest, please. He deserves to rest.”

We’re sending love to Paris Jackson and her uncle, Jermaine. Regardless of everything going on, they’re right that they deserve privacy.

Things already seem to be looking up for Paris Jackson who shared a recent Instagram of her adorable dog that made us all jealous. She wrote, “my date is cuter than yours,” and she was RIGHT. How adorable is that dog? Such a floof."
74,https://pitchfork.com/news/michael-jackson-estate-denounces-new-sundance-documentary-on-alleged-child-sex-abuse/,"['Condé Nast', 'Sam Sodomsk', 'Noah Yo', 'Matthew Strauss', 'Noah Yoo', 'Madison Bloom']",None,"Note: This article contains references to child sexual abuse and rape that some readers may find disturbing.

Leaving Neverland is a new two-part documentary that follows two men, Wade Robson and James Safechuck (now in their thirties), who state they were sexually abused in the 1990s by Michael Jackson. The four-hour documentary debuted at the Sundance Film Festival yesterday, January 25. During the premiere, more details around Jackson’s alleged misconduct with the boys were brought forward via interviews, reportedly including instances of Jackson having anal sex with them and running drills to coach them into keeping the abuse a secret.

Now, the Michael Jackson Estate has issued a new statement condemning the documentary, calling the alleged victims “perjurers.” (Robson and Safechuck both reportedly claim in the documentary that Jackson threatened them to testify on his behalf during his child molestation trial in the early 2000s. They both testified that he was innocent.) “The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred. They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers,” says the estate. The full statement reads:

Leaving Neverland isn’t a documentary, it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death. The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact. These claims were the basis of lawsuits filed by these two admitted liars which were ultimately dismissed by a judge. The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred. They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers. Tellingly, the director admitted at the Sundance Film Festival that he limited his interviews only to these accusers and their families. In doing so, he intentionally avoided interviewing numerous people over the years who spent significant time with Michael Jackson and have unambiguously stated that he treated children with respect and did nothing hurtful to them. By choosing not to include any of these independent voices who might challenge the narrative that he was determined to sell, the director neglected fact checking so he could craft a narrative so blatantly one-sided that viewers never get anything close to a balanced portrait. For 20 years Wade Robson denied in court and in numerous interviews, including after Michael passed, that he was a victim and stated he was grateful for everything Michael had done for him. His family benefitted from Michael’s kindness, generosity and career support up until Michael’s death. Conveniently left out of Leaving Neverlandwas the fact that when Robson was denied a role in a Michael Jackson themed Cirque du Soleil production, his assault allegations suddenly emerged. We are extremely sympathetic to any legitimate victim of child abuse. This film, however, does those victims a disservice. Because despite all the disingenuous denials made that this is not about money, it has always been about money—millions of dollars—dating back to 2013 when both Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who share the same law firm, launched their unsuccessful claims against Michael’s Estate. Now that Michael is no longer here to defend himself, Robson, Safechuck and their lawyers continue their efforts to achieve notoriety and a payday by smearing him with the same allegations a jury found him innocent of when he was alive.

On January 28, the Jackson Family issued the following statement:

Michael Jackson is our brother and son. We are furious that the media, who without a shred of proof or single piece of physical evidence, chose to believe the word of two admitted liars over the word of hundreds of families and friends around the world who spent time with Michael, many at Neverland, and experienced his legendary kindness and global generosity. We are proud of what Michael Jackson stands for. People have always loved to go after Michael. He was an easy target because he was unique. But Michael was subjected to a thorough investigation which included a surprise raid of Neverland and other properties as well as a jury trial where Michael was found to be COMPLETELY INNOCENT. There has never been one piece of proof of anything. Yet the media is eager to believe these lies. Michael always turned the other cheek, and we have always turned the other cheek when people have gone after members of our family—that is the Jackson way. But we can’t just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him. Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made. The creators of this film were not interested in the truth. They never interviewed a single solitary soul who knew Michael except the two perjurers and their families. That is not journalism, and it’s not fair, ­yet the media are perpetuating these stories. But the truth is on our side. Go do your research about these opportunists. The facts don’t lie, people do. Michael Jackson was and always will be 100% innocent of these false allegations. The Jackson Family­­­­­

Shortly after the film was announced, the Jackson estate responded, “This is yet another lurid production in an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in on Michael Jackson.” The statement concluded, “It’s baffling why any credible filmmaker would involve himself with this project.” Leading up to the premiere, the festival’s organizers and local police were preparing against threats and protests.

Leaving Neverland was directed and produced by Dan Reed (The Paedophile Hunter, Three Days of Terror: The Charlie Hebdo Attacks). It’s set to premiere on HBO and the UK’s Channel 4 this spring.

This article was originally published on Saturday, January 26 at 10:51 a.m. Eastern. It was last updated on Monday, January 28 at 9:36 a.m. Eastern."
75,https://nypost.com/2019/01/25/explosive-michael-jackson-documentary-details-shocking-sex-abuse-claims/,"['Johnny Oleksinski', 'January']",2019-01-25 00:00:00,"PARK CITY, Utah — The Sundance Film Festival was rocked Friday by an explosive documentary detailing nearly a decade of Michael Jackson’s alleged sexual abuse against two boys, who were just 5 and 10 years old, respectively, when they first met the late singer.

Called “Leaving Neverland,” the film has been slammed by the Jackson estate, which said it was “yet another lurid production in an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in on Michael Jackson.” A fan of the King of Pop was stationed outside the Egyptian Theatre in Park City, passing out “Project Michael” flyers giving “another perspective.”

In the lead-up to the film’s premiere, the festival took extraordinary precautions, stationing at least seven police officers on the theater’s premises after threats of violence. Sundance also hired state health-care workers to tend to audience members who might become triggered by the disturbing material. Indeed, many viewers got up from their seats and walked out during explicit descriptions of the abuse.

The four-hour documentary runs down, in vulgar terms, Jackson’s alleged relationships with the two accusers — Wade Robson and James Safechuck — which began around 1986.

Jackson died of an overdose of prescription drugs in 2009.

“He helped me with my career,” said Robson, who went on to become a choreographer for N’SYNC and Britney Spears. “He also sexually abused me for seven years.”

Robson was born and raised in Brisbane, Australia, and became obsessed with Jackson after his mother brought home the music video for “Thriller.” The 5-year-old perfectly mimicked the moves, and went onto win a local dance competition in 1987 that gave him the opportunity to meet Jackson while he was there on tour.

Later, on a trip to Disneyland with his family, Robson would meet Jackson again, when the singer invited the boy and his family to Neverland Ranch, his 2,700-acre estate. There, Robson claims he and his sister played on the grounds — which included a zoo, carnival and movie theater — and Jackson asked the family to stay the weekend after meeting them just four hours prior.

“The trippy part is we felt like we knew him,” Robson says. He was thrilled when Jackson invited him and his sister, who was 10, to sleep in his bedroom that evening. The night before Robson and his family were due to depart for the Grand Canyon, the boy woke up to Jackson sobbing on the floor in the dark.

“I’m just so sad you are going to leave,” he said. Jackson convinced his mother Joy to let Robson stay five more days while the rest of the family visited Arizona. She agreed, and that lapse of judgement, allowing a 7-year-old boy to spend a week with a man he barely knew, allowed Jackson’s alleged sexual abuse to begin.

Robson claims the lewd acts started with mutual fondling, then evolved to kissing, showering together, masturbation, nipple squeezing and oral sex. He said Jackson told him, “You and I were brought together by God. This is how we show our love.”

Jackson also sought to put a wedge between Robson and his parents, calling him “son” and telling him, “Don’t trust women.”

“Once the abuse started that first week, every night I was with him there was abuse, with my mother in the next room,” Robson said.

Safechuck was a California child actor, who in 1987 starred in a Pepsi commercial featuring the King of Pop. Jackson took a liking him, and called up the boy’s home, asking his mother, Stephanie, if he could send a film crew to interview Safechuck. She enthusiastically agreed, and the kid was filmed talking about himself, lying in his bed, and then dancing.

“Now that I look back at it,” Safechuck said, “it was almost like an audition for him.”

Jackson started spending time at Safechuck’s home, often spending the night. Stephanie would even wash the wealthy singer’s clothes. Jackson invited the family to join him on a trip to a Pepsi convention in Hawaii, and he wanted 10-year-old Safechuck to sleep in his room.

“I didn’t think it was appropriate for my son to go sleep with him,” Stephanie said. “And that’s how it was the first trip.”

In an audio recording heard in the documentary, Safechuck asks Jackson, “What was the best thing about Hawaii?” Creepily, he responds, “Being with you.” And at just 10 years old, he spent his entire summer with Jackson, who introduced him to celebrities such as Tina Turner and Harrison Ford, and lavished him and his family with presents and vacations.

“In Paris, he introduced me to masturbation,” Safechuck said. “And that’s how it all started.”

As their relationship intensified, Jackson made the boy run drills to get his clothes on quickly and quietly if he heard somebody coming. He said Jackson warned him, “If people find out, his life would be over and my life would be over.”

Safechuck says that he was the first visitor to the Neverland Ranch, and claims to have had sexual relations with Jackson in its game room, third floor attic, movie theater, pool, jacuzzi and train station. “It happened every day,” he said.

Both Safechuck and Robson say they were in love with Jackson, an affection that crippled them into adulthood. In one particularly sick act, Safechuck claims the singer staged a mock wedding ceremony between the two of them, complete with written vows and a golden ring with a row of diamonds.

Back in Australia, Robson would have daily six- to seven-hour phone calls with Jackson. Smitten, Jackson gave the boy a nickname, “Little One,” and scrawled it on the many faxes he’d regularly send him. He soon convinced Robson’s mother to move her son and daughter to the US, abandoning her older son Shane and her husband, who suffered from bipolar disorder. Caught up in the allure of fame, she agreed.

But upon arrival, they were surprised to find that Jackson had put them up in a shoddy apartment the family had to pay for. Gone were the private cars, shopping sprees and Robson lost his promised role in Jackson’s “Black and White” music video. He soon discovered why: Macaulay Culkin.

The “Home Alone” actor has always denied being abused by Jackson, but he nonetheless was the object of his affection, spending much time at Neverland Ranch. Though the sexual acts sporadically continued for Robson and Safechuck, they claim Jackson replaced them with new, younger children.

By September 1992, “[Another] boy would sleep in Michael’s room and I would sleep on the sofa,” Safechuck says.

Adds Stephanie: “Every 12 months there was a new boy in his life.”

There were also women. Jackson wed Lisa Marie Presley in 1994, and divorced her in 1996, the same year he got married to Debbie Rowe.

“I remember Michael saying to me he’s going to have these public relationships with women,” Safechuck says.

When Jordy Chandler accused Jackson of sexual abuse in 1993, Safechuck and Robson both took the stand and said they had never been abused by Jackson.

‘Once the abuse started that first week, every night I was with him there was abuse, with my mother in the next room’ - Wade Robson

Jackson’s estate noted this in a statement: “Wade Robson and James Safechuck have both testified under oath that Michael never did anything inappropriate toward them.”

During the Chandler trial, Jackson’s team coached Robson and Safechuck, the men claim, to say “no” to every single question. That case was settled out of court for millions of dollars.

The two men finally told their stories in 2015, with Robson coming clean on the “Today” show. Both are now married with young children, having suffered from depression, anxiety and panic attacks in the ensuing years. Robson said protecting his own son was a major factor in his decision.

As the credits rolled at “Leaving Neverland” Friday, Safechuck and Robson were announced as surprise guests by the director Dan Reed. The Sundance audience gave them a long standing ovation."
76,http://www.justjared.com/2019/01/26/michael-jackson-estate-responds-to-controversial-leaving-neverland-documentary/,['Sansa Squad'],2019-01-26 00:00:00,"The Michael Jackson estate has released a lengthy statement slamming the Leaving Neverland documentary.

The doc, which discusses shocking allegations of child molestation against Michael, premiered during the Sundance Film Festival on Friday (January 25) in Park City, Utah.

In the statement, Michael‘s estate points out the charges had been dismissed by a judge and calls out director Dan Reed for not interviewing people who might “challenge the narrative.”

“Leaving Neverland isn’t a documentary, it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death,” the estate said.

They added, “They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers.”

Click inside to read the estate’s entire statement…



“Leaving Neverland isn’t a documentary, it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death. The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact. These claims were the basis of lawsuits filed by these two admitted liars which were ultimately dismissed by a judge. The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred. They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers.

Tellingly, the director admitted at the Sundance Film Festival that he limited his interviews only to these accusers and their families. In doing so, he intentionally avoided interviewing numerous people over the years who spent significant time with Michael Jackson and have unambiguously stated that he treated children with respect and did nothing hurtful to them. By choosing not to include any of these independent voices who might challenge the narrative that he was determined to sell, the director neglected fact checking so he could craft a narrative so blatantly one-sided that viewers never get anything close to a balanced portrait.

For 20 years, Wade Robson denied in court and in numerous interviews, including after Michael passed, that he was a victim and stated he was grateful for everything Michael had done for him. His family benefitted from Michael’s kindness, generosity and career support up until Michael’s death. Conveniently left out of Leaving Neverland was the fact that when Robson was denied a role in a Michael Jackson themed Cirque du Soleil production, his assault allegations suddenly emerged.

We are extremely sympathetic to any legitimate victim of child abuse. This film, however, does those victims a disservice. Because despite all the disingenuous denials made that this is not about money, it has always been about money – millions of dollars — dating back to 2013 when both Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who share the same law firm, launched their unsuccessful claims against Michael’s Estate. Now that Michael is no longer here to defend himself, Robson, Safechuck and their lawyers continue their efforts to achieve notoriety and a payday by smearing him with the same allegations a jury found him innocent of when he was alive.

– The Estate of Michael Jackson”"
77,https://www.businessinsider.com/michael-jackson-family-calls-hbo-doc-leaving-neverland-a-public-lynching-2019-1,['Jason Guerrasio'],2019-01-28 00:00:00,"HBO's explosive two-part Michael Jackson documentary, ""Leaving Neverland"" — in which interview subjects allege the late pop icon molested young boys — premiered at the 2019 Sundance Film Festival on Friday and instantly became one of the most talked-about movies of the fest.

Now Jackson's family is firing back.

On Monday, the family of the king of pop released a statement addressing the allegations in the movie.

""We can't just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him,"" the statement said. ""Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made.""

Directed by British filmmaker Dan Reed, ""Leaving Neverland"" details Jackson's alleged relationship with two fans, Wade Robson and Jimmy Safechuck. Now adults, the two speak on camera about their experiences with Jackson. They allege sexual abuse by the pop star and speak about how it affected them as they grew older and had families.

On Friday, the Jackson estate issued a statement following the premiere of the documentary, calling it ""the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death."" (Jackson's family issued its statement Monday.)

""These claims were the basis of lawsuits filed by these two admitted liars which were ultimately dismissed by a judge,"" the estate's statement read.

Michael Jackson with 10-year-old Jimmy Safechuck on a tour plane on July 11, 1988. Getty In 2013 and 2014, respectively, Robson and Safechuck filed two lawsuits, each alleging that Jackson had abused them in the late 1980s and early 1990s. Both were dismissed in 2017. When alive, Jackson consistently denied ever abusing children.

The lead-up to the Sundance screening on Friday had Park City police prepared for an onslaught of protesters at the premiere. But on the chilly morning when the line into the Egyptian Theatre on Main St. in Park City, Utah began to form, there were only a couple of protesters to be seen.

Once the screening ended, Twitter exploded with reactions from people who watched the movie. And the sentiment on social media was that the allegations came across credibly in the film:

The Jackson family statement made a point to call out the media for the way it's portraying the singer.

""We are furious that the media, who without a shred of proof or single piece of physical evidence, chose to believe the word of two admitted liars over the word of hundreds of families and friends around the world who spent time with Michael, many at Neverland, and experienced his legendary kindness and global generosity,"" the statement read.

Read the entire Jackson family statement below:

Michael Jackson is our brother and son. We are furious that the media, who without a shred of proof or single piece of physical evidence, chose to believe the word of two admitted liars over the word of hundreds of families and friends around the world who spent time with Michael, many at Neverland, and experienced his legendary kindness and global generosity. We are proud of what Michael Jackson stands for.

People have always loved to go after Michael. He was an easy target because he was unique. But Michael was subjected to a thorough investigation which included a surprise raid of Neverland and other properties as well as a jury trial where Michael was found to be COMPLETELY INNOCENT. There has never been one piece of proof of anything. Yet the media is eager to believe these lies.

Michael always turned the other cheek, and we have always turned the other cheek when people have gone after members of our family - that is the Jackson way. But we can't just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him. Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made.

The creators of this film were not interested in the truth. They never interviewed a single solitary soul who knew Michael except the two perjurers and their families. That is not journalism, and it's not fair, ­yet the media are perpetuating these stories.

But the truth is on our side. Go do your research about these opportunists. The facts don't lie, people do. Michael Jackson was and always will be 100% innocent of these false allegations."
78,https://consequenceofsound.net/2019/01/michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-sundance/,['Alex Young'],2019-01-25 22:01:19+00:00,"Leaving Neverland (photo via Sundance)

Leaving Neverland, the new documentary chronicling Michael Jackson’s sexual abuse allegations, premiered Friday at the Sundance Film Festival.

The four-hour documentary details Jackson’s long-running relationships with two boys, James Safechuck and Wade Robson, during the 1990s. “Now in their 30s, they tell the story of how they were sexually abused by Jackson, and how they came to terms with it years later,” reads the film’s official synopsis.



TMZ reports that Leaving Neverland is divided into two parts, with part one focusing on Safechuck’s and Robson’s individuals stories, and part two chronicling Jackson’s legal case.

According to Adam Vary of BuzzFeed, the film includes details of a mock wedding ceremony between Safechuck, then nine years old, and the pop singer. Safechuck says he received a wedding certificate and a ring as a symbol of “their undying love.”

Both Safechuck and Robson say they were abused on numerous occasions at Jackson’s Neverland Ranch, and that Jackson “had alarms go off so the boys knew to put clothes on when people would approach at Neverland,” TMZ notes. Both men contend that the abuse got worse as they got older.

Leaving Neverland features interviews with Safechuck and Robson, as well as with both of their mothers. Their testimony is supported with “love notes” and audio messages that Jackson sent to the boys.

Jackson was charged with seven counts of child molestation in 2003, but was acquitted following a lengthy jury trial. He did, however, reportedly pay upwards of $20 million in civil settlements to his accusers.

In the trial, Robson took the stand and testified on Jackson’s behalf, saying at the time that while he spent the night at Neverland more than 20 times and slept in Jackson’s bed, Jackson never molested him. In the documentary, Robson says he felt compelled to testify after Jackson threatened him and he was “scared of the repercussions,” according to TMZ. Robson and Safechuck also testified on Jackson’s behalf in a separate civil suit brought in 1993.

Following Jackson’s death in 2009, both Robson and Safechuck brought civil suits against the Jackson Estate. In 2017, a judge threw out the lawsuits, arguing that the Jackson Estate couldn’t be held liable for the singer’s own behavior.

Due to threats of protests from Jackson supporters, there was a heavy police presence outside the Egyptian Theater prior to Friday’s Sundance screening of Leaving Neverland. Additionally, the festival provided mental health counselors for audience members who were upset by the film’s content.

Feel sick to my stomach after watching Part 1 of #LeavingNeverland doc. Michael Jackson witnesses/sex abuse victims coming off very credible. It’s so sexually explicit that counselors are in the lobby. #SundanceFilmFestival2019 — Mara Reinstein (@MaraReinstein) January 25, 2019

On a 10-min break halfway through Sundance’s 4-hour Michael Jackson child sex abuse documentary. Whatever you thought you knew or were aware of, the content of this is more disturbing than you could imagine. And again, we’re only halfway through. — Kevin Fallon (@kpfallon) January 25, 2019

Among the many, many disturbing revelations of #LeavingNeverland: MJ gave one of his young male victims jewelry in exchange for sexual acts, and even staged a mock wedding complete with vows and diamond ring. #Sundance2019 — Patrick Ryan (@PatRyanWrites) January 25, 2019

Many common parallels in victims’ stories: MJ grooming them to hate their parents and women in general, saying God brought them together, eventually “casting them out” for younger boys. “There was a lot of jealousy and hurt. You were no longer special.” — Patrick Ryan (@PatRyanWrites) January 25, 2019

#Sundance has provided health care professionals in the theater for audience members potentially upset by #LeavingNeverland’s explicit descriptions of sexual abuse against underage boys. They are in the wings ready with counsel. — Matt Donnelly (@MattDonnelly) January 25, 2019

Tearful accusers James Safechuck and Wade Robson take the stage for Q&A following #leavingneverland pic.twitter.com/k8vU1LBY1U — Matt Donnelly (@MattDonnelly) January 25, 2019

In a statement released prior to the film’s premiere, the Jackson Estate called Leaving Neverland “another lurid production in an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in on Michael Jackson. Wade Robson and James Safechuck have both testified under oath that Michael never did anything inappropriate toward them. Safechuck and Robson, the latter a self-proclaimed ‘master of deception,’ filed lawsuits against Michael’s Estate, asking for millions of dollars. Both lawsuits were dismissed.”

“This so-called ‘documentary’ is just another rehash of dated and discredited allegations,” the statement continues. “It’s baffling why any credible filmmaker would involve himself with this project.”

In a post-screening Q&A (via Deadline), Safechuck said “there was no money ever offered” for his or Robson’s participation in the film. “This was really just trying to tell the story,” he said, adding he wanted to shine a light” on sexual abuse of children.

HBO will air Leaving Neverland later this year."
79,https://deadline.com/2019/01/michael-jackson-family-condemns-sundance-leaving-neverland-film-hbo-1202543728/,['Dominic Patten'],2019-01-28 17:07:36+00:00,"The screenings of Leaving Neverland at the Sundance Film Festival are over, but the family of Michael Jackson aren’t finish with their barrage against the controversial documentary – by a long shot.

“Michael always turned the other cheek, and we have always turned the other cheek when people have gone after members of our family – that is the Jackson way,” said the family in their latest statement over the film that alleges the singer repeatedly sexually abused Wade Robson and James Safechuck when they were ages 7 and 10.

“But we can’t just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him,” the statement adds in provocative language. “Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made. “ (Read the full statement from the Jackson family below)

Sundance

With a far less protesters than anticipated, increased security and a distinct show of force from the police, the two-part Dan Reed directed film premiered on the morning January 25 at Park City’s Egyptian Theatre. Along with the director, Robson and James received a standing ovation when they took to the stage after an incident free screening.

A Salt Lake City premiere of Leaving Neverland took place the next day and attracted about eight protesters in total under the watchful eye of the Utah city’s law enforcement.

Leaving Neverland is scheduled to make its small screen debut in the spring on HBO and the UK’s Channel 4.

However, sight unseen, almost immediately after it was made public in early January that Leaving Neverland would have it’s world debut at the Robert Redford founded fest at Sundance, Jackson’s family and fans have condemned the documentary.

Many noted that during Jackson’s 2005 trial on other sexual abuse charges, Robson sworn under oath that the singer never acted inappropriately with him. In an unsuccessful multi-million dollar 2016 lawsuit, which is examined in Leaving Neverland, Robson changed his story and said that the performer was a serial sexual predator who assaulted him repeatedly for years.

There’s been no new legal action by either side yet, but representatives for the estate of Jackson — who died in 2009, four years after being acquitted of seven counts of child molestation and two counts of giving a drug to a 13-year-old boy — trashed Neverland in early January as “just another rehash of dated and discredited allegations.”

On January 26, after both the SFF Park City and SLC screening had occurred, the estate declared that Leaving Neverland isn’t a documentary, it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death.”

Based on that, today’s statement from the family and the reception that the film has received from critics and most who’ve actually seen it, it looks like a new battle over Jackson’s life and legacy is about to explode – in the court of public opinion and otherwise.

Statement from the family of Michael Jackson:"
80,https://www.thedailybeast.com/sundances-glaring-michael-jackson-child-abuse-hypocrisy,['Marlow Stern'],2019-01-31 10:07:29+00:00,"PARK CITY, Utah—The most talked-about film of the 2019 Sundance Film Festival is unquestionably Leaving Neverland, filmmaker Dan Reed’s four-hour, two-part documentary chronicling the alleged child rapes committed by music legend Michael Jackson, and the devastating effects they had on two of his accusers and their families, whose starry-eyed matriarchs allowed the King of Pop to have sleepovers—and plenty of other alone time—with their young sons.

Safechuck and Robson recount how they’d idolized Jackson from an early age, with Safechuck starring in a popular Pepsi commercial with him and Robson serving as an MJ impersonator in his native Australia, eventually earning the chance to perform onstage alongside his hero. Both men (and their families) offer thoroughly convincing testimonies, explaining how Jackson earned their trust over frequent hours-long phone conversations, meetings, dinners, and luxurious trips to faraway places, with his innocent, child-like nature disarming them.

Jackson, the men claim, violated that trust when he began sexually abusing Robson and Safechuck at the ages of 7 and 10, respectively. They describe in graphic detail how the alleged abuse began with French kissing, nipple-squeezing and masturbation, with the children spreading their butt cheeks while the musician pleasured himself, and eventually moving on to oral and anal sex. Safechuck says that Jackson once performed oral sex on him in his sleep, that the two had a mock-wedding ceremony, and that he would “reward” Safechuck with diamond-encrusted jewelry for sex acts; Robson, meanwhile, contends that Jackson made him perform oral sex when he was just 7 (“In a little seven-year-old’s mouth,” he says, shaking his head).

They say that Jackson was fully aware of the abuse he was inflicting on them—that he would abuse them in fortified closets within bedrooms or a locked room off of his movie theater; that he would have them run drills in case they were caught; and that he would constantly gaslight them, telling them that the abuse was an expression of their love for one another, and that if they were ever to be caught they would both serve time in prison. When they were younger, both men testified that they were not abused by Jackson during his child-abuse trials, but later admit that they were trying to protect their idol, whom they still had conflicted feelings about. In one of these trials, Jackson’s maid at Neverland Ranch also said that she saw Jackson showering naked with Robson when he was a child. (The Jackson family has branded the film a “public lynching,” further arguing, “The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact.”)

Leaving Neverland is also the most controversial film of Sundance 2019. Prior to its premiere screening on the morning of Jan. 25, which this writer attended (as did Reed, Robson and Safechuck), the venue had received numerous threats. “Tensions are higher for this movie than anything I’ve ever seen at Sundance before,” a law enforcement source told Deadline. “No one is going to be prevented from exercising their Constitutional rights, but we are not going to allow this to get out of hand, in any way.”

It was the only screening at Sundance where attendees—including luminaries like Lena Waithe, Boots Riley and #MeToo founder Tarana Burke—were patted down and wanded with a metal detector. The 266-capacity Egyptian Theatre, where the film played, was swarmed with about two-dozen police officers, including a few with bomb-sniffing dogs. For all the excitement, however, only a handful of pro-Jackson protesters showed up on the chill Park City morning.

That Leaving Neverland—which will air later this year on HBO—debuted at Sundance is a curious development, given how only three years ago, the festival made a big spectacle of premiering the Showtime documentary Michael Jackson’s Journey from Motown to Off the Wall, a film directed by Spike Lee and produced by the Jackson Estate. Sundance also hosted a number of tie-in events for the film at the fest.

When I asked Lee at Sundance why he chose to ignore the child-abuse allegations against Jackson in the documentary, he told me, “ That was not my choice. That was determined by the record company, the Michael Jackson estate, and the fans. That’s how they arrived at that decision.”

“They just have a viewpoint of how they want it to be, and that’s their right,” he added. “And going in, I knew I didn’t want to deal with that stuff. It’s just about the music.”

After pressing Lee more on the abuse allegations against Jackson, Lee argued, “The legacy has been hijacked. The narrative has been hijacked. So things like Bad 25 and Off the Wall are going to take it back. I’m happy I’ve been given the opportunity by Sony, Epic, and the Jackson Estate to combat that. The manifesto from the get-go has been: focus on the music, his artistry, his genius. That’s the bottom line.”

Off the Wall was the second in a planned trilogy of Jackson documentaries by Lee that began with Bad 25 and was to end with Thriller, though it’s not yet known if he still plans to follow through with that blueprint.

And in the #MeToo era, eye-opening documentaries like Leaving Neverland the recent Surviving R. Kelly are forcing viewers to grapple with their own complicity, and whether one truly can separate the art from the artist, as Lee argued. It’s also led to soul-searching on the part of institutions like Sundance, an independent film festival that’s played an outsized role in elevating accused sexual predators like Jackson and, to a greater degree, Harvey Weinstein, a man who not only was at the front of the Women’s March here just two years ago, but helped make the fest what it is today."
81,https://www.nytimes.com/2019/01/25/movies/michael-jackson-movie-sundance.html,['Jason Bailey'],2019-01-25 00:00:00,"PARK CITY, Utah — Amid breathless reports of protests, disruptions and personal threats, news outlets swarmed to the Sundance Film Festival premiere of “Leaving Neverland,” a new documentary mini-series detailing accusations of sexual abuse against the pop star Michael Jackson. But the protesters outside the Egyptian Theater found themselves vastly outnumbered by reporters, photographers and camera crews, as teams from Variety, “Extra,” and, yes, The Times waited patiently for their turns to interview the poster-carrying Michael Jackson defenders. All two of them.

Brenda Jenkyns and Catherine Van Tighem said they drove 13 hours from Alberta, Canada, to protest the debut of the docu-series, which HBO will broadcast this spring. Though three more protesters showed up after the screening, the two friends said they felt compelled to speak out. “I’ve never actually heard of Sundance before that,” Jenkyns said. “I just know about Michael Jackson, and we also know about the two people who are featured in this film. So we knew that it would be not true, basically.”

Van Tighem added that the film was “not a voice for victims,” saying, “There’s another side to the story. The information is there for people, if they want to take the time to look at it.” She carried a cardboard poster featuring a photo of Jackson, as well as copies of a pamphlet titled “Protect Michael,” with a storybook-style illustration of the pop singer leading a group of children through a garden of flowers.

“Leaving Neverland,” directed by Dan Reed, paints quite a different picture of Jackson’s interactions with young people. In two parts running nearly four hours, it details the singer’s history with Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who both spent time with Jackson in the late 1980s, at the height of his post-“Thriller” fame."
82,https://consequenceofsound.net/2019/01/michael-jackson-estate-family-leaving-neverland-response/,['Michael Roffman'],2019-01-28 16:32:18+00:00,"Michael Jackson

On Friday, the controversial Michael Jackson documentary Leaving Neverland premiered at the Sundance Film Festival. Directed by Dan Reed, the four-hour doc details Jackson’s long-running relationships with two boys, James Safechuck and Wade Robson, during the 1990s.

The film reveals a number of scathing details through interviews with Safechuck and Robson, as well as with both of their mothers. Their testimony is supported with “love notes” and audio messages that Jackson sent to the boys.



Now, in the wake of the premiere, both the Michael Jackson Estate and the singer’s family have issued statements condemning the film. Both statements call the boys “perjurers,” referring to their 2000 testimony in which both Safechuck and Robson stated Jackson was innocent.

In the documentary, Robson says he felt compelled to testify after Jackson threatened him and he was “scared of the repercussions,” according to TMZ. Robson and Safechuck also testified on Jackson’s behalf in a separate civil suit brought in 1993.

“The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred,” the Estate claimed in its statement. “They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers.”

In its own statement, the Jackson family stated, “They never interviewed a single solitary soul who knew Michael except the two perjurers and their families. That is not journalism, and it’s not fair, ­yet the media are perpetuating these stories.”

Following Jackson’s death in 2009, both Robson and Safechuck brought civil suits against the Jackson Estate. In 2017, a judge threw out the lawsuits, arguing that the Jackson Estate couldn’t be held liable for the singer’s own behavior.

On Sunday, Reed responded to the Estate’s criticism, telling USA Today, “How can you call a four-hour documentary ‘tabloid’? That beats me. It’s pretty much what you’d expect them to say. … The statement contains nothing that is of concern and no substantial criticism of the film. They obviously haven’t seen it, and I’m not engaging with the substance of what they’re saying.”

He added, “I think people need to know that with child sexual abuse, the damage is caused very early on, but it’s not manifested until quite a lot later, and that’s something people need to realize because quite a few people don’t.

“Some of (Jackson’s) fans are like, ‘Why didn’t (Robson) say it before? Why did he defend Michael in court in 2005? He said nothing ever happened,'” Reed continued. “They don’t understand and I can’t blame them for that, necessarily. We’re not all born with the timeline of child sexual abuse, but here we are.”

Reed also said that he considered including other accounts in the documentary, and even reached out to Brett Barnes and Macaulay Culkin, but ultimately decided the documentary “is the story of James Safechuck and Wade Robson.”

Read the Estate’s full statement below:

Leaving Neverland isn’t a documentary, it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death. The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact. These claims were the basis of lawsuits filed by these two admitted liars which were ultimately dismissed by a judge. The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred. They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers.

Tellingly, the director admitted at the Sundance Film Festival that he limited his interviews only to these accusers and their families. In doing so, he intentionally avoided interviewing numerous people over the years who spent significant time with Michael Jackson and have unambiguously stated that he treated children with respect and did nothing hurtful to them. By choosing not to include any of these independent voices who might challenge the narrative that he was determined to sell, the director neglected fact checking so he could craft a narrative so blatantly one-sided that viewers never get anything close to a balanced portrait.

For 20 years Wade Robson denied in court and in numerous interviews, including after Michael passed, that he was a victim and stated he was grateful for everything Michael had done for him. His family benefitted from Michael’s kindness, generosity and career support up until Michael’s death. Conveniently left out of Leaving Neverland was the fact that when Robson was denied a role in a Michael Jackson themed Cirque du Soleil production, his assault allegations suddenly emerged.

We are extremely sympathetic to any legitimate victim of child abuse. This film, however, does those victims a disservice. Because despite all the disingenuous denials made that this is not about money, it has always been about money—millions of dollars—dating back to 2013 when both Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who share the same law firm, launched their unsuccessful claims against Michael’s Estate. Now that Michael is no longer here to defend himself, Robson, Safechuck and their lawyers continue their efforts to achieve notoriety and a payday by smearing him with the same allegations a jury found him innocent of when he was alive.

Read the Jackson family’s statement below.

Michael Jackson is our brother and son. We are furious that the media, who without a shred of proof or single piece of physical evidence, chose to believe the word of two admitted liars over the word of hundreds of families and friends around the world who spent time with Michael, many at Neverland, and experienced his legendary kindness and global generosity. We are proud of what Michael Jackson stands for.

People have always loved to go after Michael. He was an easy target because he was unique. But Michael was subjected to a thorough investigation which included a surprise raid of Neverland and other properties as well as a jury trial where Michael was found to be COMPLETELY INNOCENT. There has never been one piece of proof of anything. Yet the media is eager to believe these lies.

Michael always turned the other cheek, and we have always turned the other cheek when people have gone after members of our family—that is the Jackson way. But we can’t just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him. Michael is not here to defend himself, otherwise these allegations would not have been made.

The creators of this film were not interested in the truth. They never interviewed a single solitary soul who knew Michael except the two perjurers and their families. That is not journalism, and it’s not fair, ­yet the media are perpetuating these stories.

But the truth is on our side. Go do your research about these opportunists. The facts don’t lie, people do. Michael Jackson was and always will be 100% innocent of these false allegations.

The Jackson Family­­­­­

Leaving Neverland premieres on HBO this Spring."
83,https://movieweb.com/leaving-neverland-documentary-michael-jackson-family-responds/,"['Kevin Burwick', 'Writer For Movieweb Since Enjoys Playing Catan When Not Writing About Superheroes', 'Star Wars.']",2019-01-28 13:49:31-08:00,"The new Michael Jackson documentary Leaving Neverland has premiered and the family of the late pop star is not happy. The four-hour documentary detailing alleged child molestation by Jackson premiered at Sundance over the weekend and Jackson's family has released a lengthy statement, slamming the documentary and referring to the publicity that it has received as a ""public lynching."" The documentary has been big news at the annual festival with extra law enforcement on hand to make sure violence did not take place while it was screening.

Leaving Neverland is largely based on allegations by Wade Robson and James Safechuck that Michael Jackson molested them when they were children over the span of years. Robson met the pop star in Australia when he was five-years old and spent a lot of time at Jackson's Neverland Ranch. Safechuck starred in a Pepsi commercial with Jackson when he was ten-years old and later spent time at the singer's home too. The Jackson family bashes the movie along with Safechuck and Robson in a new statement. The statement reads.

""Leaving Neverland isn't a documentary, it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death. The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact. These claims were the basis of lawsuits filed by these two admitted liars which were ultimately dismissed by a judge. The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred. They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers.""

In another statement released Monday morning, Michael Jackson's family went after the media reporting about Leaving Neverland. Social media erupted over the news that the documentary was going to premiere at Sundance. Some were happy that the alleged truth is coming out and others are angry and maintain that Jackson is innocent. You can read a portion of the second statement below.

Related: HBO's Leaving Neverland Trailer Unveils the Controversial Michael Jackson Documentary

""Michael always turned the other cheek, and we have always turned the other cheek when people have gone after members of our family - that is the Jackson way. But we can't just stand by while this public lynching goes on, and the vulture tweeters and others who never met Michael go after him.""

Michael Jackson's child molestation accusations started to pop up in the early 1990s. Lawsuits have been filed and later dismissed over the last 26 years. Jackson was charged in a Santa Barbara court with child molestation, but was acquitted of the charges. Wade Robson in 2013, and James Safechuck in 2014, came forward with allegations of their own, which were later dismissed, though they are reportedly remain under appeal. Leaving Neverland director Dan Reed says that the Jackson family is behaving in a predictable way and believes that they haven't even seen the documentary.

Both Wade Robson and James Safechuck have reportedly said on record in the past that Michael Jackson never molested them, which is something that the family brings up in their statement. However, Robson says that he was ""psychologically and emotionally completely unable and unwilling to understand"" that Jackson's actions were sexual abuse over the years. Whatever the case may be, Leaving Neverland has brought the Michael Jackson child molestation allegations back into the news. CNN was the first to report this news."
84,https://www.irishtimes.com/culture/film/michael-jackson-sexually-abused-me-for-seven-years-inside-the-disturbing-new-documentary-1.3772151,[],None,"It only takes about two minutes into the four-hour documentary Leaving Neverland to realise that Michael Jackson’s legacy is never going to be the same again. After a brief introduction, praising him for his indisputable talent, one of his accusers looks into the camera and lists the ways in which the singer helped him. He then states: “And he sexually abused me for seven years.”

Ever since it was announced as a late addition to this year’s Sundance film festival, controversy hasn’t been far behind. The singer’s estate labelled it “an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in on Michael Jackson” while fans have reportedly levelled threats against the film’s director, Bafta winner Dan Reed. Protests had been teased online, leading to an increased police presence, but on a frosty morning in Utah, only a small group of the late singer’s die-hard obsessives showed up. 2009

For those inside the Egyptian theatre on Main street, resistance wasn’t futile, it was utterly impossible. Over four hours, set to be shown in two portions on both HBO and Channel 4, Reed shared the detailed testimonies of two men accusing Jackson of graphic and extensive sexual abuse when they were children.

While prior court cases might have buckled and previous accusers might have been labelled delusional opportunists, it’s difficult to imagine this sensitively crafted and horrifically detailed film being quite so easily denied.

In a decision justified in a post-screening Q&A, Reed limits the focus to the two accusers and their families, insisting quite rightly that their stories remain powerful without any extraneous material. Their accounts contain many similarities: they were both seven when they got to know Jackson, they both possessed a keen interest in performing and they were both allegedly groomed then abused for an extended period of time.

Wade Robson, Dan Reed, director of the ""Leaving Neverland"" Michael Jackson documentary, and James Safechuck. Photograph: Taylor Jewell/Invision/AP

The first accuser, whom we hear from at the outset, is Wade Robson, who at a young age developed an intense fandom for Jackson, his “walls plastered” with posters. Described as “a sensitive boy”, he preferred dance over basketball and was soon emulating Jackson’s moves at the age of five in a local contest. The prize was meeting the man himself and the pair developed a deep friendship, one that was encouraged by an over-eager, self-described stage mother, spellbound by his celebrity.

The second accuser, James Safechuck, encountered Jackson after nabbing a key role in a Pepsi ad. Similarly, the two developed a friendship at a young age and by 10 he was accompanying him on tour, followed by an equally starstruck mother, who saw Jackson as another son.

It’s James who first describes his recollection of their friendship turning sexual with Jackson allegedly introducing him to masturbation. He saw it as a form of “bonding” and it kicked off what he describes as a “sexual couple relationship” when the two were left alone, allowed to share hotel rooms by James’s unaware mother.

Michael Jackson at his trial in 2005. Photograph: Aaron Lambert/Reuters

The stories progress into even darker territory as she would find her hotel rooms being booked on different floors, Jackson making sure to prevent any potential discovery. James recalls that he woke on one occasion to find Jackson saying that while he was asleep, he performed oral sex on him. He also told the boy that he was his first sexual experience and that this was just an “acceptable way of experiencing your love”.

When Neverland Ranch was built, it became easier to ensure privacy. “It sounds sick but it’s kind of like when you’re first dating somebody,” James explains, after listing the many, many spaces at the complex where they would allegedly indulge in sexual relations. At the same time, he claims that Jackson would tell him that his mother was mean and that women were evil, pushing him away from his family and further into his life.

Wade claims that his abuse started at an even younger age when he was just seven. The family stayed at Neverland and after Jackson convinced his mother, he was allowed to be alone with him for five days. “You and I were brought together by God,” Jackson said to Wade as he would allegedly engage in a number of anal and oral activities with him. He, too, told him women weren’t to be trusted and warned that if anyone were to find out, they would both face jail.

In one of the most chilling scenes, James recalls the mock wedding the pair had, complete with wedding ring which he still owns, showing it to camera. He claims Jackson would reward him with jewelry for engaging in sexual acts. “It’s still hard for me to not blame myself,” he says, with his hands shaking as he holds the many trinkets.

But the tenderness soon wore off as Wade, still just seven, was allegedly shown hardcore porn, while James was introduced to alcohol. The two were slowly fazed out of Jackson’s life as younger boys were introduced. “You’re no longer special,” James describes. Macaulay Culkin replaced Wade in the Black and White video and both were dealing with feelings of jealousy and resentment. Before the documentary premiered, Culkin denied any impropriety. “For me, it’s so normal and mundane,” he said. “I know it’s a big deal to everybody else, but it was a normal friendship.”

A protester at the screening of Leaving Neverland at the Sundance film festival in Utah. Photograph: Jason Bailey/The New York Times

In 1993, Jackson was publicly accused of sexual abuse by Jordan “Jordy” Chandler, which led to him reinserting himself into the lives of both boys, allegedly coaching them on how to respond to any questions. The case was ultimately settled out of court.

“Secrets will eat you up,” James says while detailing the long-term damage of the alleged abuse. Both he and Wade have suffered from depression, self-loathing, anxiety and have struggled with familial relations. At one point, bleakly, James adds: “I don’t think time heals this one. It just gets worse.”

The film also delves into the responsibility of the parents, with both mothers explaining their decision-making processes. Both were horrified when, as adults, their sons shared their stories and both sons have found forgiveness difficult. It also examines the complex reasoning for their decision to stay silent for all these years, including Wade’s appearance at Jackson’s 2004-5 trial, when he was accused of abusing Gavin Arvizo, as part of his defence.

“I want to speak the truth as loud as I spoke the lie,” Wade says near the end of the film, determined to make up for the lost years spent grappling alone.

After the film ended, an ashen faced crowd rose to their feet to applaud Wade and James who arrived on stage, both visibly moved by the response. They met briefly as kids but have recently found support from each other as a way of feeling less isolated. They pointed out, for those who might question their motivations, that there was no compensation for appearing in the documentary. “We can’t change what happened to us,” Wade, now 36, said. “The feeling is what can we do with that now.”

They’ve both received death threats from Jackson fans. “I understand that it’s really hard for them to believe because, in a way, not that long ago, I was in the same position they were in,” Wade said. “Even though it happened to me, I still couldn’t believe it. I couldn’t believe that what Michael did was a bad thing up until six years ago. So I understand. We can only accept and understand something when we’re ready, and maybe we’ll never be ready. Maybe we will. So that’s their journey.” – Guardian

Leaving Neverland will air on HBO and Channel 4 later this year"
85,https://www.irishtimes.com/culture/film/michael-jackson-the-boys-the-king-the-shouting-match-1.3776316,[],None,"Such are the horrific allegations in the new Michael Jackson documentary, Leaving Neverland, that cinemagoers at its premiere at Sundance Film Festival last week were warned beforehand that the work contained disturbing descriptions of sexual abuse and that mental-health professionals would be available immediately after the screening for viewers distressed by what they had seen.

Leaving Neverland is a four-hour film that focuses on the accounts of two men who allege they endured sexual abuse by the late pop star when they were children. It is the graphic and detailed nature of these allegations that gives Leaving Neverland its dramatic impact. The documentary describes, in the two men’s words, numerous incidents of masturbation, oral sex and anal sex over a number of years in the 1980s and 1990s.

The singer’s family have labelled the documentary an outrageous attempt to cash in on Michael Jackson

The Jackson family have labelled the documentary “yet another lurid production in an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in on Michael Jackson” and pointed out that “the two men have previously testified under oath that these actions never occurred”.

Leaving Neverland will be shown on Channel 4 in the early spring. Some who attended the premiere at Sundance said they had never experienced such shock and horror at a film screening.

Critical reaction has been divided. Some feel it is such a damning indictment of Jackson that his legacy is forever tainted – if not completely destroyed. The Guardian wrote: “It only takes about two minutes into Leaving Neverland to realize that Michael Jackson’s legacy is never going to be the same again.”

Leaving Neverland: Michael Jackson supporters at Sundance. Photograph: AP

Others view it as a biased and emotionally manipulative hit piece, and question the motives of the two men. They point out, like the Jackson family, that the accusers had previously testified that Jackson never abused them.

What Leaving Neverland does is to bring Jackson into today’s larger conversation about sexual misconduct and abuse. Many high-profile figures have been exposed in recent years, and we now have a better understanding of the complex reasons why people take years after the event to report sexual abuse.

A child star

Michael Jackson was a child star who didn’t have a childhood. Fast-tracked into the family business, he was the star turn of The Jacksons, quickly outshining his brothers in the group, and singled out for stardom at an early age.

In later years he would talk about the unending pressure of the childhood-pop-star life – constant practices, rehearsals and performances – and how his father had physically and verbally abused him.

By the time he was 10 Rolling Stone magazine had already written about “this child’s piping voice, grown-up hoofer and vocal inflections similar to Sam Cooke, James Brown, Ray Charles and Stevie Wonder’s”.

His later solo career would irrevocably change the face of pop music. His album Thriller, released in 1982, was an artful fusion of musical stylings, every track a hit single, that went on to become the biggest-selling album of all time, with more than 100 million copies sold.

His performance at a tribute to the Tamla Motown record label in 1983 is regarded as one of the most stunning and electrifying pieces of music television.

Jackson was the most famous musical performer since Elvis Presley, and as his fame grew his behaviour deteriorated

With his face on the cover of every music magazine, Jackson quickly developed a self-consciousness about his appearance. He went under the surgeon’s knife to have his nose altered and followed up with various “corrective” surgeries to the extent that he soon became unrecognisable from how he appeared on the cover of Thriller.

Vitiligo, a pigmentation disorder that caused his skin to form white patches, gave him a bizarre, ghostly look.

Jackson was the most famous musical performer since Elvis Presley, and as his fame grew his behaviour deteriorated. He lived in a glorified amusement park, spoke in an unnatural squeaky child’s voice and became so distrustful of adults that he surrounded himself with children.

His first marriage, to Elvis Presley’s daughter, Lisa Marie, lasted no longer than the honeymoon. He went on to marry a nurse, Debbie Rowe, with whom he had a son and a daughter. After their divorce he had another son, but he never revealed who the mother of his third child was.

The accusations over the years of child molestation, which he always strenuously denied, led to the addiction to painkillers that contributed to his death, aged 50, in 2009.

The new allegations

Leaving Neverland is not just about new allegations of sexual impropriety by Jackson; it is about the mental journey of his two accusers and what has happened in the 20 or so years since they claim the abuse took place and when they first reported it.

James Safechuck, who is now 42, was nine when he appeared alongside Jackson in a 1986 advertisement for Pepsi cola. Jackson became friendly with the whole Safechuck family, inviting them to go on tour with him. When he was 10, Safechuck alleges, Jackson sexually abused him when they were sharing a hotel bedroom. The abuse, he alleges, continued at Jackson’s Neverland mansion, in California. The details he provides are as upsetting as they are chilling.

Wade Robson, who is now 36, met Jackson when he was five, after winning a Michael Jackson dancealike competition. Robson says he and his family were invited to stay at Neverland, where, he alleges, he was sexually abused by Jackson between the ages of seven and 14.

Robson says that Jackson persuaded his mother that it was safe to leave the child with him and that the singer would reward him with jewellery after sexually abusing him. The two, Robson claims, even participated in a mock wedding. Safechuck and Robson say Jackson introduced them to hard-core pornography and alcohol.

Leaving Neverland: Wade Robson, Dan Reed, James Safechuck. Photograph: AP

Both men say they were discarded soon after they hit puberty, as Jackson’s attentions turned elsewhere. Yet all remained on friendly terms. In 1993, not long after the alleged abuse of both men had stopped, Jackson was accused of sexual abuse by a 13-year-old boy, Jordan Chandler. Police investigators interviewed Safechuck and Robson, but both denied they had been abused.

No charges were filed against Jackson in the 1993 case. In an out-of-court settlement Jackson paid the Chandler family $22 million, saying: “I reluctantly chose to settle the false claims only to end the terrible publicity and to continue with my life and career.”

In 2005 Jackson was charged with molesting another 13-year-old boy, Gavin Arvizo.

Robson, then 21, appeared as a character witness for Jackson’s defence team. Under oath he said he had never been molested by Jackson: “I can tell you right now that if he had I wouldn’t be here right now.” Asked if had ever been touched by Jackson in a sexual way, he replied: “Never. I wouldn’t stand for it.”

Jackson was found not guilty on all charges in the Gavin Arvizo case.

Escape to Westmeath

After his acquittal in the 2005 case Jackson and his family left the United States to find a permanent home abroad. They travelled first to Bahrain and then, remarkably, after that proved unsuitable, to the town of Moate, in Co Westmeath.

Jackson, his two sons, Prince Michael jnr and Blanket, and his daughter, Paris – along with a slimmed-down entourage of a nanny and a tutor – set up home in the residential Grouse Lodge recording studio, living in a three-bedroom cottage that had been converted from a cowshed.

If ever he was spotted out and about, people would be ridiculed for saying they had just seen Michael Jackson in a shop in Moate

Jackson fell in love with Westmeath, often walking alone in the countryside. After a month living beside the studio he moved to the nearby estate of Coolatore. A local taxi driver, Ray O’Hara, became the family’s full-time driver. It was months before even locals knew Jackson was living in the area, and if ever he was spotted out and about, people would be ridiculed for saying they had just seen Michael Jackson in a shop in Moate.

Members of the Jackson family have since said the six months he spent in Westmeath were among the happiest of his life. By all accounts he particularly enjoyed going to the bowling alley in Tullamore (where the bowling shoes he wore are now on permanent display).

After six months in the Irish countryside Jackson pronounced himself “healed” and returned to the United States.

The trial’s aftermath

The aftermath of the trial was very different for Safechuck and Robson. Both developed psychological problems as they advanced through adulthood. Seven years ago, in sessions with his psychotherapist, Robson first detailed the sexual abuse he says he suffered when with Jackson.

In 2013 both men sued the Jackson estate for the sexual abuse they say they endured. They were seeking millions of dollars in compensation. Their suits were dismissed.

Reviewing Leaving Neverland for Forbes magazine, Joe Vogel, an expert on Jackson’s life and career, condemned the documentary. He says that all the allegations against Jackson over the years have come under intense scrutiny yet, when Neverland was searched, nothing incriminating was found, that the singer was acquitted of all charges in the 2005 trial and that a 300-page FBI file on Jackson, released under freedom-of-information laws, found no evidence of wrongdoing.

Vogel says the film does not hear the voices of hundreds of people who were in close personal contact with Jackson. Those friends, family, collaborators, fellow artists and former spouses, as well as his own children, are all consistent, Vogel says, in describing him as “gentle, brilliant, sensitive, sometimes naive, sometimes childish, sometimes oblivious to perceptions. None believe he was a child molestor”.

Acquitted: Michael Jackson in 2005. Photograph: Getty

The Jackson family say “the documentary is a public lynching, it takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact”. They say its makers interviewed only two “opportunists and perjurers”.

Safechuck and Robson appeared at the Sundance premiere last week; both said they were not paid to take part in the film.

Responding to the criticism of their allegations, Robson said: “I understand that it’s really hard for people to believe, because not long ago I was in the same position. Even though [the abuse] happened to me, I still couldn’t believe it. I couldn’t believe that what Michael did was a bad thing up until six years ago. We can only accept and understand something when we’re ready.”

There are two opposing sides here: the makers of Leaving Neverland have taken a side by giving the two men a platform. The thoroughness with which they detail their allegations is gripping. Critics of the project point to the ways the two men’s stories have changed over the years and the failure of their lawsuit against the Jackson estate.

In the distorted mirror world of infotainment, the publicity around Jackson’s criminal trial ensured his albums re-entered the charts and became hits all over again

Robson says he was “brainwashed” by Jackson and his lawyers into testifying on his behalf during the 2005 trial.

Between all of the accusations and counteraccusations lies the warping effect of a celebrity culture that sees starstruck parents flock to Neverland with their young children. Wealth and fame blind people to the fact that a middle-aged man sharing his bed with a young boy, as the singer admitted in the 2002 Martin Bashir documentary, Living with Michael Jackson, is never healthy.

The psychological scars of sexual abuse, as detailed in Leaving Neverland, are complex and often contradictory in nature.

Leaving Neverland’s director, Dan Reed, said he never doubted the veracity of the two men’s testimonies. “If there’s anything we’ve learned during this time in our history, it’s that sexual abuse is complicated, and survivors’ voices need to be listened to. It took great courage for these two men to tell their stories, and I have no question about their validity. I believe anyone who watches this film will see and feel the emotional toll on the men and their families and will appreciate the strength it takes to confront long-held secrets.”

A public shouting match

There is now a very public shouting match between those who believe Leaving Neverland and those who view it as a character assassination. The Jackson family have said they plan to bring out their own detailed documentary about the singer’s life, in a rebuttal of Reed’s work.

Leaving Neverland is powerful and shocking. As damning as it is, though, some distance remains between those who believe Jackson was a naive and foolish eccentric and those who believe he was a dangerous and manipulative sexual predator who targeted impressionable boys.

As for Jackson’s legacy, previous accusations of sexual abuse have come and gone without any major impact on his still-healthy record sales. And, of course, Jackson was never convicted of any offence. Perhaps not every television station or streaming service will want to screen Jackson footage after these new and very serious allegations, but his music is unlikely to be pulled from the schedules.

In the distorted mirror world of infotainment, the publicity around Jackson’s criminal trial ensured his albums re-entered the charts and became hits all over again. That is likely to happen, too, as the Leaving Neverland controversy continues to grow.

Consider also that when the singer walked into the courthouse each day to face those child-molestation charges in 2005, dozens of parents surrounded him, all holding up their young children and shouting: “Please take him, Michael. Take him to Neverland with you.”"
86,https://news.yahoo.com/michael-jackson-child-molester-113034712.html,['Kyle Smith'],2019-01-28 11:30:34+00:00,"It has been apparent since the mid 1990s that Michael Jackson was a child molester. A great entertainer, yes, but almost certainly a serial abuser of little boys. That his attorneys managed to cast doubt on witnesses in a notorious 2005 criminal trial doesn’t inspire much confidence. As was the case with Bill Cosby, the pattern of grotesque allegations has become impossible to ignore.

Wade Robson, 36, and James Safechuck, 40, have previously stated under oath that they weren’t victimized by Jackson when they were children. They are now saying their previous testimony was untrue and that it resulted from direct pressure by Jackson himself, who told them that he and they would be jailed if he should be convicted of sexual abuse. “I want to speak the truth as loud as I spoke the lie,” Robson says in the four-hour documentary Leaving Neverland, which has just premiered at the Sundance Film Festival ahead of being broadcast on HBO later this year. In the film, he and Safechuck tell their stories in gruesome, indeed sickening, detail. (A statement from the Jackson estate dismissed the allegations as uncorroborated “tabloid character assassination.”)

I haven’t yet seen Leaving Neverland, but those who have report that the film paints a damning picture. Safechuck was a child actor who says he met Jackson at age ten while filming a Pepsi commercial. Starting when he was eleven, he says, they engaged in sex acts many times at Jackson’s Neverland compound — in a castle, in an attic, in a pool, in a train station. Safechuck says the pop singer used to hold drills in which he would train the boy in putting his clothes on quickly in case any witnesses should appear. Jackson also told him that “if anyone ever found out that we were doing these sexual things, we would go to jail for the rest of our lives.” “I was terrified.” When Safechuck was 14, he says, Jackson staged a mock wedding with him, complete with vows and a diamond-encrusted wedding ring.

Robson, a Brisbane-born dancer who grew up to be a choreographer for Britney Spears and others, says he also met Jackson in 1987, when he was just five and performed in a dance contest that led to him meeting the singer during the Bad tour in Australia. When he moved to Los Angeles, the pair had sexual contact starting while he was seven, he claims. Jackson advised the boy to throw away his underwear after the first sexual encounter, Robson says. Jackson, who would marry Lisa Marie Presley in 1994, said his ostensibly heterosexual relationships with women were purely a public-relations exercise. This too was obvious to all at the time.

Why did the parents allow their children to spend so much time alone with Jackson? The film “captures how the parents found themselves under the spell, and the Mob-like pushiness, of Michael’s celebrity,” wrote Owen Gleiberman in Variety. “They thought he was creating opportunities for their children that might otherwise be taken away. And once inside their homes, he seemed the soul of gentleness.”

Robson and Safechuck filed civil suits against the estate of Jackson in 2013 and 2014. Both cases were thrown out for technical reasons; there was no ruling on the merits of their claims. The stories they tell are of a piece with other stories we’ve been hearing about for a quarter of a century. In 1993, the father of a 13-year-old boy named Jordy Chandler accused Jackson of engaging in sexual acts with the boy. The criminal case was closed for lack of evidence, but Jackson agreed to pay out a sum reported by Court TV to be nearly $25 million. In 2004–05, Jackson was accused in an 18-month trial of molesting and otherwise abusing Gavin Arizo, a 13-year-old boy. Jackson was acquitted of all charges, but the evidence that emerged was disturbing. Several adults claimed to have witnessed acts of molestation, but Jackson’s lawyers were able to raise reasonable doubts about their credibility for various reasons. Some were disgruntled former employees; some had previously testified that they had seen nothing.

To some extent, we as a society have set aside the many horrific and entirely credible claims against Jackson simply because we want them not to be true; for the same reason, Bill Cosby got a pass for a surprisingly long time. Jackson’s unfortunate early demise, his apparent closeted homosexuality, and his wounded, childlike nature have made fans fiercely protective of him, with the media largely sidestepping the issue since he died in 2009. What punishment can be visited upon him posthumously? Should he be erased from the culture the way Cosby has been? Should radio stations and deejays stop playing his many great records the way broadcasters have stopped airing The Cosby Show? I’m not sure they should. But the label of serial child molester must be forever attached to Michael Jackson’s name. It should be reiterated constantly like an anti-honorific, the way we take care to refer to President Carter or General MacArthur.

More from National Review"
87,https://ew.com/movies/2019/02/08/leaving-neverland-michael-jackson-hbo/,['Clark Collis'],2019-02-08 00:00:00,"HBO has announced that the four-hour long, two-part documentary Leaving Neverland will premiere on the network March 3 and March 4. Directed by Dan Reed, the film focuses on two men, Wade Robson and Jimmy Safechuck, who claim that, as children, they were sexually abused by the late pop star Michael Jackson. But there are several things you need to know before deciding whether to tune in.

It’s intense

In Leaving Neverland, Robson alleges Jackson began to abuse him at the age of 7, after he and his family started visiting the Thriller star at his Neverland ranch. Robson also claims Jackson performed oral sex on him and would ask the child to expose his anus while Jackson masturbated. Safechuck says Jackson performed oral sex on him while he was asleep and that the singer would reward him with jewelry for sex acts.

It has been criticized by the Jackson estate

Ahead of the documentary’s world premiere at this year’s Sundance Film Festival, the Jackson estate issued a statement to E! News describing Leaving Neverland as “just another rehash of dated and discredited allegations. It’s baffling why any credible filmmaker would involve himself with this project.”

It was one of the most talked-about films at Sundance

In fact, the film was making news even before it premiered at the Egyptian Theater in Park City on Jan. 25. In a Deadline article published two days earlier, a law enforcement source was quoted as saying, “Tensions are higher for this movie than anything I’ve ever seen at Sundance before. No one is going to be prevented from exercising their Constitutional rights, but we are not going to allow this to get out of hand, in any way.” At the screening itself, two protestors clashed with police.

Critics and journalists who saw the film described it as a harrowing experience.

“It’s halftime at the four-hour Michael Jackson doc and I’m already gonna need 400 showers to ever feel clean again,” tweeted David Ehrlich from Indie Wire.

“On a 10-min break halfway through Sundance’s 4-hour Michael Jackson child sex abuse documentary,” wrote Kevin Fallon of The Daily Beast. “Whatever you thought you knew or were aware of, the content of this is more disturbing than you could imagine. And again, we’re only halfway through.”

Both Robson and Safechuck attended the premiere and received a standing ovation at the end of the film.

There was a rumor HBO wouldn’t screen the film

The Jackson estate has continued to criticize the movie. On Feb. 7, according to Deadline, lawyer Howard Weitzman sent a letter to HBO CEO Richard Pepler pointing out that “the Estate spent years litigating with Robson and Safechuck, and had four different lawsuits by these two men dismissed with prejudice. In those litigations, the Estate discovered troves of information about Robson and Safechuck that made it unequivocally clear that they had no credibility whatsoever… Had HBO actually complied with the most basic of journalistic ethics — rather than just accept their salacious allegations at face value — it would have discovered so much more long before it ever got involved in this disgraceful project.”

On Feb. 8, one media report suggested that the documentary might not show up on the HBO schedule. But later in the day, the cable network released the March premiere dates. Around the same time, The Hollywood Reporter posted an interview with programming president Casey Bloys in which he spoke about the documentary.

“All I would ask is that anybody writing or thinking about it would watch it and reserve judgment until they see it,” he said. “It’s a very powerful documentary.”

Related content:"
88,https://www.yourtango.com/2019321211/who-michael-jacobshagen-new-details-leaving-neverland-michael-jackson-accuser,[],2019-01-28 18:52:23,"He claims he was sexually groomed by the king of pop.

The premiere of the documentary ""Leaving Neverland"" at the 2019 Sundance Film Festival reportedly shed light on Michael Jackson's sexually abusive past.

""Leaving Neverland"" detailed the lives of two young boys, now grown men, who claim Jackson sexually abused them as children. Since the film's initial showing, a man named Michael Jacobshagen has come forward to claim that tell the late King of Pop also sexually groomed him when he was a boy.

When Jacobshagen was 14, he toured with Jackson throughout Europe, appearing in the media many times during his time with the singer. Only recently has he detailed the truly disturbing nature of their shared encounters.

Jackson allegedly nicknamed Jacobshagen his ""Rubba Rubba"" boy and shared a bed with him.

“He was always asking me to sleep in his bed. I would say, ‘No Michael, I can sleep in my own suite’, but he was saying ‘Please, please... for Michael Jackson,'"" Jacobshagen told the Sunday Mirror.

Sunday Mirror

He also claimed that the ""Billy Jean"" singer ""grinded"" on him when they were in bed together, he claimed.

""When I slept in his bed, we wore just boxer shorts and he would put his arm around me and push his body to my body, like you would with a girlfriend,"" Jacobshagen explained. “He would put our bodies on each other and kiss me on the head and cheek. I woke many times and his hands were on me... one hand on the top of my legs and one hand around me.""

He said it was worse when Jackson was on medication. The meds would ""disinhibit him"" like ""a man when he gets drunk,"" Jacobshagen claimed.

“He’d pull me closer and be grabbing me more and kissing me more on the head and on the cheek, He would also stroke my hair.""

One time, MJ stripped naked in a Jacuzzi and invited Jacobshagen to do the same, according to Jacobshagen. He said no.

He also said the pop star gave him a copy of ""The Boy: A Photographic Essay,"" a book containing naked photos of young boys. Jackson said it was one of his favorite books and wrote personal notes to Jacobshagen in it, calling him his ""Rubba Rubba friend"" and ""special friend.""

Although Jacobshagen said he was not ""comfortable"" with the way MJ touched him, he felt he could not say no.

“He never carried out an explicit sexual act on me, but there were sexual intentions,"" he added. “He must have been getting something out of it sexually. I feel now like he was testing me, seeing how far he could go.”

Jacobshagen, now 35, said he only realized how inappropriate MJ was with him as a child now that he is a father.

“He overstepped the mark with me and with other children,"" he told the Sunday Mirror. “I’m almost the same age now Michael was when he met me. If I was to share a bed with a child, this would not be right. It is not normal and it’s not right.""

“Since I had a son, it made me look at everything in a different way and I realize now how wrong it was,"" Jacobshagen continued. ""Becoming a father changed my feelings.”

Jacobshagen said that he knows there will be backlash folowing his story's release but the truth needs to be told.

“His fans won’t like me saying these things,"" he said. ""They treat him like a God. But the truth is the truth.”

Jackson's estate criticized the film, claiming it was just an excuse to make money off of the dead singer.

“This is yet another lurid production in an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in on Michael Jackson,"" his estate told TMZ, adding that the ""so-called documentary is just another rehash of dated and discredited allegations. It’s baffling why any credible filmmaker would involve himself with this project.”

Sarah Gangraw writes about all things news, entertainment and crime. You can follow her on Instagram and Twitter."
89,https://www.digitalmusicnews.com/2019/01/17/kew-media-leaving-neverland-michael-jackson/,"['Daniel Is An Avid Writer Who Was Born', 'Raised In Los Angeles.', 'Alongside Writing', 'He Is Also A Passionate Reader', 'An English Teacher For Ell Students. He Dedicates His Spare Time To Raising His Two Bagirls.']",2019-01-17 00:00:00,"Michael Jackson Sex Abuse Documentary Receives International Distribution

Despite fan outrage, the Sundance Film Festival will still screen the controversial Michael Jackson documentary. Now, it’s getting distributed worldwide.

Following the successful airing of six-part docuseries Surviving R. Kelly, the Sundance Film Festival suddenly added a new world premiere.

Produced and directed by Dan Reed, Leaving Neverland centers around sexual abuse allegations against the late King of Pop.

Two victims, now in their 30s, will describe their alleged relationship with Michael Jackson. James Safechuck and Wade Robson claim that when they were young boys aged 10 and 7, respectively, the late pop singer started a relationship with them and their families. Then, once he had gained their trust, the King of Pop sexually molested them.

Both claim that it took them years to come to terms with what happened.

Speaking out against the airing of the controversial documentary, the Michael Jackson estate said,

“This is yet another lurid production in an outrageous and pathetic attempt to exploit and cash in on Michael Jackson. “Wade Robson and James Safechuck have both testified under oath that Michael never did anything inappropriate toward them. This so-called ‘documentary’ is just another rehash of dated and discredited allegations.”

Maintaining the late pop star’s innocence, the estate says that Jackson maintained friendships — and nothing more.

Speaking on the podcast Inside of You with Michael Rosenbaum, Macaulay Culkin described his close relationship with Jackson as “so normal and mundane.”

“It’s almost easy to try and say it was ‘weird’ or whatever, but it wasn’t, because it made sense. It’s one of my friendships that people question, only because of the fact that he was the most famous person in the world.”

The child star also added Jackson “wanted to make sure I wasn’t alone.”

The film festival has recently addressed adamant fan protests to pull the documentary.

“It has come to our attention that some of you may have received messages or social media posts from Michael Jackson fans who would like us to pull the screening of Leaving Neverland. “Sundance Institute supports artists in enabling them to fully tell bold, independent stories, stories on topics which can be provocative or challenging. “We look forward to audiences at the Festival seeing these films and judging the work for themselves, and discussing it afterwards.”

Now, the documentary will air internationally, thanks to a new deal.

According to a new report, Kew Media Distribution has secured the international distribution rights – except in the UK and the US – to the two-part documentary.

The documentary features interviews with the victim’s mothers, wives, and siblings. Leaving Neverland reportedly paints a portrait of “sustained abuse” and explores “the complicated feelings” both men had.

Speaking on the decision to air the documentary worldwide, Jonathan Ford, Executive Vice President of Sales at Kew Media, explained that the company remains dedicated to “providing strong and emotive programming to Kew Media Distribution’s roster of clients around the world.”

The 2019 Sundance Film Festival will start on January 24th. HBO and Channel 4 will air the two-part documentary this spring."
90,https://www.spin.com/2019/01/michael-jackson-child-sexual-abuse-allegations-timeline/,[],2019-01-30 09:56:01+00:00,"There was a time when Michael Jackson was untouchable. After Jackson transitioned away from the Jackson 5 and linked with Quincy Jones for Off the Wall in 1979, his albums broke every conceivable sales record and established his reputation as the King of Pop. He was an unassailable cultural icon, and his music from that period, from Off the Wall to Dangerous in 1991, speaks for itself.

Jackson’s career was never quite the same after that. He’d been the subject of strange tabloid rumors involving skin bleaching and hyperbaric chambers since Bad in 1987, but it was not until the Dangerous era that Jackson’s increasingly detached and eccentric lifestyle began to take hold on his career. In 1988, Jackson purchased a sprawling property in Santa Barbara County that he named Neverland Ranch, after the “Neverland” of J.M. Barrie’s Peter Pan, where children never grow up. Jackson was known for developing close friendships with young children and inviting them to the property for extended periods of time. In 1993, Jackson was accused of sexually abusing an underage boy at Neverland Ranch. For the rest of his life, he would be dogged by allegations involving pedophilia and sexual abuse, amounting to a sort of permanent asterisk next to his name. At the time of his death in 2009, Jackson had denied every accusation against him, and had never been convicted of any crime. Here’s a look back at all those allegations, and their implications for Jackson’s legacy.

1992-1993: Evan Chandler, Jordan Chandler, and the first allegations of child sexual abuse.

In May 1992, Michael Jackson’s car broke down in Beverly Hills. When he contacted a nearby rental car agency, the owner told his wife, June Chandler-Schwartz, to hurry over to the site of the stalled vehicle if she wanted to catch a glimpse of the King of Pop. Chandler-Schwartz did so, and brought along her 13-year-old son, Jordan, who was a big fan of Jackson’s. In the wake of that roadside encounter, Jackson exchanged numbers with the young Jordan Chandler, and the two developed a close friendship. Jackson flew Jordan around the world with him, and often invited him over for “sleepovers” at Neverland Ranch. In 1993, Chandler-Schwartz’s ex-husband Evan Chandler (father of Jordan) grew suspicious of Jackson’s relationship with Jordan. On August 17, Chandler took his son to a psychiatrist, where Jordan revealed the details of Jackson’s abuse, including fondling and oral sex. Per California law, the allegations were then reported to the police, who launched an investigation into Jackson.

September 1993: Evan Chandler files civil suit.

Evan Chandler filed a civil suit against Jackson on September 14, on behalf of his son. The suit alleged that Jackson had “repeatedly committed sexual battery” on Jordan Chandler, and that Jackson forced him to touch his nipples as he masturbated. In December, Jackson publicly refuted all claims via a satellite broadcast from Neverland Ranch. And on January 25, Jackson and his team settled the case for around $23 million. Jackson was never charged, though the allegations began to muddy his reputation, complicating the longstanding idea of Jackson as simply a harmless, eccentric genius.

February 2003: Martin Bashir’s Living with Michael Jackson airs.

In 2002 and 2003, BBC journalist Martin Bashir conducted a series of interviews with Michael Jackson at Neverland Ranch. The interviews were compiled into the documentary Living with Michael Jackson, in which Bashir revealed new details about Jackson’s relationship to the young boys he invited to stay at the Ranch. One of those boys, Gavin Arvizo, had started coming to Neverland Ranch in 2000; Arvizo had survived cancer, and Jackson had invited him to Neverland during his recovery. Asked about sharing a bed with Arvizo, Jackson called it a “beautiful thing.” Jackson also claimed that his closeness with Gavin was part of an effort to “heal” him. This detail, among others in the documentary about “sleepovers” with underage boys, prompted the criminal investigation that eventually led to Jackson’s criminal trial in 2005.

November-December 2003: Jackson is arrested and formally charged with child molestation.

By November, Arvizo had anonymously accused Jackson of molestation (though he was named in Living with Michael Jackson, he made his accusations as a “John Doe” after the documentary aired). The criminal investigation prompted by the documentary came to a head on November 18 when police raided Neverland Ranch, and then arrested Jackson just a few days later. In December, Jackson was formally charged on nine counts: “seven of child molestation and two of administering an intoxicating agent for the purpose of a committing a felony.”

2004-2005: Jackson is tried in Santa Barbara County’s Superior Court.

The People v. Michael Jackson was a long, heavily publicized affair, thanks in large part to Jackson’s increasingly strange antics throughout the case. On the day of his arraignment, Jackson climbed on top of a car and started dancing and waving to fans. Toward the end of the trial, Jackson was showing up to court in his pajamas. Martin Bashir was called to testify, as was the then-unnamed Arvizo and his family. Per a New York Times report of the testimony, Arvizo stated that when he first arrived at Neverland Ranch, Jackson showed Arvizo and his brother “several pornographic Web sites depicting naked women and girls, some of them about 15 years old.”

In addition to the claims involving pornography, the prosecution alleged that Jackson had masturbated in front of Arvizo and tried to ply him with wine. Arvizo’s brother told the court that he saw Jackson molesting his brother on two occasions. The prosecution also brought in Jackson’s housekeeper, Blanca Francia, who testified that she saw Jackson taking a shower with Wade Robson, another young companion of Jackson’s. Robson testified in defense of Jackson, and according to Jackson’s attorney was “adamant that he had never been improperly touched or molested.” Francia’s son Jason testified independently that Jackson had tickled his crotch area. On June 13, 2005, Jackson was acquitted of all charges after his defense lawyers painted a thorough portrait of the Arvizo family as “con artists, actors and liars” looking to make money and ruin Jackson’s reputation. One juror told The New York Times that she believed Gavin Arvizo’s mother “had taught her children to lie to gain money or favors from celebrities.”

June 2009: Jackson dies in Los Angeles.

May 2013: Wade Robson, who had testified in defense of Jackson during the trial, alleges sexual abuse.

In May 2013, choreographer Wade Robson alleged that he was molested by Jackson when he was seven years old. Robson first met the King of Pop when he was only five, after winning a dance competition run by Jackson’s company, MJJ Productions. Robson had been a key witness in Jackson’s trail back in 2005, refuting a housekeeper’s claim that she had seen him in the shower with Jackson. In 2013, claiming that MJJ Productions and Jackson’s other company, MJJ Ventures, were child sex operations “specifically designed to locate, attract, lure and seduce child sexual abuse victims,” Robson filed a claim against Jackson’s estate and sued both MJJ Productions and MJJ Ventures. The claim was thrown out in 2015, with the judge stating that too much time had passed between the alleged abuse and the filing of the claim. The suit against the MJJ Productions and MJJ Ventures was dismissed in 2017 when a judge ruled that neither company was liable for Robson’s exposure to Jackson.

May 2014: James Safechuck files claims against Jackson’s estate alleging sexual abuse.

In 1987, ten-year-old James Safechuck was cast in a Pepsi commercial promoting Jackson’s solo world tour. Jackson became close to Safechuck in the following years, and frequently invited him to Neverland Ranch. Jackson invited Safechuck and his mother out on tour with him, where the first incidents of abuse occurred. According to The LA Times, Safechuck cited “hundreds” of sexual encounters with Jackson. Safechuck also claimed that Jackson invented a complicated series of sexual code words in an attempt to promote secrecy. (“Bright light, big city” was apparently code for “erection,” while “duck butter” meant “semen.”)

Safechuck said that in 1993, during the case involving Evan and Jordan Chandler, Jackson’s lawyers “rehearsed questions and testimony” with Safechuck, and had him give a witness statement to the police. Safechuck had been mentioned in the court documents for Jackson’s 2005 trial, and Jackson allegedly “threatened” Safechuck to get him to testify on his behalf, but unlike Robson he never appeared in court. In May 2014, Safechuck filed a formal complaint alleging Jackson sexually abused him as a child. Safechuck also added his name to the suit originally filed by Robson against Jackson in 2013. His complaint was dismissed in 2017.

January 2019: Leaving Neverland premieres at Sundance, featuring detailed testimony from Robson and Safechuck.

When Dan Reed’s four-hour documentary Leaving Neverland premiered at Sundance on January 25, the reaction from critics was instantaneous. Early reviews called it “devastating” and “overwhelmingly powerful and convincing.” David Ehrlich of IndieWire writes: “In the wake of Reed’s film and the shattering interview footage that it exists to share with us, there’s no longer a reasonable doubt. There’s no longer any doubt at all. Not only do the documentary’s two main subjects perfectly corroborate their separate accounts in all of the most tragic of ways, but they do so with a degree of vulnerability that denies any room for skepticism.” The impact of Leaving Neverland Jackson’s reputation as a cultural icon has yet to be seen. When the documentary airs later this year on HBO, the asterisk next to Jackson’s name could grow into something much larger and more significant for the history of American pop music."
91,https://www.thehollywoodgossip.com/2019/01/michael-jackson-child-abuse-documentary-amounts-to-public-lynchi/,['Tyler Johnson'],2019-01-30 08:50:44-05:00,"Earlier this month, millions of viewers were stunned by the Lifetime docuseries Surviving R. Kelly -- which focused on the decades of sexual assault allegations against the singer.

Now, it seems Michael Jackson is receiving the same treatment, via a four-hour documentary that premiered at the Sundance Film Festival Friday night.

The film, Leaving Neverland, focuses on the stories of two of Jackson's accusers, Wade Robson and James Safechuck.

As the doc has yet to secure a distributor and a wide release, it has thus only been seen by a select group of festival attendees.

But if their reactions are any indication, Leaving Neverland may contain another scathing new information for the King of Pop to be forever stripped of his crown.

“It only takes about two minutes into the four-hour documentary Leaving Neverland to realize that Michael Jackson’s legacy is never going to be the same again,” wrote Benjamin Lee in his review for The Guardian.

“spoiler alert: Michael Jackson 100% sexually abused a lot of children,"" tweeted IndieWire's David Ehrlich.

Shortly after the film's release, Jackson's estate issued a strongly-worded statement that was published in full on Rolling Stone's website:

According to Jackson's reps, the film constitutes “the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death.”

The statement continues:

“The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact.""

Now, Jackson's family is also hitting back with a statement that questions both the integrity and the intentions of the filmmakers.

""The truth is on our side,” writes the family.

“Go do your research about these opportunists. The facts don’t lie, people do.”

The statement continues:

""We are furious that the media, who without a shred of proof or single piece of physical evidence, chose to believe the word of two admitted liars over the word of hundreds of families and friends around the world who spent time with Michael, many at Neverland, and experienced his legendary kindness and global generosity.

""We are proud of what Michael Jackson stands for.

""People have always loved to go after Michael.

""He was an easy target because he was unique. But Michael was subjected to a thorough investigation which included a surprise raid of Neverland and other properties as well as a jury trial where Michael was found to be COMPLETELY INNOCENT.

""Michael Jackson was and always will be 100% innocent of these false allegations.""

The Jackson family's statement can be read in its entirety here.

Sexual assault allegations followed Jackson throughout his career, but none of the many accusers were able to help secure a conviction.

The Jacksons have decried the film as a ""public lynching"" of a man who is no longer here to defend himself, while others feel that Leaving Neverland might finally provide a modicum of justice and peace of mind to the singer's victims.

Many are concerned about the effect the film might have on Jackson's children, particularly his troubled daughter Paris, who reportedly refuses to watch the documentary.

We'll have further updates on this developing story as more information becomes available."
92,https://pagesix.com/2019/02/09/michael-jacksons-estate-urges-probe-into-digraceful-docs-accusers/,"['Associated Press', 'February']",2019-02-09 00:00:00,"Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)

LOS ANGELES — Michael Jackson’s estate is calling HBO’s decision to air a documentary that includes allegations from two men that the superstar molested them “disgraceful” and is urging the cable network to further investigate their backgrounds.

The 10-page letter released Friday offers a meeting with HBO executives to try to discredit the stories of the two men featured in the documentary “Leaving Neverland,” Wade Robson and James Safechuck. The estate contends the men are lying and court filings and story inconsistencies prove that.

The letter, written by estate attorney Howard Weitzman, assails the documentary for focusing solely on Robson and Safechuck’s stories and not interviewing anyone from Jackson’s family, his estate or others who knew him. It states Robson had sought work on a Jackson-themed Cirque du Soleil show and raised the molestation allegations only after he wasn’t hired.

The first installment of the four-hour documentary will first air on HBO on March 3, with the second half airing the following night. HBO said in a statement after the letter’s release: “Our plans remain unchanged. … Dan Reed is an award-winning filmmaker who has carefully documented these survivors’ accounts. People should reserve judgment until they see the film.”

Both Robson and Safechuck both alleged they were molested and unsuccessfully sued Jackson’s estate after the singer’s June 2009 death. Robson testified in Jackson’s defense at a 2005 molestation trial that ended with the singer’s acquittal.

The Associated Press does not typically name victims of sexual abuse, but attorneys for Robson and Safechuck have said they have agreed to be named publicly. The men also appeared onstage following the film’s premiere at the Sundance Film Festival, where “Leaving Neverland” was greeted with a standing ovation .

Director Dan Reed has said he intentionally focused on the stories of Robson and Safechuck.

“Anyone who sees the film will know it is solely about hearing the stories of two specific individuals and their families in their own words, and that is a focus we are very proud of,” Reed said in a previous statement.

Weitzman’s letter includes an offer to meet with HBO executives to discuss the film, and states that if the network cares about ethical standards “this documentary will never air on HBO.”

“We know that this will go down as the most shameful episode in HBO’s history,” Weitzman’s letter said. “We know that Michael’s devoted fans, and all good people in the world, will not swiftly forgive HBO for its conduct.”"
93,https://www.hotnewhiphop.com/brandi-jackson-says-michael-jackson-leaving-neverland-accuser-is-her-ex-bf-news.71811.html,['Aron A.'],2019-02-12 19:02:25+00:00,"The child molestation allegations against Michael Jackson resurfaced recently after the premiere of Leaving Neverland. Two men came forth with accusations claiming the iconic pop star molested them when they were children. However, the niece of the late-singer revealed that she dated Robson for seven years back in the day. On top of that, she claims that it was Michael himself that introduced them.



Mark J. Terrill-Pool/Getty Images

Wade Robson may have omitted an important piece of information in his appearance in Leaving Neverland, according to Brandi Jackson. Michael Jackson's niece took to Twitter to air out Robson who she said she once dated.

""Wade and I were together for over 7 years, but I bet that isn’t in his “documentary” because it would ruin his timeline. And did I mention, it was my uncle, #MichaelJackson, who set us up? Wade is not a victim, #WadeRobsonIsaLiar,"" she wrote.

She described Robson as thirsty, claiming he cheated on her in order to advance his career and alluding that he was the reason why Britney Spears and Justin Timberlake split up.

""I found out Wade cheated on me with multiple woman who he hoped would advance his career. You might know one of them, because it was a huge pop music scandal. Wade is not a victim, he’s an #Opportunist,"" she wrote. Adding, ""Wade: You constantly talked about wanting to be “relevant”. You’ve burned so many bridges that now the only time you are # relevant is when you headline with my family’s name next to yours. It’s time to stop these lies and live your own life.""

Robson has yet to issue a comment on Brandi Jackson's tweets."
94,https://www.cinemablend.com/news/2465887/michael-jacksons-estate-has-responded-to-the-sex-abuse-documentary,[],2019-01-28 17:34:22+00:00,"Michael Jackson's Estate Has Responded To The Sex Abuse Documentary By Dirk Libbey Random Article Blend A new documentary about Michael Jackson was destined to drum up controversy and now the late singer's estate has responded. Leaving Neverland debuted at the Sundance Film Festival over the weekend and follows two adults who claim that when they were children they were sexually abused by the singer. Shortly after the documentary's debut in Park City, UT, the estate of the late performer issued a statement claiming that the two accusers were liars and questioning the documentary status of the film. The statement reads, in part... Leaving Neverland isn’t a documentary, it is the kind of tabloid character assassination Michael Jackson endured in life, and now in death. The film takes uncorroborated allegations that supposedly happened 20 years ago and treats them as fact. These claims were the basis of lawsuits filed by these two admitted liars which were ultimately dismissed by a judge. The two accusers testified under oath that these events never occurred. They have provided no independent evidence and absolutely no proof in support of their accusations, which means the entire film hinges solely on the word of two perjurers. Accusations of child abuse plagued Michael Jackson a great deal during the latter portion of the singer's life. Lawsuits were filed but as the statement (via Variety) point out, they were dismissed. Jackson was also charged in Santa Barbara court with child molestation, but he was acquitted of the charges. There was really no way that a documentary about Michael Jackson dealing with this portion of his life was not going to court controversy and backlash. For many the truth of this situation has never been revealed. Jackson was one of the most famous people who has ever lived and his eclectic lifestyle only increased the scrutiny. The statement goes on to accuse one of the accusers of only bringing forward his allegations after he was denied a part in a Michael Jackson themed Cirque du Soleil show. While he did accuse Jackson of behaving improperly, he had apparently previously gone on record denying the singer had ever done anything to him, which the statement uses to question his credibility. In the end, the Jackson Estate claims that Leaving Neverland does a disservice to those that have truly been victims of sex abuse, stating that these allegations are about nothing more than making money and achieving celebrity. We are extremely sympathetic to any legitimate victim of child abuse. This film, however, does those victims a disservice. Because despite all the disingenuous denials made that this is not about money, it has always been about money – millions of dollars — dating back to 2013 when both Wade Robson and James Safechuck, who share the same law firm, launched their unsuccessful claims against Michael’s Estate. Now that Michael is no longer here to defend himself, Robson, Safechuck and their lawyers continue their efforts to achieve notoriety and a payday by smearing him with the same allegations a jury found him innocent of when he was alive. As inflammatory as the new documentary may be, it's unlikely to change anything. many have made up their minds about Michael Jackson's guilt on this topic. Those that defend him likely won't be dissuaded by this film, and those that believe Jackson was guilty likely don't need the support. Blended From Around The Web Facebook

Back to top"
